10-K 1 clh-20181231x10k.htm 10-K
Table Of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
___________________________________________________________________________________________________________
FORM 10-K
ý  ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year  ended December  31, 2018
OR
o  TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period fr om                                to                                 .
COMMISSION FILE NO. 001-34223
___________________________________________________________________________________________________________
CLEAN HARBORS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
___________________________________________________________________________________________________________
Massachusetts
(State or other jurisdiction
of incorporation or or ganization) 
04-2997780
(IRS Employer Identification No.)
42 Longwater  Drive, Norwell, MA
(Address of principal executive of fices) 02061-9149
(Zip Code)
Registrant's telephone number: (781) 792-5000
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934:
Title of each class:  Name of each exchange on which registered:
Common Stock, $.01 par value  New York Stock Exchange
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ý No o 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange
Act. Yes o   No ý
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934 during the preceding twelve months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports) and (2) has been
subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ý No o 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such
files). Yes ý No o 
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not be
contained, to the best of the registrant's knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this
Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. o
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a lar ge accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , smaller reporting
company , or an emer ging growth company . See the definitions of “lar ge accelerated filer ,” “accelerated filer ,” “smaller reporting company ,” and
"emer ging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one):
Large accelerated filer x Accelerated filer o
Non-accelerated filer o Smaller reporting company o
 Emer ging growth company o
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying
with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. o
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes o   No ý
On June 29, 2018 (the last business day of the registrant's most recently completed second fiscal quarter), the aggregate market value of the
voting and non-voting common stock of the registrant held by non-af filiates of the registrant was approximately $2.9 billion , based on the closing
price of such common stock as of that date on the New York Stock Exchange. Reference is made to Part III of this report for the assumptions on
which this calculation is based.
On February 15, 2019 , there were outstanding 55,855,142  shares of Common Stock, $.01 par value.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Certain portions of the registrant's definitive proxy statement for its 2019  annual meeting of stockholders (which will be filed with the
Commission not later than April 30, 2019 ) are incorporated by reference into Part III of this report.
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC.
ANNUAL REPORT ON FORM 10-K
YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2018
TABLE OF CONTENTS
  Page
No
Part I  
Item 1. Business 1
Item 1A. Risk Factors 14
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 21
Item 2. Properties 21
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 23
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 23
Part II  
Item 5. Market for the Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities 24
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 26
Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 27
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 43
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 44
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 97
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 97
Item 9B. Other Information 99
Part III  
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 99
Item 11. Executive Compensation 99
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 99
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 99
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 99
Part IV  
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 100
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 100
SIGNATURES 101
Table Of Contents
Disclosure Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
In addition to historical information, this annual report contains forward-looking statements, which are generally identifiable
by use of the words "believes," "expects," "intends," "anticipates," "plans to," "estimates," "projects," or similar expressions. These
forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from
those reflected in these forward-looking statements. Factors that might cause such a difference include, but are not limited to, those
discussed in this report under Item 1A, "Risk Factors," and Item 7, "Management's Discussion and Analysis on Financial Condition
and Results of Operations." Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which reflect
management's opinions only as of the date hereof. We undertake no obligation to revise or publicly release the results of any
revision to these forward-looking statements. Readers should also carefully review the risk factors described in other documents
which we file from time to time with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"), including the quarterly reports on
Form 10-Q to be filed by us during 2019.
PART I
ITEM 1.    BUSINESS
General
Clean Harbors, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively, "we," "Clean Harbors" or the "Company") is a leading provider of
environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. We are also the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil
in the world and the largest provider of parts cleaning and related environmental services to commercial, industrial and automotive
customers in North America.
During the first quarter of fiscal year 2018, certain of our businesses undertook a reorganization which included changes to
the underlying business and management structures. The reorganization resulted in combining the Environmental Services
businesses from an operational and management perspective, deepening customer relationships and allowing for efficiencies across
our operations through the sharing of resources, namely labor and equipment, which will reduce third party spending and promote
cross selling of our business offerings. In connection with this reorganization, our chief operating decision maker requested changes
in the information that he regularly reviews for purposes of allocating resources and assessing performance. These changes required
a reconsideration of our operating segments in the first quarter of 2018 and resulted in a change in our assessment of our operating
segments. We concluded that we now have two operating segments for disclosure purposes; (i) the Environmental Services
segment which consists of our historical Technical Services, Industrial Services, Field Services and Oil, Gas and Lodging
businesses, and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment.
•Environmental Services - Environmental Services segment results are predicated upon the demand by our customers
for waste services directly attributable to waste volumes generated by them and project work for which waste
handling and/or disposal is required. In managing the business and evaluating performance, management tracks the
volumes and mix of waste handled and disposed of through our owned incinerators and landfills, as well as utilization
of such incinerators, labor and billable hours and equipment among other key metrics. Levels of activity and ultimate
performance associated with this segment can be impacted by several factors including overall U.S. GDP and U.S.
industrial production, weather conditions, efficiency of our operations, competition and market pricing of our services
and the management of our related operating costs. Environmental Services results are also impacted by the demand
for planned and unplanned industrial related cleaning and maintenance services at customer sites and for
environmental cleanup services on a scheduled or emergency basis, including response to national events such as
major oil spills, natural disasters or other events where immediate and specialized services are required.
•Safety-Kleen - Safety-Kleen segment results are impacted by an array of core service offerings that serve to attract
small quantity waste producers as customers and integrate them into the Clean Harbors waste network. Core service
offerings include parts washer services, containerized waste services, vac services, used motor oil collection and sale
of base and blended oil products as well as complementary products including automotive related fluids and shop
supplies. Key performance indicators tracked by the Company relative to these services include the number of parts
washer services performed and used motor oil and waste volumes collected. Results from these services are primarily
driven by the overall number of parts washers placed at customer sites and volumes of waste collected. These factors
can be impacted by overall economic conditions in the marketplace especially in the automotive related area. Safety-
Kleen offers high quality base and blended oil products to end users including fleet customers, distributors, and
manufacturers of oil products. Relative to these oil related products, management tracks the Company's volumes and
relative percentages of base and blended oil sales along with various pricing metrics associated with the commodity
driven marketplace. The segment’s results are
1
Table Of Contents
significantly impacted by overall market pricing and product mix associated with base and blended oil products and,
more specifically, the market prices of Group II base oils, which historically have correlated with overall crude oil
prices. Costs incurred in connection with the collection of used oils and other raw materials associated with the
segment’s oil related products can also be volatile. The implementation of our OilPlus® closed loop initiative resulting
in the sale of our renewable oil products directly to our end customers will also impact future operating results.
Clean Harbors, Inc. was incorporated in Massachusetts in 1980 and our principal office is located in Norwell, Massachusetts.
We maintain a website at the following Internet address: http://www.cleanharbors.com. Through a link on this website, we provide
free access to our annual reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and amendments to
those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 as soon as reasonably
practicable after electronic filing with the SEC. Our guidelines on corporate governance, the charters for our board committees, and
our code of ethics for members of the board of directors, our chief executive officer and our other senior officers are also available
on our website, and we will post on our website any waivers of, or amendments to, such code of ethics. Our website and the
information contained therein or connected thereto are not incorporated by reference into this annual report.
Health and Safety
Health and Safety is our #1 priority. Employees at all levels of our Company share this philosophy and are committed to
ensuring our safety goals are met. Our commitment to health and safety benefits everyone—our employees, our customers, the
community, and the environment. In 2018, our successful Safety Starts With Me: Live It 3-6-5 program, which is a key component
in our overall safety approach along with our many other programs, enabled us to achieve a low Total Recordable Incident Rate, or
"TRIR;" Days Away, Restricted Activity and Transfer Rate, or "DART;" and Experience Modification Rate, or "EMR." For the year
ended December 31, 2018, our Company wide TRIR, DART and EMR were 1.08, 0.63 and 0.58, respectively. For the year ended
December 31, 2017, our Company wide TRIR, DART and EMR were 1.34, 0.80 and 0.58, respectively.
In order to protect our employees, continue to lower our incident rates, and satisfy our customers' demands to retain the best
service providers with the lowest TRIR, DART and EMR rates, we are fully committed to continuously improving our health and
safety performance. All employees recognize the importance of protecting themselves, their fellow employees, their customers, and
all those around them from harm. This commitment is supported by the philosophies and Golden Rules of Safety that is the
cornerstone of the Safety Starts with Me: Live It 3-6-5 program. Live It 3-6-5 is our dedication to the safety of our workers through
each and every employee’s commitment to our three Safety philosophies, our six Golden Rules of Safety and each employee’s five
personal reasons why they choose to be safe at work, on the road and at home.
Compliance
We regard compliance with applicable environmental regulations as a critical component of our overall operations. We strive
to maintain the highest professional standards in our compliance activities. Our compliance program has been developed for each
of our waste management facilities and service centers under the direction of our compliance staff. The compliance staff is
responsible for facilities permitting and regulatory compliance, compliance training, transportation compliance, and related record
keeping. To ensure the effectiveness of our regulatory compliance program, our compliance staff monitors daily operational
activities. We also have an Environmental Health and Safety Compliance Internal Audit Program designed to identify any
weaknesses or opportunities for improvement in our ongoing compliance programs. We also perform periodic audits and
inspections of the disposal facilities owned by other companies which we utilize.
Our facilities are frequently inspected and audited by regulatory agencies, as well as by customers. Although our facilities
have been cited on occasion for regulatory violations, we believe that each of our facilities is currently in substantial compliance
with applicable permit requirements.
Strategy
Our strategy is to develop and maintain ongoing relationships with a diversified group of customers that have recurring needs
for environmental, energy or industrial services. We strive to be recognized as the premier supplier of a broad range of value-added
services based upon quality, responsiveness, customer service, information technologies, breadth of service offerings and cost
effectiveness.
The principal elements of our business strategy in no particular order are:
•Cross-Sell Across Businesses—We believe the breadth of our service offerings allows us to provide additional services to
existing customers and as such, the reorganization that took place during the first quarter of 2018 resulted
2
Table Of Contents
in deepening of our customer relationships and promoting the cross selling of such service offerings. We believe we can
provide industrial and field services to customers that traditionally have only used our technical services and technical
services to customers that use our industrial services or oil and gas field services. At the same time, we see a variety of
cross-selling opportunities between our Environmental Services and Safety-Kleen segments. Reflecting this strategy, we
have been successfully cross-selling the services of Safety-Kleen, such as parts washers, various cleaning products,
recycling services and our OilPlus® closed loop initiative, to legacy Clean Harbors customers. We believe leveraging our
ability to cross-sell across our segments will drive additional revenue for our Company.
•Capture Large-Scale Projects—We provide turnkey offsite transportation and landfill or incineration disposal services
for soil and other contaminated media generated from remediation activities. We also assist remediation contractors and
project managers with support services including groundwater disposal, waste disposal, roll-off container management,
and many other related services. We believe this will drive incremental waste volume to our existing facilities, thereby
increasing utilization and enhancing overall profitability.
•Expand Throughput Capacity of Existing Facilities—We operate an extensive network of hazardous waste
management facilities and oil re-refineries and have made substantial investments in these facilities, which provide us with
significant operating leverage as volumes increase. In addition, there are opportunities to expand waste handling capacity
or waste oil processing at these facilities by modifying the terms of the existing permits and by adding equipment and new
technology. Through selected permit modifications, we can expand the range of treatment services offered to our
customers without the large capital investment necessary to acquire or build new waste management facilities.
•Pursue Strategic Acquisitions—We actively pursue selective acquisitions in certain services or market sectors where we
believe the acquisitions can enhance and expand our business. We believe that we can expand existing services through
strategic acquisitions in order to generate incremental revenues from existing and new customers and to obtain greater
market share. In order to maximize synergies, we rapidly integrate our acquisitions into our existing processes. For
additional information on our acquisitions, see "Acquisitions and Divestitures" below.
•Execute Strategic Divestitures—To complement our acquisition strategy and focus on internal growth, we regularly
review and evaluate our existing operations to determine whether our business model should change through the
divestiture of certain businesses. Accordingly, from time to time, we divest certain non-core businesses and reallocate our
resources to businesses that we believe better align with our long-term strategic direction.
•Focus on Cost, Pricing and Productivity Initiatives—We continually seek to increase efficiency and to reduce costs
through enhanced technology, process efficiencies and stringent expense management. For instance, in 2018, we
successfully undertook, in response to current and expected business conditions, branch consolidations, greater
internalization of maintenance costs, procurement and supply chain improvements. Additionally, we seek areas in our
business where strategic investment in processes, tools and employees can serve to increase productivity, efficiency and
safety compliance.
•Expand Service Offerings and Geographic Coverage—We believe our Environmental Services and Safety-Kleen
segments have a competitive advantage due to their vast network of locations across North America, particularly in areas
where we maintain service locations at or near a treatment, storage and disposal facility, or "TSDF." By opening additional
service locations we believe that we can increase our market share within these segments. We believe this will drive
additional waste into our existing facilities, thereby increasing utilization and enhancing overall profitability. In addition,
our management team continues to assess the competitive landscape in order to identify new business opportunities.
Acquisitions and Divestitures
Acquisitions are an element of our business strategy that involves expansion through the purchase of businesses that
complement our existing company and create multiple opportunities for profitable growth.
In 2018, we acquired the U.S. Industrial Cleaning Business of Veolia Environmental Services North America LLC (the
"Veolia Business") as well as a privately-owned company for a combined preliminary purchase price of $151.3 million. The
acquisitions provide significant scale and industrial services capabilities, while increasing the size of our existing U.S. Industrial
Services business. The acquisitions were financed with cash on hand. The Veolia Business is included in our Environmental
Services segment while the privately-owned company has components included in both the Environmental Services and Safety-
Kleen segments.
In 2017, we acquired Lonestar West Inc. ("Lonestar"), a public company headquartered in Alberta, Canada, for approximately
CAD $41.8 million ($33.1 million USD), net of cash acquired. The acquisition price included the assumption of approximately
CAD $21.3 million ($16.8 million USD) in outstanding debt, which we subsequently repaid. The acquisition
3
Table Of Contents
supports our growth in the daylighting and hydro excavation services markets. In addition to increasing the size of our hydro vac
fleet, Lonestar's network of locations provides us with direct access to key geographic markets in both the United States and
Canada. The acquired company is included in our Environmental Services segment.
In 2016, we acquired seven businesses for a combined purchase price of $204.8 million, paid in cash and subject to customary
post-closing adjustments, which complement our strategy to create a closed loop model as it relates to the sale and distribution of
our oil products. These acquisitions also provided us three additional oil re-refineries while also expanding our used motor oil
collection network and providing greater blending and packaging capabilities. These acquisitions also provided us with greater
access to customers in the West Coast region of the United States and additional locations with Part B permits. Operations of these
acquisitions are primarily being integrated across our Safety-Kleen segment, with certain operations also being integrated into our
Environmental Services segment.
For additional information relating to our acquisition activities during 2018, 2017 and 2016, see Note 4, "Business
Combinations," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report.
Other business transactions also include divestitures based on our ongoing review of portfolio assets to determine the extent to
which they are contributing to our objectives and growth strategy.
In 2017 we completed the sale of our Transformer Services business, which was a non-core business previously included
within the legacy Technical Services segment, for $45.5 million ($43.4 million net of $2.1 million in transactional related costs)
subject to customary post-closing adjustments. In 2016 we completed the sale of our Catalyst Services business, which was a non-
core business previously included within the legacy Industrial Services operating segment, for approximately $50.6 million ($49.2
million net of cash retained by the catalyst services business) subject to customary post-closing adjustments. For additional
information relating to these divestitures, see Note 5, "Disposition of Businesses," to our consolidated financial statements included
in Item 8 of this report.
Protecting the Environment and Corporate Sustainability
Our core business is to provide industry, government and the public a wide range of environmental, energy and industrial
services that protect and restore North America's natural environment.
As a leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America, our first goal is to help our
customers prevent the release of chemicals and hazardous waste streams into the environment. We also are the leading service
provider in the recovery and decontamination of pollutants that have been released. This includes the safe destruction or disposal of
hazardous materials in a manner that ensures these materials are no longer a danger to the environment. When providing these
services, we are committed to the recycling, reuse and reclamation of these wastes whenever possible using a variety of methods
more fully explained below in the sections describing our general operations. Many of our branded services exemplify our
commitment to sustainability and providing environmental solutions to the marketplace. Where possible, liquids such as solvents,
chemicals and used oil are continuously recycled to our high-quality standards and made into useful products. Tolling programs
provide a closed process in which the customer’s spent solvents are recycled to their precise specifications and returned directly to
them.
In 2018 we gathered nearly 225 million gallons of used oil in North America through our Safety-Kleen business. Since their
opening, our plants have re-refined more than 3.3 billion gallons of used oil, avoiding more than 27 million metric tons of
greenhouse gases.
We have also become the leading North American provider of services to protect the ozone layer from the destructive effects
of chlorofluorocarbons, or "CFCs," which are ozone layer depleting substances and global warming compounds that have global
warming potentials up to 10,000 times more powerful than carbon dioxide. Global-warming potential is a relative measure of how
much heat a greenhouse gas traps in the atmosphere.
Since 2013, more than 7.9 million metric tons of carbon dioxide emissions were avoided by destroying CFCs at our Arkansas
incinerator. That is equivalent to removing approximately 1.6 million passenger vehicles from the road for one year.
Our fleet of transportation vehicles represents one of our largest opportunities to apply sustainable business practices. Our
Asset Refurbishment Program is a comprehensive effort to rebuild assets to "like new" quality. With four facilities now operational,
we are able to rebuild approximately two vehicles every week. Our goal is 100% reuse or recycling of all materials.
One of our most highly visible public programs for various governmental and community entities involves the removal of
thousands of tons of hazardous wastes, from households throughout the United States and Canada, that might otherwise be
improperly disposed of or become dangerous to the communities where they are stored.
4
Table Of Contents
As we provide these wide-ranging services throughout North America, we are committed to ensuring that our own operations
are environmentally responsible. Our sustainability efforts are guided by a formal policy, strategy and plan and we continue to build
on our past efforts, such as implementing numerous energy efficiency improvements and various transportation initiatives within
our fleet, including using our own recycled oil. We developed initiatives that focus on improving the Company's and our customers'
impact on the environment. Our technologies and increased operational efficiencies have allowed us to deliver innovative customer
solutions, like our Safety-Kleen Oil Plus® Program, that show our commitment to sustainable methodologies and transform the
way we do business.
Competitive Strengths
•Leading Provider of Environmental, Energy and Industrial Services—We are a leading provider of environmental,
energy and industrial services. We own nine of the 13 commercial hazardous waste incinerators, making us the largest
operator of such facilities in North America. We are also one of the few industrial services companies with national
footprints in both the U.S. and Canada. We provide multi-faceted, high-quality services to a broad mix of customers. We
attract and better serve our customers because of our vast capabilities and breadth of services as well as our overall size,
scale and geographic location of our large network along with valuable and unique assets used in providing our services.
•Integrated Network of Assets—We believe we operate, in the aggregate, the largest number of commercial hazardous
waste incinerators, landfills, treatment facilities and TSDFs in North America. Our broad service network enables us to
effectively handle a waste stream from its origin through disposal and to efficiently direct and internalize our waste
streams to reduce costs. As our processing of wastes increases, our size allows us to leverage our network and increase our
profit margins as we can internalize a greater volume of waste in our incinerators, landfills and other disposal facilities.
Furthermore, these assets are very difficult to duplicate because significant permitting and regulatory approvals would
need to take place in order for new waste disposal sites to come on line. High barriers of entry for such assets provide
increased value to our network.
•Comprehensive Service Capabilities—Our comprehensive service offerings allow us to act as a full-service provider to
our customers. Our breadth of service offerings creates incremental revenue growth as customers seek to minimize the
number of outside vendors and demand "one-stop-shop" service providers.
•Largest Collector and Recycler of Used Motor Oil— As the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil in the world, we
returned during 2018 approximately 192 million gallons of new re-refined oil, lubricants and byproducts back into the
marketplace. In 2018, our re-refining process eliminated more than two million metric tons of greenhouse gas ("GHG"),
which is the equivalent of growing more than 54 million trees for 10 years in an urban environment or taking over 395,000
passenger cars off the road for one year.
•Large and Diversified Customer Base—Our customers range from Fortune 500 companies to midsize and small public
and private entities that span multiple industries and business types, including governmental entities. This diversification
limits our credit exposure to any one customer and potential cyclicality to any one industry. As a percentage of our 2018
revenues, the top ten industries we service totaled approximately 76% and included general manufacturing (17%),
chemical (14%), refineries (8%), base and blended oils (8%), automotive (7%), government (6%), utilities (5%),
transportation (4%), oil and gas (4%) and construction (3%).
•Stable and Recurring Revenue Base—We have long-standing relationships with our large customers, many of whom
have worked with our Company for decades. Our diversified customer base provides stable and recurring revenues, as a
significant portion of our revenues are derived from previously served customers with recurring needs for our services. In
addition, switching costs for many of our hazardous waste customers are high. This is due to many customers' desire to
audit disposal facilities prior to their qualification as approved sites and to limit the number of facilities to which their
hazardous wastes are shipped in order to reduce their potential liability under United States and Canadian environmental
laws and regulations. We have been selected as an approved vendor by large and small generators of waste because we
possess comprehensive collection, recycling, treatment, transportation, disposal, and hazardous waste tracking capabilities
and have the expertise necessary to comply with applicable environmental laws and regulations. Those customers that
have selected us as an approved vendor typically continue to use our services on a recurring basis.
•Regulatory Compliance—We continue to make capital investments in our facilities to ensure that they are in compliance
with current federal, state, provincial and local regulations. Companies that rely on in-house disposal may find the current
regulatory requirements to be too capital intensive or complicated, and may choose to outsource many of their hazardous
waste disposal needs.
5
Table Of Contents
•Effective Cost Management—Our significant scale allows us to maintain low costs through standardized compliance
procedures, significant purchasing power, leveraging our investment in technology and our ability to efficiently utilize
logistics and transportation to economically direct waste streams to the most efficient facility. We also have the ability to
transport and process with internal resources the substantial majority of all hazardous waste that we manage for our
customers. In addition, our Safety-Kleen results are significantly impacted by the overall market pricing and product mix
associated with base and blended oil products and, more specifically, the market prices of Group II base oils. We charge
fees related to our used oil collection services which allow us to effectively manage the profit spreads inherent in our
business.
•Proven and Experienced Management Team—Our executive management team provides depth and continuity. Our 12
executive officers collectively have over 200 years of experience and expertise in the environmental, energy and industrial
services industries. Our chief executive officer founded our Company in 1980, and since its formation has served as both
the Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board.
Operations
General
Seasonality and Cyclical Nature of Business. Our operations may be affected by seasonal fluctuations due to weather and
budgetary cycles influencing the timing of customers' spending for products and services. Typically during the first quarter of each
year there is less demand for our products, oil collection, recycling and environmental services due to the lower levels of activities
by our customers as a result of the cold weather, particularly in the Northern and Midwestern regions of the United States and
Canada. As a result, reduced volumes of waste are received at our facilities, higher operating costs are realized due to sub-freezing
weather and high levels of snowfall, factory closings for year-end holidays reduce waste volume, and lower volumes of used oil are
generated for our collection.
Geographical Information.    For the year ended December 31, 2018, we generated $2,721.8 million or 82.5% of our direct
revenues in the United States and $578.5 million or 17.5% of revenues in Canada. For the year ended December 31, 2017, we
generated $2,392.0 million or 81.2% of our direct revenues in the United States and $553.0 million or 18.8% of revenues in
Canada. For additional information about the geographical areas from which our revenues are derived and in which our assets are
located, see Note 19, "Segment Reporting," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report.
Environmental Services
We collect, transport, treat and dispose of hazardous and non-hazardous waste, including resource recovery, physical
treatment, fuel blending, incineration, landfill disposal, wastewater treatment, lab chemical disposal, explosives management and
CleanPack® services. Our CleanPack® services include the collection, identification and categorization, specialized packaging,
transportation and disposal of laboratory chemicals and household hazardous waste. We also perform a wide range of industrial
maintenance and specialty industrial services and utilize specialty equipment and resources to perform field services at any chosen
location on a planned or emergency response basis. All of these services are designed to protect the environment and address
environmental related challenges through the use of innovation and the latest technologies. We provide customers with sustainable
solutions that seek to recycle waste materials whenever possible.
Technical Services. We provide technical services through a network of service centers from which a fleet of vehicles are
dispatched to pick up customers' waste either on a predetermined schedule or on demand, and to deliver the waste to permitted
facilities, which are usually Company-owned. Our service centers also can dispatch chemists to a customer location for collection
of chemical and laboratory waste for disposal. InSite Service offerings is a branded on-site/in-plant service delivery program
through which we offer a full range of environmental, industrial and waste management services. This signature program is built on
safety, quality, efficiency and integrity, and has been offered by Clean Harbors for more than 25 years. By leveraging Clean
Harbors' expertise and capabilities, our on-site staffs are dedicated to developing the safest, most cost-effective solutions to service
customers’ needs.
Collection, Transportation and Logistics Management.    As an integral part of our services, we collect industrial waste from
customers and transport such waste to and between our facilities for treatment or bulking for shipment to final disposal locations.
Customers typically accumulate waste in containers, such as 55-gallon drums, bulk storage tanks or 20-cubic-yard roll-off
containers. In providing this service, we utilize a variety of specially designed and constructed tank trucks and semi-trailers as well
as third-party transporters, including railroads.
Treatment and Disposal.    We recycle, treat and dispose of hazardous and non-hazardous industrial waste. The waste handled
includes substances which are classified as "hazardous" because of their corrosive, ignitable, infectious, reactive or toxic properties,
and other substances subject to federal, state and provincial environmental regulation. We provide final
6
Table Of Contents
treatment and disposal services designed to manage waste which cannot be otherwise economically recycled or reused. The waste
that we handle comes in solid, sludge, liquid and gas form.
We operate a network of TSDFs that collect, temporarily store and/or consolidate compatible waste streams for more efficient
transportation to final recycling, treatment or disposal destinations. These facilities hold special permits, such as Part B permits
under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, or "RCRA," in the United States, which allow them to process, transfer and
dispose of waste through various technologies including recycling, incineration, and landfill and wastewater treatment depending
on each location's permitted and constructed capabilities.
Resource Recovery and Fuel Blending.    We operate recycling systems for the reclamation and reuse of certain waste,
particularly solvent-based waste generated by industrial cleaning operations, metal finishing and other manufacturing processes.
Resource recovery involves the treatment of wastes using various methods, which effectively remove contaminants from the
original material to restore its fitness for its intended purpose and to reduce the volume of waste requiring disposal.
We also operate a recycling facility that recycles refinery waste and spent catalyst. The recycled oil and catalysts, depending
on market conditions, are sold to third parties.
Incineration.    Incineration is the preferred method for the treatment of organic hazardous waste because it effectively
destroys the contaminants at high temperatures. High temperature incineration effectively eliminates organic waste such as
herbicides, halogenated solvents, pesticides, pharmaceutical and refinery waste, regardless of whether gases, liquids, sludge or
solids. Federal and state incineration regulations require a destruction and removal efficiency of 99.99% for most organic waste.
As of December 31, 2018, we had nine active incinerators operating in five incinerator facilities that offer a wide range of
technological capabilities to customers. In the United States, we operate a fluidized bed thermal oxidation unit for maximum
destruction efficiency of hazardous waste with an estimated annual practical capacity of 58,808 tons and three solids and liquids
capable incinerator facilities with a combined estimated annual practical capacity of 377,387 tons. We also operate one hazardous
waste liquid injection incinerator in Canada with total annual practical capacity of 125,526 tons.
Our incinerator facilities in Kimball, Nebraska; Deer Park, Texas; El Dorado, Arkansas; and Aragonite, Utah, are designed to
process liquid organic waste, sludge, solids, soil and debris. Our Deer Park facility has two kilns and a rotary reactor. Our El
Dorado facility specializes in the treatment of bulk and containerized hazardous liquids, solids and sludge. In 2017, we opened a
new hazardous waste incinerator at our El Dorado, Arkansas facility, which specializes in high-temperature incineration of
regulated waste such as industrial and laboratory chemicals, manufacturing byproducts, fertilizers and other solid and liquid
materials that would otherwise be hazardous to the environment and public health if not properly managed. Our facilities in
Kimball and Deer Park also have on-site landfills for the disposal of ash produced as a result of the incineration process.
Our incinerator facility in Lambton, Ontario, is a liquid injection incinerator, designed primarily for the destruction of liquid
organic waste. Typical waste streams include wastewater with low levels of organics and other higher concentration organic liquid
waste not amenable to conventional physical or chemical waste treatment.
Landfills.    Landfills are primarily used for disposal of inorganic waste. In the United States and Canada, we operate nine
commercial landfills. Seven of our commercial landfills are designed and permitted for disposal of hazardous waste and two of our
landfills are operated for non-hazardous industrial waste disposal and, to a lesser extent, municipal solid waste. In addition to our
commercial landfills, we also own and operate, as described above, two non-commercial landfills that only accept waste from our
on-site incinerators.
Of our seven commercial landfills used for disposal of hazardous waste, five are located in the United States and two are
located in Canada. As of December 31, 2018, the useful economic lives of these landfills included approximately 25.6 million cubic
yards of remaining capacity. This estimate of the useful economic lives of these landfills includes permitted airspace and
unpermitted airspace that our management believes to be probable of being permitted based on our analysis of various factors. In
addition to the capacity included in the useful economic lives of these landfills, there are approximately 31.9 million cubic yards of
additional unpermitted airspace capacity included in the footprints of these landfills that may ultimately be permitted, although
there can be no assurance that this additional capacity will be permitted. In addition to the hazardous waste landfills, we operate
two non-hazardous industrial landfills with 3.8 million cubic yards of remaining permitted capacity. These two facilities are located
in the United States and have been issued operating permits under Subtitle D of RCRA. Our non-hazardous landfill facilities are
permitted to accept commercial industrial waste, including waste from foundries, demolition and construction, machine shops,
automobile manufacturing, printing, metal fabrications and recycling.
Wastewater Treatment.    We operate nine wastewater treatment facilities that offer a range of wastewater treatment
technologies. These wastewater treatment operations involve processing hazardous and non-hazardous waste through use of
7
Table Of Contents
physical and chemical treatment methods. These facilities treat a broad range of industrial liquid and semi-liquid waste containing
heavy metals, organics and suspended solids.
Total Project Management. We also provide total project management services in areas such as chemical packing, on-site
waste management, remediation, compliance training and emergency spill response, while leveraging the Clean Harbors network of
service centers and environmental capabilities.
Industrial Services. We perform industrial maintenance services and specialty industrial services at refineries, mines,
upgraders, chemical plants, pulp and paper mills, manufacturing, and power generation facilities. We provide these services
throughout North America.
Our crews handle as-needed in-plant services to support ongoing in-plant cleaning and maintenance services, including
liquid/dry vacuum, hydro-blasting, dewatering and materials processing, water and chemical hauling and steam cleaning. We
provide a variety of specialized industrial services including plant outage and turnaround services, decoking and pigging, chemical
cleaning, high and ultra-high pressure water cleaning, pipeline inspection and coating services, and large tank and surface
impoundment cleaning. We also provide daylighting services which, through the use of specialized hydro vac equipment, deliver
safer, cleaner and more precise hydro excavation services to safely uncover highly sensitive underground targets. Our crews also
handle oilfield transport and production services supporting drilling, completions and production programs.
Field and Emergency Response Services. Our crews and equipment are dispatched on a planned or emergency basis and
perform services such as confined space entry for tank cleaning, site decontamination, large remediation projects, demolition, spill
cleanup on land and water, railcar cleaning, product recovery and transfer, scarifying and media blasting and vacuum services.
Additional services include filtration and water treatment services.
We are also a leader in providing response services for environmental emergencies of any scale from man-made disasters
such as oil spills and natural disasters such as hurricanes.
Oil and Gas Field Services. We provide integrated seismic and right-of-way services for efficient resource discovery and site
preparation. These services include: (i) seismic surveying that minimizes costs, environmental impact, and time in field; (ii)
mulching/line clearing that expedites additional geophysical activities and minimizes environmental impact; and (iii) shot-hole
drilling that provides safe and efficient operations in every terrain, including hostile and inaccessible regions. We also provide
surface rentals services by supporting oil and gas companies' drilling and well completion programs. Key to our services is our
ability to provide solids control to support the drilling process. Our technologies help manage liquids, solids and semi-solid
material during the drilling operation, and include centrifuges, tanks, and drilling fluid recovery. We also can provide container
rentals for safe collection of drill cuttings and other wastes, as well as manage disposal of drilling fluids and solids and can supply
surface rental equipment to support drill sites by providing wellsite trailers, wastewater treatment systems and holding tanks, light
towers, generators and handling tools.
Lodging Services. Our fixed lodges provide turnkey remote accommodations throughout Western Canada, primarily in the
Fort McMurray area, and range in size up to approximately 600 beds. These are open lodges, with amenities that include catering
and housekeeping services, fully equipped common areas, fitness rooms and computer rooms, wireless internet and public phones,
powered parking stalls, laundry facilities, and daily towel service. We also offer mobile camp operations, which provide services
for remote workforce accommodation facilities throughout Western Canada, currently in British Columbia, Saskatchewan and
Alberta, with multiple accommodation types. These include client and open camps, operator camps, and drill camps. Furthermore,
hospitality services are available as a standalone service to clients which have other accommodation arrangements.
Safety-Kleen
Our Safety-Kleen business offers an array of environmental services and complementary products to a diverse range of
customers including automobile repair shops, car and truck dealers, metal fabricators, machine manufacturers, fleet maintenance
shops and other automotive, industrial and retail customers.
As the largest provider of parts cleaning services in North America, Safety-Kleen offers a complete line of specially designed
parts washers to customer locations and then delivers recurring service that includes machine cleaning and maintenance and
disposal and replacement of clean solvent or aqueous fluids. We also sell automotive and industrial cleaning products which include
degreasers, glass and floor cleaners, hand cleaners, absorbents, antifreeze, windshield washer fluid, mats and spill kits.
Utilizing our collection network, we provide pickup and transportation of hazardous and non-hazardous containerized waste
for recycling or disposal, primarily through the Clean Harbors network of recycling and waste treatment and disposal
8
Table Of Contents
facilities. We also collect used oil which serves as feedstock for our oil re-refineries discussed below, or process the oil into
recycled fuel oil, or “RFO,” which is then sold to customers such as asphalt plants, industrial plants, pulp and paper companies, and
vacuum gas oil and marine diesel oil producers.
Our vacuum services remove solids, residual oily water and sludge and other fluids from customers' oil/water separators,
sumps and collection tanks. We also remove and collect waste fluids found at large and small industrial locations, including metal
fabricators, auto maintenance providers, and general manufacturers.
Utilizing used oil collected by Safety-Kleen branches, we manufacture, formulate, package, distribute and market high-
quality lubricants. We offer these products and services direct to business end-users and customers that can in turn market to
retailers and end-consumers. The used oil collected by Safety-Kleen's branch network is processed or re-refined to convert into a
variety of products, mostly base lubricating oils, and much smaller quantities of asphalt-like material, glycols and fuels. As the
largest re-refiner of used oil in North America, we can process the used oil collected through our six re-refineries located in East
Chicago, Indiana; Newark, California; Wichita, Kansas; Tacoma, Washington; Fallon, Nevada; and Breslau, Ontario.
Our primary goal is to produce and sell high-quality blended oils, which are created by combining our re-refined base and
other base oils with performance additives in accordance with our proprietary formulations and American Petroleum Institute
licenses. Our Performance Plus® brand and “green” proprietary brand EcoPower® are sold to on- and off-road corporate fleets,
government entities, automotive service shops and industrial plants, which are serviced through our internal distribution network,
as well as an extensive United States and Canada-wide independent distributor network. We also sell unbranded blended oils to
distributors that resell them under their private label brands. Our OilPlus® program consists of selling our renewable oil products
directly to our end customers. We sell the base oil that we do not blend and sell ourselves to independent blenders/packagers that
use it to blend their own branded or private label oils. With more than 200 million gallons of used oil processed annually, we were
able to return in 2018 approximately 192 million gallons of new re-refined oil, lubricants and byproducts back into the marketplace.
We believe our position as the largest collector and re-refiner of used motor oil, along with our vast service and distributions
network, provide a distinct competitive advantage in our ability to provide our customers with collection and oil distribution
services through our OilPlus® program.
Competition
The hazardous waste management industry is highly competitive. The sources of competition vary by locality and by type of
service rendered, with competition coming from national and regional waste services companies and hundreds of privately-owned
firms. Veolia North America, Waste Management, Inc., U.S. Ecology, and Stericycle, Inc. are the principal national firms with
which we compete. Each of these competitors is able to provide one or more of the environmental services we offer.
Under federal and state environmental laws in the United States, generators of hazardous wastes remain liable for improper
disposal of such wastes. Although generators may hire various companies that have the proper permits and licenses, because of the
generators' potential liability, they are very interested in the reputation and financial strength of the companies they use for the
management of their hazardous wastes. We believe that our technical proficiency, safety record, customer service oriented culture
and overall reputation are important considerations to our customers in selecting and continuing to utilize our services. We also
believe that the depth of our recycling, treatment and disposal capabilities, our ability to collect and transport waste products
efficiently, and pricing are additional significant factors in the market for treatment and disposal services.
Competition within our Environmental Services segment varies by locality and type of service rendered.
• For our landfill and waste services, competitors include several major national and regional environmental services
firms, as well as numerous smaller local firms. We believe the availability of skilled technical professional personnel,
quality of performance, diversity of services, safety record, quality of assets and use of current and latest technologies, as
well as price, are the key competitive factors in this service industry.
• For our industrial, field and emergency responses services, competitors vary by locality and by type of service
rendered, with competition coming from national and regional service providers and hundreds of privately-owned firms
that offer energy or industrial services. CEDA International Corporation and Newalta in Canada, and Envirosystems and
Hydrochem PSC in the United States, are the principal national firms with which we compete. Each of these competitors
is able to provide one or more of the industrial and field services we offer. We believe the availability of specialized
equipment and latest technologies, skilled technical professional personnel, quality of performance, diversity of services,
safety record and price are the key competitive factors in this industry.
9
Table Of Contents
• For our energy related services, competitors vary by locality and type of services provided, with competition coming
from national, regional and local service providers. Competition is based on a number of factors, including safety, quality,
performance, reliability, service, price, response time and, in some cases, breadth of service offering.
For our Safety-Kleen segment, competitors vary by locality and by type of service rendered, with competition coming from
Heritage-Crystal Clean and Veolia North America, along with several regional and local firms. With our Safety-Kleen Oil Plus®
closed loop offering, we are competing in certain markets with other North American lubricant distributors.
The principal methods of competition for all of our services are quality, price, reliability of service rendered and technical
proficiency. We believe that we offer a more comprehensive range of environmental, energy and industrial services than our
competitors in major portions of the United States and Canada.
Employees
As of December 31, 2018, we employed approximately 14,200 active full-time employees, of which 898 in the United States
and 547 in Canada were represented by labor unions. We believe that our relationship with our employees is positive. As part of our
commitment to employee safety and quality customer service, we have an extensive compliance program and trained
environmental, health and safety staff. We adhere to a risk management program designed to reduce potential liabilities to us and to
our customers. We also continually strive to invest in our employees through training programs as well as competitive
compensation and benefit programs
Intellectual Property
We have invested significantly in the development of proprietary technology and also to establish and maintain an extensive
knowledge of leading technologies and incorporate these technologies into the services we offer and provide to our customers. As
of December 31, 2018, we held a total of 32 U.S. and nine foreign issued or granted patents (which will expire between 2019 and
2031), two U.S. and five foreign pending patent applications, 96 U.S. and 63 foreign trademark registrations, and one U.S. and six
foreign trademark applications. We also license software and other intellectual property from various third parties. We enter into
confidentiality agreements with certain of our employees, consultants and corporate partners, and control access to software
documentation and other proprietary information. We believe that we hold adequate rights to all intellectual property used in our
business and that we do not infringe upon any intellectual property rights held by other parties.
Management of Risks
We adhere to a program of risk management policies and practices designed to reduce potential liability, as well as to manage
customers' ongoing environmental exposures. This program includes installation of risk management systems at our facilities, such
as fire suppression, employee training, environmental, auditing and policy decisions restricting the types of wastes handled. We
evaluate all revenue opportunities and decline those that we believe involve unacceptable risks.
We dispose of wastes at our incinerator, wastewater treatment and landfill facilities, or at facilities owned and operated by
other firms that we have audited and approved. We apply established technologies to treatment, storage and recovery of hazardous
wastes. We believe our operations are conducted in a safe and prudent manner and in substantial compliance with applicable laws
and regulations.
Insurance and Financial Assurance
Our insurance programs cover the potential risks associated with our multifaceted operations from two primary exposures:
direct physical damage and third-party liability. We maintain a casualty insurance program providing coverage for vehicles,
employer's liability and commercial general liability in the aggregate amount of $105.0 million, $102.0 million and $102.0 million,
respectively, per year, subject to retentions of $2.0 million per occurrence for auto and commercial general liability and $1.0
million for employers' liability in the United States and $2.0 million in Canada. We also have workers' compensation insurance
whose limits are established by state statutes.
We have pollution liability insurance policies covering potential risks in three areas: as a contractor performing services at
customer sites, as a transporter of waste, and as a processor of waste at our facilities. The contractor's pollution liability insurance
has limits of $20.0 million per occurrence and $25.0 million in the aggregate, covering offsite remedial activities and associated
liabilities.
For sudden and accidental in-transit pollution liability, our auto liability policy provides the primary $5.0 million per
occurrence of transportation pollution insurance. Our pollution liability policies provide an additional $60.0 million per occurrence
and $85.0 million in the aggregate for a total of $65.0 million per occurrence and $90.0 million, respectively. A $2.0 million
deductible per occurrence applies to this coverage in the United States and Canada.
10
Table Of Contents
Federal and state regulations require liability insurance coverage for all facilities that treat, store or dispose of hazardous
waste. RCRA, the Toxic Substances Control Act, and comparable state hazardous waste regulations typically require hazardous
waste handling facilities to maintain pollution liability insurance in the amount of $1.0 million per occurrence and $2.0 million in
the aggregate for sudden occurrences, and $3.0 million per occurrence and $6.0 million in the aggregate for non-sudden
occurrences. Our liability insurance coverage meets or exceeds all federal and state regulations.
Our international operations are insured under locally placed insurance policies that are compulsory in a specific country. In
addition, we have a global foreign liability policy that will provide excess and difference in condition coverage in international
countries.
Under our insurance programs, coverage is obtained for catastrophic exposures, cyber security as well as those risks required
to be insured by law or contract. It is our policy to retain a significant portion of certain expected losses related primarily to
employee benefit, workers' compensation, commercial general and vehicle liability. Provisions for losses expected under these
programs are recorded based upon our estimates of the actuarial calculation of the aggregate liability for claims. We believe that
policy cancellation terms are similar to those of companies in other industries.
Operators of hazardous waste handling facilities are also required by federal, state and provincial regulations to provide
financial assurance for closure and post-closure care of those facilities should the facilities cease operation. Closure would include
the cost of removing the waste stored at a facility which ceased operating and sending the material to another facility for disposal
and the cost of performing certain procedures for decontamination of the facility. As of December 31, 2018, our total estimated
closure and post-closure costs requiring financial assurance by regulators were $464.2 million for our U.S. facilities and $42.1
million for our Canadian facilities. We have obtained all of the required financial assurance for our facilities through a combination
of surety bonds, funded trusts, letters of credit and insurance from a qualified insurance company. The financial assurance related to
closure and post-closure obligations of our U.S. facilities will renew in 2019. Our Canadian facilities utilize surety bonds, which
renew at various dates throughout 2019, as well as letters of credit.
Environmental Regulation
While our business has benefited substantially from increased governmental regulation of hazardous waste transportation,
storage and disposal, the environmental services industry itself is the subject of extensive and evolving regulation by federal, state,
provincial and local authorities. We are required to obtain federal, state, provincial and local permits or approvals for each of our
hazardous waste facilities. Such permits are difficult to obtain and, in many instances, extensive studies, tests, and public hearings
are required before the approvals can be issued. We have acquired all operating permits and approvals now required for the current
operation of our business, and have applied for, or are in the process of applying for, all permits and approvals needed in connection
with continued operation and planned expansion or modifications of our operations.
We make a continuing effort to anticipate regulatory, political and legal developments that might affect operations, but are not
always able to do so. We cannot predict the extent to which any environmental legislation or regulation that may be enacted or
enforced in the future may affect our operations.
A new regulation primarily impacting the shipping business but which we are monitoring closely as it could impact our
business is known as “IMO 2020”. On January 1, 2020, the International Maritime Organization (the "IMO") will implement a new
regulation for a 0.50% global sulphur cap for marine fuels. Under the new global cap, ships that traverse the oceans will be required
to use marine fuels with a sulphur content of no more than 0.50%, versus the current limit of 3.50%, in an effort to reduce the
amount of sulphur oxide and decrease pollution and greenhouse gas emissions from the global shipping fleet, which now uses an
estimated 3.5 - 4 million barrels per day of fuel oil. The shipping industry is the last major transportation sector to utilize fuel with
high levels of sulfur, which is the reason the IMO is pushing the industry to more closely align with other transport sectors for
pollution reduction.
There are several variables around this regulatory change that are not yet clear, including anticipated levels of compliance and
enforcement. However, it is expected that the implementation of IMO 2020 will result in a significant increase in near-term demand
for a broad range of low sulfur distillates including diesel, marine gas oil, marine diesel oil and vacuum gas oil ("VGO") among
others. There is uncertainty about the global refinery industry’s ability to meet that spike in demand, which could have substantial
consequences for the pricing of those products, particularly VGO. The price of VGO typically has a direct impact on the pricing
and/or levels of production of base oil. Changes in the marine fuel market as a result of IMO 2020 is also expected to affect the
availability of used motor oil, which today is frequently used in the marine market and some of which may be displaced as a result
of this new rule.
11
Table Of Contents
United States Hazardous Waste Regulation
Federal Regulations.    The most significant federal environmental laws affecting us are the RCRA, the Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, or "CERCLA," also known as the "Superfund Act," the Clean Air Act,
the Clean Water Act, and the Toxic Substances Control Act, or "TSCA."
RCRA.    RCRA is the principal federal statute governing hazardous waste generation, treatment, transportation, storage and
disposal. Pursuant to RCRA, the EPA has established a comprehensive "cradle-to-grave" system for the management of a wide
range of materials identified as hazardous waste. States that have adopted hazardous waste management programs with standards at
least as stringent as those promulgated by the EPA have been delegated authority by the EPA to administer their facility permitting
programs in lieu of the EPA's program.
Every facility that treats, stores or disposes of hazardous waste must obtain a RCRA permit from the EPA or an authorized
state agency unless a specific exemption exists, and must comply with certain operating requirements (the Part B permitting
process). RCRA also requires that Part B permits contain provisions for required on-site study and cleanup activities, known as
"corrective action," including detailed compliance schedules and provisions for assurance of financial responsibility. See Note 10,
"Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities," and Note 11, "Remedial Liabilities," to our consolidated financial statements included in
Item 8 of this report for a discussion of our environmental liabilities. See "Insurance and Financial Assurance" above for a
discussion of our financial assurance requirements.
The Superfund Act.    The Superfund Act is the primary federal statute regulating the cleanup of inactive hazardous substance
sites and imposing liability for cleanup on the responsible parties. It also provides for immediate response and removal actions
coordinated by the EPA to releases of hazardous substances into the environment, and authorizes the government to respond to the
release or threatened release of hazardous substances or to order responsible persons to perform any necessary cleanup. The statute
provides for strict and, in certain cases, joint and several liability for these responses and other related costs, and for liability for the
cost of damages to natural resources, to the parties involved in the generation, transportation and disposal of hazardous substances.
Under the statute, we may be deemed liable as a generator or transporter of a hazardous substance which is released into the
environment, or as the owner or operator of a facility from which there is a release of a hazardous substance into the environment.
See Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for a
description of the principal such proceedings in which we are now involved.
The Clean Air Act.    The Clean Air Act was passed by Congress to control the emissions of pollutants into the air and
requires permits to be obtained for certain sources of toxic air pollutants such as vinyl chloride, or criteria pollutants, such as
carbon monoxide. In 1990, Congress amended the Clean Air Act to require further reductions of air pollutants with specific targets
for non-attainment areas in order to meet certain ambient air quality standards. These amendments also require the EPA to
promulgate regulations which (i) control emissions of 189 hazardous air pollutants; (ii) create uniform operating permits for major
industrial facilities similar to RCRA operating permits; (iii) mandate the phase-out of ozone depleting chemicals; and (iv) provide
for enhanced enforcement.
The Clean Water Act.    This legislation prohibits discharge of pollutants into the waters of the United States without
governmental authorization and regulates the discharge of pollutants into surface waters and sewers from a variety of sources,
including disposal sites and treatment facilities. The EPA has promulgated "pretreatment" regulations under the Clean Water Act,
which establish pretreatment standards for introduction of pollutants into publicly owned treatment works. In the course of the
treatment process, our wastewater treatment facilities generate wastewater, which we discharge to publicly owned treatment works
pursuant to permits issued by the appropriate governmental authorities. We are required to obtain discharge permits and conduct
sampling and monitoring programs.
TSCA.    We also operate a network of collection, treatment and field services (remediation) activities throughout North
America that are regulated under provisions of TSCA. TSCA established a national program for the management of substances
classified as polychlorinated biphenyls, or "PCBs," which include waste PCBs as well as RCRA wastes contaminated with PCBs.
The rules set minimum design and operating requirements for storage, treatment and disposal of PCB wastes. Since their initial
publication, the rules have been modified to enhance the management standards for TSCA-regulated operations including the
decommissioning of PCB transformers and articles, detoxification of transformer oils, incineration of PCB liquids and solids,
landfill disposal of PCB solids, and remediation of PCB contamination at customer sites.
Other Federal Laws.    In addition to regulations specifically directed at our transportation, storage, and disposal facilities,
there are a number of regulations that may "pass-through" to the facilities based on the acceptance of regulated waste from affected
client facilities. Each facility that accepts affected waste must comply with the regulations for that waste, facility or industry.
Examples of this type of regulation are National Emission Standards for Benzene Waste Operations and National
12
Table Of Contents
Emissions Standards for Pharmaceuticals Production. Each of our facilities addresses these regulations on a case-by-case basis
determined by its ability to comply with the pass-through regulations.
In our transportation operations, we are regulated by the U.S. Department of Transportation, the Federal Railroad
Administration, the Federal Aviation Administration and the U.S. Coast Guard, as well as by the regulatory agencies of each state in
which we operate or through which our vehicles pass.
Health and safety standards under the Occupational Safety and Health Act, or "OSHA," are also applicable to all of our
operations.
State and Local Regulations. Pursuant to the EPA's authorization of their RCRA equivalent programs, a number of U.S. states
have regulatory programs governing the operations and permitting of hazardous waste facilities. Accordingly, the hazardous waste
treatment, storage and disposal activities of a number of our facilities are regulated by the relevant state agencies in addition to
federal EPA regulation.
Some states classify as hazardous some wastes that are not regulated under RCRA. For example, Massachusetts considers
used oil as "hazardous waste" while RCRA does not. Accordingly, we must comply with state requirements for handling state
regulated wastes, and, when necessary, obtain state licenses for treating, storing, and disposing of such wastes at our facilities.
Our facilities are regulated pursuant to state statutes, including those addressing clean water and clean air. Local sewer
discharge and flammable storage requirements are applicable to certain of our facilities. Our facilities are also subject to local
siting, zoning and land use restrictions. We believe that each of our facilities is in substantial compliance with the applicable
requirements of federal and state licenses which we have obtained. Once issued, such licenses have maximum fixed terms of a
given number of years, which differ from state to state, ranging from three to ten years. The issuing state agency may review or
modify a license at any time during its term. We anticipate that once a license is issued with respect to a facility, the license will be
renewed at the end of its term if the facility's operations are in compliance with applicable requirements. However, there can be no
assurance that regulations governing future licensing will remain static, or that we will be able to comply with such requirements.
Canadian Hazardous Waste Regulation
In Canada, the provinces retain control over environmental issues within their boundaries and thus have the primary
responsibility for regulating management of hazardous wastes. The federal government regulates issues of national scope or where
activities cross provincial boundaries.
Provincial Regulations.    Most of Canada's industrial development and the major part of its population are located in four
provinces: Ontario, Quebec, Alberta and British Columbia. These provinces have the most detailed environmental regulations. We
operate major waste management facilities in each of these provinces, as well as waste transfer facilities in Nova Scotia and
Manitoba.
The main provincial acts dealing with hazardous waste management are:
•Ontario—Environmental Protection Act;
•Quebec—Environmental Quality Act;
•Alberta—Environmental Protection and Enhancement Act; and
•British Columbia—Waste Management Act.
These pieces of legislation were developed by the provinces independently and, among other things, generally control the
generation, characterization, transport, treatment and disposal of hazardous wastes. Regulations developed by the provinces under
the relevant legislation are also developed independently, but are often quite similar in effect and sometimes in application. For
example, there is some uniformity in manifest design and utilization.
Provincial legislation also provides for the establishment of waste management facilities. In this case, the facilities are also
controlled by provincial statutes and regulations governing emissions to air, groundwater and surface water and prescribing design
criteria and operational guidelines.
Waste transporters require a permit to operate under provincial waste management regulations and are subject to the
requirements of the Federal Transportation of Dangerous Goods legislation. They are required to report the quantities and
disposition of materials shipped.
13
Table Of Contents
Canadian Federal Regulations.    The Canadian federal government has authority for those matters which are national in
scope and in impact and for Canada's relations with other nations. The main federal laws governing hazardous waste management
are:
•Canadian Environmental Protection Act (1999) ("CEPA 99"), and
•Transportation of Dangerous Goods Act.
Environment Canada is the federal agency with responsibility for environmental matters and the main legislative instrument
is the Canadian Environmental Protection Act. This act charges Environment Canada and Health Canada with protection of human
health and the environment and seeks to control the production, importation and use of substances in Canada and to control their
impact on the environment.
The Export and Import of Hazardous Wastes Regulations under CEPA 99 control the export and import of hazardous wastes
and hazardous recyclable materials. By reference, these regulations incorporate the Transportation of Dangerous Goods Act and
Regulations, which address identification, packaging, marking and documentation of hazardous materials during transport. CEPA
99 requires that anyone proposing to export or import hazardous wastes or hazardous recyclable materials or to transport them
through Canada notify the Minister of the Environment and obtain a permit to do so. Section 9 of CEPA 99 allows the federal
government to enter into administrative agreements with the provinces and territories for the development and improvement of
environmental standards. These agreements represent cooperation towards a common goal rather than a delegation of authority
under CEPA 99. To facilitate the development of provincial and territorial agreements, the federal, provincial and territorial
governments participate in the Canadian Council of Ministers of the Environment ("CCME"). The CCME comprises the 14
environment ministers from the federal, provincial and territorial governments, who normally meet twice a year to discuss national
environmental priorities and to determine work to be carried out under the auspices of the CCME.
Canadian Local and Municipal Regulations.    Local and municipal regulations seldom reference direct control of hazardous
waste management activities. Municipal regulations and by-laws, however, control such issues as land use designation, access to
municipal services and use of emergency services, all of which can have a significant impact on facility operation.
Compliance with Environmental Regulations
We incur costs and make capital investments in order to comply with the previously discussed environmental regulations.
These regulations require that we remediate contaminated sites, operate our facilities in accordance with enacted regulations, obtain
required financial assurance for closure and post-closure care of our facilities should such facilities cease operations, and make
capital investments in order to keep our facilities in compliance with environmental regulations.
As further discussed in Note 10, "Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities," and Note 11, "Remedial Liabilities," to our
consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report, we have accrued environmental liabilities as of December 31,
2018, of $190.9 million. For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, we spent $10.1 million and $13.0 million, respectively,
to address environmental liabilities.
As discussed more fully above under the heading "Insurance and Financial Assurance," we are required to provide financial
assurance with respect to certain statutorily required closure, post-closure and corrective action obligations at our facilities. We
have placed the required financial assurance primarily through a qualified insurance company.
As described in Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of
this report, we are involved in legal proceedings arising under environmental laws and regulations. Alleged failure to comply with
laws and regulations may lead to the imposition of fines or the denial, revocation or delay of the renewal of permits and licenses by
governmental entities. In addition, such governmental entities, as well as surrounding landowners, may claim that we are liable for
environmental damages. Citizens groups have become increasingly active in challenging the grant or renewal of permits and
licenses for hazardous waste facilities, and responding to such challenges has further increased the costs associated with
establishing new facilities or expanding current facilities. A significant judgment against us, the loss of a significant permit or
license, or the imposition of a significant fine could have a material effect on our business and future prospects.
ITEM 1A.    RISK FACTORS
An investment in our securities involves certain risks, including those described below. You should consider carefully these
risk factors together with all of the information included in this report before investing in our securities.
14
Table Of Contents
Risks Affecting All of Our Businesses
Our businesses are subject to operational and safety risks.
Provision of environmental, energy and industrial services to our customers by both of our business segments involves risks
such as equipment defects, malfunctions and failures, and natural disasters, which could potentially result in releases of hazardous
materials, damage to or total loss of our property or assets, injury or death of our employees, or a need to shut down or reduce
operation of our facilities while remedial actions are undertaken. Our employees often work under potentially hazardous conditions.
These risks expose us to potential liability for pollution and other environmental damages, personal injury, loss of life, business
interruption, and property damage or destruction. We must also maintain a solid safety record in order to remain a preferred
supplier to our major customers.
While we seek to minimize our exposure to such risks through comprehensive training programs, our Environmental Health
and Safety Compliance Internal Audit Program, vehicle and equipment maintenance programs, and insurance, such programs and
insurance may not be adequate to cover all of our potential liabilities and such insurance may not in the future be available at
commercially reasonable rates. If we were to incur substantial liabilities in excess of policy limits or at a time when we were not
able to obtain adequate liability insurance on commercially reasonable terms, our business, results of operations and financial
condition could be adversely affected to a material extent. Furthermore, should our safety record deteriorate, we could be subject to
a potential reduction of revenues from our major customers.
Our businesses are subject to numerous statutory and regulatory requirements, which may increase in the future.
Our businesses are subject to numerous statutory and regulatory requirements, and our ability to continue to hold licenses and
permits required for our businesses is subject to maintaining satisfactory compliance with such requirements. These requirements
may increase in the future as a result of statutory and regulatory changes. Although we are very committed to compliance and
safety, we may not, either now or in the future, be in full compliance at all times with such statutory and regulatory requirements.
Consequently, we could be required to incur significant costs to maintain or improve our compliance with such requirements.
Failure to effectively manage acquisitions and divestitures could adversely impact our future results.
We continuously evaluate potential acquisition candidates and from time to time acquire companies that we believe will
strategically fit into our business and growth objectives. If we are unable to successfully integrate and develop acquired businesses,
we could fail to achieve anticipated synergies and cost savings, including any expected increases in revenues and operating results,
which could have a material adverse effect on our financial results. We also continually review our portfolio of assets to determine
the extent to which they are contributing to our objectives and growth strategy.
Natural disasters or other catastrophic events could negatively affect our business, financial condition and results of
operations.
Natural disasters such as hurricanes, typhoons or earthquakes could negatively affect our operations and financial
performance. Such events could result in physical damage to one or more of our facilities or equipment, the temporary lack of an
adequate work force in a market, and the temporary disruption in rail or truck transportation services which we rely on to deliver
waste to our facilities. These events could prevent or delay shipments and reduce both volumes and revenue. Weather conditions
and other event driven special projects also cause interim variations in our results. We may be required to suspend operations in
some or all of our locations, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of
operations.
Our acquisitions may expose us to unknown liabilities.
Because we have acquired, and expect generally to acquire, all the outstanding shares of most of our acquired companies, our
investment in those companies are or will be subject to all of their liabilities other than their respective debts which we paid or will
pay at the time of the acquisitions. If there are unknown liabilities or other obligations, our business could be materially affected.
We may also experience issues relating to internal controls over financial reporting that could affect our ability to comply with the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act, or that could affect our ability to comply with other applicable laws.
A cyber security incident could negatively impact our business and our relationships with customers.
We use computers in substantially all aspects of our business operations and also mobile devices and other online activities to
connect with our employees and customers. Such uses give rise to cyber security risks, including security breach, espionage, system
disruption, theft and inadvertent release of information. Our business involves the storage and transmission of numerous classes of
sensitive and/or confidential information and intellectual property including, but not limited to, private information about
employees, and financial and strategic information about our Company and our business partners.
15
Table Of Contents
Furthermore, as we pursue our strategy to grow through acquisitions and new initiatives that improve our operations and cost
structure, we are also expanding and improving our information technologies, resulting in a larger technological presence and
corresponding exposure to cyber security risk. If we fail to assess and identify cyber security risks associated with acquisitions and
new initiatives, we may become increasingly vulnerable to such risks. Additionally, while we have implemented measures to
prevent security breaches and cyber incidents, our preventative measures and incident response efforts may not be entirely
effective. The theft, destruction, loss, misappropriation, or release of sensitive and/or confidential information or intellectual
property, or interference with our information technology systems or the technology systems of third parties on which we rely,
could result in business disruption, negative publicity, brand damage, violation of privacy laws, loss of customers, potential liability
and competitive disadvantage.
Tax interpretations and changes in tax regulations and legislation could adversely affect our results of operations.
We are subject to income taxes in the United States, Canada and various state and local jurisdictions. Tax interpretations,
regulations and legislation in the various jurisdictions in which we operate are subject to change and uncertainty and can impact net
income, income tax expense or recovery and deferred income tax assets or liabilities. Our interpretation of tax rules and regulations,
including those relating to foreign jurisdictions, requires judgment that may be challenged by taxation authorities upon audit.
Although we believe our assumptions, judgments and estimates are reasonable, changes in tax laws or our interpretation of tax laws
and the resolution of any tax audits could significantly impact the amounts provided for income taxes in our consolidated financial
statements.
Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange could affect our financial results.
We earn revenues, pay expenses, own assets and incur liabilities in countries using currencies other than the U.S. dollar. In
fiscal 2018, we recorded approximately 17.5% of our direct revenues in Canada. Because our consolidated financial statements are
presented in U.S. dollars, we must translate revenues, income and expenses as well as assets and liabilities into U.S. dollars at
exchange rates in effect during or at the end of each reporting period. Therefore, increases or decreases in the value of the U.S.
dollar against other currencies in countries where we operate affect our results of operations and the value of balance sheet items
denominated in foreign currencies.
Certain adverse conditions have required, and future conditions might require, us to make substantial write-downs in our
assets, which have adversely affected or would adversely affect our balance sheet and results of operations.
We review our long-lived tangible and intangible assets for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate
that the carrying value of an asset may not be recoverable. We also test our goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets for
impairment at least annually on December 31, or when events or changes in the business environment indicate that the carrying
value of a reporting unit may exceed its fair value. Based on those results, during the third quarter of 2016, we determined that the
then carrying amount of one of our then reporting units exceeded the estimated fair value of that unit and we therefore then
recognized a goodwill impairment charge of $34.0 million with respect to that unit. During and as of the end of each of 2018, 2017
and 2016, we determined that no additional asset write-downs were required. However, if conditions in any of the businesses in
which we compete were to deteriorate, we could determine that certain of our assets are impaired and we would then be required to
write-off all or a portion of our costs for such assets. Any significant write-offs would adversely affect our balance sheet and results
of operations.
Additional Risks of Our Environmental Services Business
The hazardous waste management business which our Environmental Services segment conducts is subject to significant
environmental liabilities.
We have accrued environmental liabilities valued as of December 31, 2018, at $190.9 million, substantially all of which we
assumed in connection with certain acquisitions. We calculate our environmental liabilities on a present value basis in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, which take into consideration both the amount of such liabilities and the timing
when we project that we will be required to pay such liabilities. We anticipate our environmental liabilities will be payable over
many years and that cash flows generated from our operations will generally be sufficient to fund the payment of such liabilities
when required. However, events not now anticipated (such as future changes in environmental laws and regulations or their
enforcement) could require that such payments be made earlier or in greater amounts than we now estimate, which could adversely
affect our financial condition and results of operations.
We may also assume additional environmental liabilities as part of future acquisitions. Although we will endeavor to
accurately estimate and limit environmental liabilities presented by the businesses or facilities to be acquired, some liabilities,
including ones that may exist only because of the past operations of an acquired business or facility, may prove to be more difficult
or costly to address than we then estimate. It is also possible that government officials responsible for enforcing
16
Table Of Contents
environmental laws may believe an environmental liability is more significant than we then estimate, or that we will fail to identify
or fully appreciate an existing liability before we become legally responsible to address it.
If we become unable to obtain at reasonable cost the insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit and other forms of financial
assurance required for our facilities and operations, our business and results of operations would be adversely affected.
We are required to provide substantial amounts of financial assurance to governmental agencies for closure and post-closure
care of our licensed hazardous waste treatment facilities should those facilities cease operation, and we are also occasionally
required to post surety, bid and performance bonds in connection with certain projects. As of December 31, 2018, our total
estimated closure and post-closure costs requiring financial assurance by regulators were $464.2 million for our U.S. facilities and
$42.1 million for our Canadian facilities. We have obtained all of the required financial assurance for our facilities through a
combination of surety bonds, funded trusts, letters of credit and insurance from a qualified insurance company. The financial
assurance related to closure and post-closure obligations of our U.S. facilities will renew in 2019. Our Canadian facilities utilize
surety bonds, which renew at various dates throughout 2019, as well as letters of credit.
Our ability to continue operating our facilities and conducting our other operations would be adversely affected if we became
unable to obtain sufficient insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit and other forms of financial assurance at reasonable cost to meet
our regulatory and other business requirements. The availability of insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit and other forms of
financial assurance is affected by our insurers', sureties' and lenders' assessment of our risk and by other factors outside of our
control such as general conditions in the insurance and credit markets.
The hazardous waste management industry in which we participate is subject to significant economic and business risks.
The future operating results of our Environmental Services segment may be affected by such factors as our ability to utilize
our facilities and workforce profitably in the face of intense price competition, maintain or increase market share in an industry
which has in the past experienced significant downsizing and consolidation, realize benefits from cost reduction programs, invest in
new technologies for treatment of hazardous waste, generate incremental volumes of waste to be handled through our facilities
from existing and acquired sales offices and service centers, obtain sufficient volumes of waste at prices which produce revenue
sufficient to offset the operating costs of our facilities, minimize downtime and disruptions of operations, and develop our field
services business. In particular, economic downturns or recessionary conditions in North America, and increased outsourcing by
North American manufacturers to plants located in countries with lower wage costs and less stringent environmental regulations,
have adversely affected and may in the future adversely affect the demand for our services. Our Environmental Services business is
also cyclical to the extent that it is dependent upon a stream of waste from cyclical industries such as chemical and petrochemical.
If those cyclical industries slow significantly, the business that we receive from them would likely decrease.
The extensive environmental regulations to which we are subject may increase our costs and potential liabilities and limit
our ability to expand our facilities.
Our operations and those of others in the environmental services industry are subject to extensive federal, state, provincial
and local environmental requirements in both the United States and Canada, including those relating to emissions to air, discharged
wastewater, storage, treatment, transport and disposal of regulated materials, and cleanup of soil and groundwater contamination. In
particular, if we fail to comply with governmental regulations governing the transport of hazardous materials, such failure could
negatively impact our ability to collect, process and ultimately dispose of hazardous wastes generated by our customers. While
increasing environmental regulation often presents new business opportunities for us, it often also results in increased operating and
compliance costs. Efforts to conduct our operations in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, including
environmental rules and regulations, require programs to promote compliance, such as training employees and customers,
purchasing health and safety equipment, and in some cases hiring outside consultants and lawyers. Even with these programs, we
and other companies in the environmental services industry are routinely faced with governmental enforcement proceedings, which
can result in fines or other sanctions and require expenditures for remedial work on waste management facilities and contaminated
sites. Certain of these laws impose strict and, under certain circumstances, joint and several liability on current and former owners
and operators of facilities that release regulated materials or that generate those materials and arrange for their disposal or treatment
at contaminated sites. Such liabilities can relate to required cleanup of releases of regulated materials and related natural resource
damages.
From time to time, we have paid fines or penalties in governmental environmental enforcement proceedings, usually
involving our waste treatment, storage and disposal facilities. Although none of these fines or penalties that we have paid in the past
has had a material adverse effect upon us, we might in the future be required to make substantial expenditures as a result of
governmental proceedings which would have a negative impact on our earnings. Furthermore, regulators have the power to
17
Table Of Contents
suspend or revoke permits or licenses needed for operation of our plants, equipment, and vehicles based on, among other factors,
our compliance record, and customers may decide not to use a particular disposal facility or do business with us because of
concerns about our compliance record. Suspension or revocation of permits or licenses would impact our operations and could have
a material impact on our financial results. Although we have never had any of our facilities' operating permits revoked, suspended
or non-renewed involuntarily, it is possible that such an event could occur in the future.
Some environmental laws and regulations impose liability and responsibility on present and former owners, operators or
users of facilities and sites for contamination at such facilities and sites without regard to causation or knowledge of contamination.
In the past, practices have resulted in releases of regulated materials at and from certain of our facilities, or the disposal of regulated
materials at third-party sites, which may require investigation and remediation, and potentially result in claims of personal injury,
property damage and damages to natural resources. In addition, we occasionally evaluate various alternatives with respect to our
facilities, including possible dispositions or closures. Investigations undertaken in connection with these activities may lead to
discoveries of contamination that must be remediated, and closures of facilities might trigger compliance requirements that are not
applicable to operating facilities. We are currently conducting remedial activities at certain of our facilities and paying a portion of
the remediation costs at certain sites owned by third parties. While, based on available information, we believe these remedial
activities will not result in a material effect upon our operations or financial condition, these activities or the discovery of
previously unknown conditions could result in material costs.
In addition to the costs of complying with environmental laws and regulations, we incur costs defending against
environmental litigation brought by governmental agencies and private parties. We are now, and may in the future be, a defendant
in lawsuits brought by parties alleging environmental damage, personal injury, and/or property damage, which may result in our
payment of significant amounts.
Environmental and land use laws also impact our ability to expand our facilities. In addition, we are required to obtain
governmental permits to operate our facilities, including all of our landfills. Even if we comply with all applicable environmental
laws, we might not be able to obtain requisite permits from applicable governmental authorities to extend or modify such permits to
fit our business needs.
If our assumptions relating to expansion of our landfills should prove inaccurate, our results of operations and cash flow
could be adversely affected.
When we include expansion airspace in our calculation of available airspace, we adjust our landfill liabilities to the present
value of projected costs for cell closure and landfill closure and post-closure. It is possible that our estimates or assumptions could
ultimately turn out to be significantly different from actual results. In some cases we may be unsuccessful in obtaining an
expansion permit or we may determine that an expansion permit that we previously thought was probable has become unlikely. To
the extent that such estimates, or the assumptions used to make those estimates, prove to be significantly different than actual
results, or our belief that we will receive an expansion permit changes adversely in a significant manner, our landfill assets,
including the assets incurred in the pursuit of the expansion, may be subject to impairment testing. Furthermore, lower prospective
profitability may result due to increased interest accretion and depreciation or asset impairments related to the removal of
previously included expansion airspace. In addition, if our assumptions concerning expansion airspace should prove inaccurate,
certain of our cash expenditures for closure of landfills could be accelerated and adversely affect our results of operations and cash
flow.
A significant portion of our Environmental Services business depends upon the demand for cleanup of major spills and
other remedial projects and regulatory developments over which we have no control.
Our operations can be affected by the commencement and completion of cleanup of major spills and other events, customers'
decisions to undertake remedial projects, seasonal fluctuations due to weather and budgetary cycles influencing the timing of
customers' spending for remedial activities, the timing of regulatory decisions relating to hazardous waste management projects,
changes in regulations governing the management of hazardous waste, secular changes in the waste processing industry towards
waste minimization and the propensity for delays in the demand for remedial services, and changes in the myriad of governmental
regulations governing our diverse operations. We do not control such factors and, as a result, our revenue and income can vary from
quarter to quarter, and past financial performance for certain quarters may not be a reliable indicator of future performance for
comparable quarters in subsequent years.
Additional Risks of Our Safety-Kleen Business
Fluctuations in oil prices may negatively affect our Safety-Kleen business.
A significant portion of our Safety-Kleen business involves collecting used oil from certain of our customers, re-refining a
portion of such used oil into base and blended lubricating oils, and then selling both such re-refined oil and the recycled oil, or
‘‘RFO,’’ collectively "oil products", to other customers. Changes in the reported spot market prices of oil affect the prices at
18
Table Of Contents
which we can sell our re-refined oil and RFO. If applicable rates increase or decrease, we typically will charge a higher or lower
corresponding price for our oil products. The prices at which we sell our oil products can also be affected by changes in certain
indices measuring changes in the price of heavy fuel oil, with increases and decreases in the indices typically translating into a
higher or lower price for our oil products. The cost to collect used oil, including the amounts we pay to obtain a portion of our used
oil and therefore ability to collect necessary volumes and the fuel costs of our oil collection fleet, typically also increases or
decreases when the relevant indices increase or decrease. However, even though the prices we can charge for our oil products and
the costs to collect and re-refine used oil and process RFO typically increase and decrease together, there is no assurance that when
our costs to collect and re-refine used oil and process RFO increase we will be able to increase the prices we charge for our oil
products to cover such increased costs, or that our costs to collect and re-refine used oil and process RFO will decline when the
prices we can charge for such oil products decline. These risks are exacerbated when there are rapid fluctuations in these oil
indices.
Environmental laws and regulations have adversely affected and may adversely affect Safety-Kleen's parts cleaning and
other solvent related services.
In connection with its parts cleaning and other solvent related services, Safety-Kleen has been subject to fines and certain
orders requiring it to take environmental remedial action. Safety-Kleen may also be subject to monetary fines, civil or criminal
penalties, remediation, cleanup or stop orders, injunctions, orders to cease or suspend certain practices or denial of permits required
for the operation of its facilities. The outcome of any proceeding and associated costs and expenses could have a material adverse
impact on Safety-Kleen’s financial condition and results of operations.
Recent and potential changes in environmental laws and regulations may also adversely affect future Safety-Kleen parts
cleaning and other solvent related services. Interpretation or enforcement of existing laws and regulations, or the adoption of new
laws and regulations, may require Safety-Kleen to modify or curtail its operations or replace or upgrade its facilities or equipment
at substantial cost, which we may not be able to pass on to our customers, and we may choose to indemnify our customers from any
fines or penalties they may incur as a result of these new laws and regulations. On the other hand, in some cases if new laws and
regulations are less stringent, Safety-Kleen’s customers or competitors may be able to manage waste more effectively themselves,
which could decrease the need for Safety-Kleen’s services or increase competition, which could adversely affect Safety-Kleen’s
results of operations.
Safety-Kleen is subject to existing and potential product liability lawsuits.
Safety-Kleen has been named from time to time as a defendant in product liability lawsuits in various courts and jurisdictions
throughout the United States. As of December 31, 2018, Safety-Kleen was involved in approximately 67 such proceedings
(including cases which have been settled but not formally dismissed) wherein persons claim personal injury resulting from the use
of its parts cleaning equipment or cleaning products. These proceedings typically involve allegations that the solvents used in
Safety-Kleen’s parts cleaning equipment contain contaminants or that Safety-Kleen’s recycling process does not effectively remove
the contaminants that become entrained in the solvents during their use. In addition, certain claimants assert that Safety-Kleen
failed to adequately warn the product user of potential risks, including a historic failure to warn that such solvents contain trace
amounts of toxic or hazardous substances such as benzene. Although Safety-Kleen maintains insurance that we believe will provide
coverage for these claims (over amounts accrued for self-insured retentions and deductibles in certain limited cases), this insurance
may not provide coverage for potential awards of punitive damages against Safety-Kleen. Although Safety-Kleen has vigorously
defended and will continue to vigorously defend itself and the safety of its products against all of these claims, these lawsuits are
subject to many uncertainties and outcomes cannot be predicted with assurance. Safety-Kleen may also be named in similar
additional lawsuits in the future, including claims for which insurance coverage may not be available. If any one or more of these
lawsuits were decided unfavorably against Safety-Kleen and the plaintiffs were awarded punitive damages, or if insurance coverage
were not available for any such claim, our financial condition and results of operations could be materially and adversely affected.
Additionally, if any one or more of these lawsuits were decided unfavorably against Safety-Kleen, such outcome may encourage
more lawsuits against us.
19
Table Of Contents
Safety-Kleen is dependent on third parties for manufacturing the majority of its equipment.
Safety-Kleen does not manufacture the majority of the equipment, including parts washers, that Safety-Kleen places at
customer sites. Accordingly, Safety-Kleen relies on a limited number of third-party suppliers for manufacturing this equipment. The
supply of third-party equipment could be interrupted or halted by a termination of Safety-Kleen’s relationships, a failure of quality
control or other operational problems at such suppliers or a significant decline in their financial condition. If Safety-Kleen were not
able to retain these providers or obtain its requests from them, Safety-Kleen may not be able to obtain alternate providers in a
timely manner or on economically attractive terms and, as a result, Safety-Kleen may not be able to compete successfully for new
business, complete existing engagements profitably or retain its existing customers. Additionally, if Safety-Kleen’s third-party
suppliers provide defective equipment, Safety-Kleen may be subject to reputational damage or product liability claims which may
negatively impact its reputation, financial condition and results of operations. Further, Safety-Kleen generally does not have long-
term contracts with its third-party suppliers, and as a result those suppliers may increase the price of the equipment they provide,
which may hurt Safety-Kleen’s results of operations.
Risks Relating to Our Levels of Debt and Letters of Credit
Our substantial levels of outstanding debt and letters of credit could adversely affect our financial condition and ability to
fulfill our obligations.
As of December 31, 2018, we had outstanding $845.0 million of senior unsecured notes, $742.2 million of senior secured
term loans, and $130.1 million of letters of credit. Our substantial levels of outstanding debt and letters of credit may:
•adversely impact our ability to obtain additional financing in the future for working capital, capital expenditures,
acquisitions or other general corporate purposes or to repurchase our senior unsecured notes from holders upon any
change of control;
•require us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flow to payment of interest on our debt and fees on our letters of
credit, which reduces the availability of our cash flow to fund working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and other
general corporate purposes;
•subject us to the risk of increased sensitivity to interest rate increases based upon variable interest rates, including $392.2
million of our $742.2 million senior secured term loans for which we do not currently have interest rate hedges and
borrowings (if any) under our revolving credit facility;
•increase the possibility of an event of default under the financial and operating covenants contained in our debt
instruments; and
•limit our ability to adjust to rapidly changing market conditions, reduce our ability to withstand competitive pressures and
make us more vulnerable to a downturn in general economic conditions of our business than our competitors with less
debt.
Our ability to make scheduled payments of principal or interest with respect to our debt, including our outstanding senior
unsecured notes, our secured term loans, any revolving loans and our capital leases, and to pay fee obligations with respect to our
letters of credit, will depend on our ability to generate cash and our future financial results. If we were unable to generate sufficient
cash flow from operations in the future to service our debt and letter of credit fee obligations, we might be required to refinance all
or a portion of our existing debt and letter of credit facilities or to obtain new or additional such facilities. However, we might not
be able to obtain any such new or additional facilities on favorable terms or at all.
Despite our substantial levels of outstanding debt and letters of credit, we could incur substantially more debt and letter of
credit obligations in the future.
Although our revolving credit agreement and the indentures and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt contain
restrictions on the incurrence of additional debt (including, for this purpose, reimbursement obligations under outstanding letters of
credit), these restrictions are subject to a number of qualifications and exceptions and the additional debt which we might incur in
the future in compliance with these restrictions could be substantial. In particular, we had available at December 31, 2018, up to
approximately $235.4 million for additional borrowings and letters of credit under our revolving credit facility. Our revolving credit
agreement and the indentures and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt also allow us to borrow significant amounts
of money from other sources. These restrictions also do not prevent us from incurring obligations (such as operating leases) that do
not constitute “debt” or “indebtedness” as defined in the relevant agreements. To the extent we incur in the future additional debt
and letter of credit or other obligations, the related risks would increase.
The covenants in our debt agreements restrict our ability to operate our business and might lead to a default under our
debt agreements.
20
Table Of Contents
Our revolving credit agreement and the indentures and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt limit, among
other things, our ability and the ability of our restricted subsidiaries to:
•incur or guarantee additional indebtedness (including, for this purpose, reimbursement obligations under letters of credit)
or issue preferred stock;
•pay dividends or make other distributions to our stockholders;
•purchase or redeem capital stock or subordinated indebtedness;
•make investments;
•create liens;
•incur restrictions on the ability of our restricted subsidiaries to pay dividends or make other payments to us;
•sell assets, including capital stock of our subsidiaries;
•consolidate or merge with or into other companies or transfer all or substantially all of our assets; and
•engage in transactions with affiliates.
As a result of these covenants, we may not be able to respond to changes in business and economic conditions and to obtain
additional financing, if needed, and we may be prevented from engaging in transactions that might otherwise be beneficial to us.
Our revolving credit facility requires, and our future credit facilities may require, us to maintain under certain circumstances certain
financial ratios and satisfy certain other financial condition tests. Our ability to meet these financial ratios and tests can be affected
by events beyond our control, and we may not be able to meet those tests. The breach of any of these covenants could result in a
default under our outstanding or future debt. Upon the occurrence of an event of default, the lenders could elect to declare all
amounts outstanding under such debts, including accrued interest or other obligations, to be immediately due and payable. If
amounts outstanding under such debt were accelerated, our assets might not be sufficient to repay in full that debt and our other
debt.
Our revolving credit agreement and the indentures and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt also contain
cross-default and cross-acceleration provisions. Under these provisions, a default or acceleration under one instrument governing
our debt may constitute a default under our other debt instruments that contain cross-default and cross-acceleration provisions,
which could result in the related debt and the debt under such other instruments becoming immediately due and payable. In such
event, we would need to raise funds from alternative sources, which funds might not be available to us on favorable terms, on a
timely basis or at all. Alternatively, such a default could require us to sell assets and otherwise curtail operations to pay our
creditors. The proceeds of such a sale of assets, or curtailment of operations, might not enable us to pay all of our liabilities.
Other Risks Relating to Our Common Stock
The Massachusetts Business Corporation Act and our By-Laws contain certain anti-takeover provisions.
Sections 8.06 and 7.02 of the Massachusetts Business Corporation Act provide that Massachusetts corporations which are
publicly-held must have a staggered board of directors and that written demand by holders of at least 40% of the outstanding shares
of each relevant voting group of stockholders is required for stockholders to call a special meeting unless such corporations take
certain actions to affirmatively "opt-out" of such requirements. In accordance with these provisions, our By-Laws provide for a
staggered board of directors which consists of three classes of directors of which one class is elected each year for a three-year
term, and require that written application by holders of at least 25% (which is less than the 40% which would otherwise be
applicable without such a specific provision in our By-Laws) of our outstanding shares of common stock is required for
stockholders to call a special meeting. In addition, our By-Laws prohibit the removal by the stockholders of a director except for
cause. These provisions could inhibit a takeover of our Company by restricting stockholders' action to replace the existing directors
or approve other actions which a party seeking to acquire us might propose. A takeover transaction would frequently afford
stockholders an opportunity to sell their shares at a premium over then market prices.
ITEM 1B.    UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
Not applicable.
ITEM 2.    PROPERTIES
Our principal executive offices are in Norwell, Massachusetts, where we lease approximately 151,000 square feet under
arrangements which may not expire until 2042. We also have regional administrative offices in Texas, South Carolina, and Alberta,
Canada. Our properties are sufficient and suitable for our current needs.
We have a network of more than 480 service locations across 49 states, nine Canadian provinces, Puerto Rico, and Mexico.
Those service locations include service centers, satellite locations, branches, active hazardous waste management properties,
lodging facilities and oil processing facilities. The service centers and branches are the principal sales and service
21
Table Of Contents
centers from which we provide our environmental, energy and industrial services. The active hazardous waste management
properties include incinerator facilities, commercial and non-commercial landfills, wastewater treatment facilities, treatment,
storage and disposal facilities ("TSDFs"), solvent recovery management and recycling facilities, oil accumulation centers, oil
terminals and oil re-refineries. Some of our properties offer multiple capabilities. The following sets forth certain information as of
December 31, 2018 regarding our properties.
Service Centers, Satellite Locations and Branches
We have approximately 365 service centers, satellite locations and branches throughout the United States and Canada which
serve as principal sales and service centers from which we provide parts cleaning services, containerized waste services, oil
collection services and other environmental services.
Active Hazardous Waste Management Properties
Incinerator Facilities.   We own five operating incinerator facilities that have a total of nine incinerators with 561,721 tons of
total practical capacity and an overall average utilization rate for 2018 of 86.7%. Our practical capacity is not based on a theoretical
24-hour, seven-day operation, but rather is determined as the production level at which our incinerators can operate with an
acceptable degree of efficiency, taking into consideration factors such as longer term customer demand, permanent staffing levels,
operating shifts, holidays, scheduled maintenance and mix of product. Capacity utilization is calculated by dividing actual
production pounds by practical capacity at each incinerator.
 # of IncineratorsPractical Capacity
(Tons)Utilization Rate
Year Ended
December  31, 2018
Arkansas 3 145,072 94.8%
Nebraska 1 58,808 73.8%
Utah 1 66,815 88.7%
Texas 3 165,500 82.7%
Ontario, Canada 1 125,526 87.4%
 9 561,721 86.7%
Our incinerators offer a wide range of technological capabilities to customers through this network. We provide incineration
in the United States through one fluidized bed thermal oxidation unit and three solids and liquids-capable incinerator facilities and
we operate in Canada one active hazardous waste liquid injection incinerator.
Commercial and Non-Commercial Landfills.  In the United States and Canada, we operate nine commercial landfills with
approximately 29.4 million cubic yards of remaining highly probable airspace. Seven of our commercial landfills are designed and
permitted for the disposal of hazardous wastes and two landfills are operated for nonhazardous industrial waste disposal and, to a
lesser extent, municipal solid waste. In addition to our commercial landfills, we also own and operate two non-commercial landfills
that only accept waste from our on-site incinerators. See "Landfill Accounting" within Note 2, "Significant Accounting Policies," to
our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for additional information on our commercial and non-
commercial landfills.
Wastewater Treatment Facilities. We operate a total of nine facilities, of which six are owned and three are leased, that offer a
range of wastewater treatment technologies and customer services. Wastewater treatment consists primarily of three types of
services: hazardous wastewater treatment, sludge de-watering or drying, and non-hazardous wastewater treatment.
Treatment, Storage and Disposal Facilities. We operate 18 TSDFs, of which 16 are owned and two are leased, in the United
States and Canada. Our TSDFs facilitate the movement of materials among our network of service centers and treatment and
disposal facilities. Transportation may be accomplished by truck, rail, barge or a combination of modes, with our own assets or in
conjunction with third-party transporters. Specially designed containment systems, vehicles and other equipment permitted for
hazardous and industrial waste transport, together with drivers trained in transportation and waste handling procedures, provide for
the movement of customer waste streams.
Solvent Recovery Management and Recycling Operations. We own two facilities specializing in solvent recovery
management.
22
Table Of Contents
Oil Processing, Blending and Packaging Facilities
Oil Accumulation Centers. We operate a total of nine accumulation centers, of which eight are owned and one is leased, used
for accumulating waste oil from our branches.
Oil Terminals. We operate a total of 54 oil terminals, of which 31 are owned and 23 are leased, which collect or process used
oil prior to delivery to re-refineries or distribution as RFO.
Oil Recycling and Re-refining Facilities. We own six oil re-refineries, five in the United States and one in Canada. With more
than 200 million gallons of used oil processed annually, we were able to return in 2018 192 million gallons of new re-refined oil,
lubricants and byproducts back into the marketplace.
Oil Packaging and Blending Facilities. We operate a total of five oil packaging and blending facilities, of which three are
owned and two are leased and used for blending and packaging oil from our branches.
Lodging Facilities
Lodge Operations. We operate five fixed lodges, all of which are owned and located on sites in Alberta, Canada that are
leased under long-term operating agreements.
Camps. We operate various camp facilities that can grow and shrink in size and location. Generally, we have ongoing
operations at 1-2 larger facilities that we expect to operate on a multi-year basis. Additionally, we have in our fleet that can operate
at any time, five office complexes, eight mini-camps, and approximately 35 single and double occupancy drill camps. All of our
camp facilities are owned and located on various sites throughout Western Canada. Sites for the larger facilities are generally
leased, whereas sites for our smaller facilities are generally provided by our customers.
ITEM 3.    LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
See Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for
a description of legal proceedings.
ITEM 4.    MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
23
Table Of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5.    MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Common Stock
Our common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange (the "NYSE") under the symbol CLH. On February 15, 2019,
there were 258 stockholders of record of our common stock, excluding stockholders whose shares were held in nominee, or
"street," name. On our last record date, approximately 22,975 additional stockholders beneficially held shares in street name.
We have never declared nor paid any cash dividends on our common stock, and we do not intend to pay any dividends on our
common stock in the foreseeable future. We intend to retain our future earnings, if any, for use in the operation and expansion of
our business and payment of our outstanding debt, and for our stock repurchase program. In addition, our current credit agreement
and indentures limit the amount we could pay as cash dividends on, or for repurchase of, our common stock. For additional
information surrounding our stock repurchase program, see Note 15, "Stockholder's Equity," to our consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8 of this report.
Securities Authorized For Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
See Item 12, "Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters," for a
description of the securities which are authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
PeriodTotal Number of
Shares Purchased
(1)  Average Price Paid
Per Share
 (2)  Total Number of
Shares Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced Plans or
ProgramsApproximate Dollar
Value of Shares that
May Yet Be Purchased
Under the Plans or
Programs (3)
October 1, 2018 through October 31, 2018 3,000 $ 70.89 — $ 317,571,511
November 1, 2018 through November 30, 2018 164,559 $ 65.07 162,000$ 307,027,656
December 1, 2018 through December 31, 2018 21,520 $ 59.38 16,000$ 306,072,512
Total 189,079 $ 64.52 178,000$ 306,072,512
______________________
(1)Includes 11,079 shares withheld by us from employees to satisfy employee tax obligations upon vesting of restricted
shares granted under our long-term equity incentive programs.
(2)The average price paid per share of common stock repurchased under our stock repurchase program includes commissions
paid to the brokers.
(3)Our board of directors has authorized the repurchase of up to $600 million of our common stock. We have funded and
intend to fund the repurchases through available cash resources. The stock repurchase program authorizes us to purchase
our common stock on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions periodically in a manner that complies with
applicable U.S. securities laws. The number of shares purchased and the timing of the purchases has depended and will
depend on a number of factors, including share price, cash required for business plans, trading volume and other
conditions. During April 2018, we implemented a repurchase plan in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 promulgated under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Future repurchases will be made under the Rule 10b5-1 plan as well as
open market or privately negotiated transactions as described above. We have no obligation to repurchase stock under this
program and may suspend or terminate the repurchase program at any time.
24
Table Of Contents
COMPARISON OF 5-YEAR CUMULATIVE TOTAL RETURN
AMONG CLEAN HARBORS, INC.,
NYSE COMPOSITE INDEX, S&P MIDCAP 400 INDEX, REFUSE SYSTEMS AND CUSTOM PEER GROUP
Performance Graph
The following graph compares the five-year return from investing $100 in each of our common stock, the NYSE Composite
Index, the S&P Midcap 400 Index, and indices of comparable companies compiled by CoreData, consisting of companies whose
listed line-of-business is SIC Code 4953 (refuse systems) and a custom peer group. We selected a peer group comprised of
American Water Works Company, Inc., Casella Waste Systems, Inc., Civeo Corporation, Covanta Holding Corporation, Heritage-
Crystal Clean, Inc., Iron Mountain Incorporated, Newpark Resources, Inc., Oil States International, Inc., Republic Services, Inc.,
Stericycle, Inc., Superior Energy Services, Inc., US Ecology, Inc., and Waste Management, Inc. The values illustrated assume
reinvestment of dividends on the ex-dividend date and compares relative performance since a particular starting date. In this
instance, the starting date was December 31, 2013, when our common stock closed at $59.96 per share. The graph is presented
pursuant to SEC rules and is not meant to be an indication of our future performance.
25
Table Of Contents
ITEM 6.    SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
The following summary of consolidated financial information has been derived from the audited consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8, "Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report and in the annual reports we
previously filed with the SEC. This information should be reviewed in conjunction with Item 7, "Management's Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations," and the financial statements and notes thereto included in Item 8,
"Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report.
 For the Year Ended December 31,
(in thousands except per share amounts) 2018 2017  2016  2015 2014
Statement of Operations Data:        
Total revenues $3,300,303$2,944,978 $2,755,226 $3,275,137$3,401,636
Net income (loss) (1) $ 65,636$100,739 $(39,873) $ 44,102$(28,328)
Earnings (loss) per share: (1)     
     Basic $ 1.17$ 1.77 $ (0.69) $ 0.76$ (0.47)
     Diluted $ 1.16$ 1.76 $ (0.69) $ 0.76$ (0.47)
Other Financial Data:        
Adjusted EBITDA (2) $491,005$425,657 $400,354 $504,167$521,919
 At December 31,
(in thousands) 2018 2017  2016  2015 2014
Balance Sheet Data:        
Total assets $3,738,321$3,706,570 $3,681,920 $3,431,428$3,689,423
Long-term obligations (including current portion) 1,572,556 1,629,537 1,633,272 1,382,543 1,380,681
Stockholders' equity 1,169,756 1,188,202 1,084,241 1,096,282 1,262,871
___________________________________________
(1)The 2018 results include a $2.5 million pre-tax loss on early extinguishment of debt. The 2017 results include a net benefit
of $93.0 million resulting from impacts of the tax law changes enacted in December of 2017, a $7.9 million pre-tax loss on
early extinguishment of debt and a $30.7 million pre-tax gain on the sale of a non-core line of business within our
Environmental Services segment. The 2016 results include a $34.0 million goodwill impairment charge and a $16.9
million pre-tax gain on the sale of a non-core line of business within our Environmental Services segment. The 2015
results include a $32.0 million goodwill impairment charge in our Environmental Services segment, and the 2014 results
include a $123.4 million goodwill impairment charge in our Kleen Performance Products reporting unit. In 2016, we did
not record any income tax benefit as a result of the goodwill impairment charge. In 2015 and 2014, we recorded income
tax benefits of $2.0 million and $2.7 million, respectively, as a result of the goodwill impairment charges.
(2)The following is a reconciliation of net income (loss) to Adjusted EBITDA for the following periods (in thousands). See
additional information regarding this non-GAAP measure under the heading "Adjusted EBITDA" in Item 7,
"Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations," of this report.
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018  2017  2016  2015 2014
Net income (loss) $ 65,636 $100,739 $(39,873) $ 44,102$(28,328)
Accretion of environmental liabilities 9,806 9,460 10,177 10,402 10,612
Depreciation and amortization 298,625 288,422 287,002 274,194 276,083
Goodwill impairment charges — — 34,013 31,992 123,414
Other expense (income), net 4,510 6,119 (6,195) 1,380 (4,380)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 2,488 7,891 — — —
Gain on sale of businesses — (30,732) (16,884) — —
Interest expense, net 81,094 85,808 83,525 76,553 77,668
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 28,846 (42,050) 48,589 65,544 66,850
Adjusted EBITDA $491,005 $425,657 $400,354 $504,167$521,919
26
Table Of Contents
ITEM 7.    MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
Overview
We are North America’s leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services. We believe we operate, in the
aggregate, the largest number of hazardous waste incinerators, landfills and treatment, storage and disposal facilities ("TSDFs") in
North America. We serve a diverse customer base, including Fortune 500 companies, across the chemical, energy, manufacturing
and additional markets, as well as numerous government agencies. These customers rely on us to deliver a broad range of services
including but not limited to end-to-end hazardous waste management, emergency response, industrial cleaning and maintenance,
and recycling services. We are also the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil in the world and the largest provider of parts
cleaning and related environmental services to commercial, industrial and automotive customers in North America.
During the first quarter of fiscal year 2018, certain of our businesses undertook a reorganization which included changes to
the underlying business and management structures. The reorganization resulted in combining the Environmental Services
businesses from an operational and management perspective, deepening customer relationships and allowing for efficiencies across
our operations through the sharing of resources, namely labor and equipment, which will reduce third party spending and promote
cross selling of our business offerings. In connection with this reorganization, our chief operating decision maker requested changes
in the information that he regularly reviews for purposes of allocating resources and assessing performance. These changes required
a reconsideration of our operating segments in the first quarter of 2018 and resulted in a change in our assessment of our operating
segments. We concluded that there are now two operating segments for disclosure purposes; (i) the Environmental Services
segment which consists of our historical Technical Services, Industrial Services, Field Services and Oil, Gas and Lodging
businesses, and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment.
Performance of our segments is evaluated on several factors of which the primary financial measure is Adjusted EBITDA as
described more fully below. The following is a discussion of how management evaluates its segments in regards to other factors
including key performance indicators that management uses to assess the segments’ results, as well as certain macroeconomic
trends and influences that impact each reportable segment:
•Environmental Services - Environmental Services segment results are predicated upon the demand by our customers
for waste services directly attributable to waste volumes generated by them and project work for which waste
handling and/or disposal is required. In managing the business and evaluating performance, management tracks the
volumes and average price of waste handled and disposed of through our owned incinerators and landfills, as well as
utilization of such incinerators, labor and billable hours and equipment among other key metrics. Levels of activity
and ultimate performance associated with this segment can be impacted by several factors including overall U.S. GDP
and U.S. industrial production, weather conditions, efficiency of our operations, competition and market pricing of
our services and the management of our related operating costs. Environmental Services results are also impacted by
the demand for planned and unplanned industrial related cleaning and maintenance services at customer sites and for
environmental cleanup services on a scheduled or emergency basis, including response to national events such as
major oil spills, natural disasters or other events where immediate and specialized services are required.
•Safety-Kleen - Safety-Kleen segment results are impacted by an array of core service offerings that serve to attract
small quantity waste producers as customers and integrate them into the Clean Harbors waste network. Core service
offerings include parts washer services, containerized waste services, vac services, used motor oil collection and sale
of base and blended oil products as well as complementary products including automotive related fluids and shop
supplies. Key performance indicators tracked by management relative to these services include the number of parts
washer services performed and used motor oil and waste volumes collected. Results from these services are primarily
driven by the overall number of parts washers placed at customer sites and volumes of waste collected. These factors
can be impacted by overall economic conditions in the marketplace, especially in the automotive related area. Safety-
Kleen offers high quality base and blended oil products to end users including fleet customers, distributors and
manufacturers of oil products. Relative to these oil related products, management tracks the Company's volumes and
relative percentages of base and blended oil sales along with various pricing metrics associated with the commodity
driven marketplace. The segment's results are significantly impacted by the overall market pricing and product mix
associated with base and blended oil products and, more specifically, the market prices of Group II base oils, which
historically have correlated with overall crude oil prices. Costs incurred in connection with the collection of used oils
and other raw materials associated with the segment’s oil related products can also be volatile. The implementation of
our OilPlus® closed
27
Table Of Contents
loop initiative resulting in the sale of our renewable oil products directly to our end customers will also impact future
operating results.
Highlights
Total revenues for 2018 increased 12.1% to $3.3 billion, compared with $2.9 billion in 2017. Our Environmental Services
segment increased direct revenues $283.7 million in 2018 compared with 2017 due to incremental revenues resulting from our
recent acquisitions, primarily the Veolia Business in the first quarter of 2018, as well as improved average pricing driven by a more
profitable mix of waste streams handled by the business. Direct revenues recorded by Safety-Kleen increased $73.4 million in 2018
as compared to 2017 as a result of improved pricing conditions related to our renewable oil products and continued growth across
Safety-Kleen’s core service offerings and our direct lubricant sales. The fluctuation of the Canadian dollar minimally impacted our
consolidated revenues in 2018 as compared to 2017.
Income from operations in 2018 was $182.6 million, compared with $127.8 million in 2017. We reported net income in 2018
and 2017 of $65.6 million and $100.7 million, respectively. Net income in 2017 included a $93.0 million net benefit recorded as a
component of income tax expense which resulted from impacts of tax reform law changes which were signed into law in December
2017. Adjusted EBITDA, which is the primary financial measure by which our segments are evaluated, increased 15.4% to $491.0
million in 2018 from $425.7 million in 2017. The increased level of Adjusted EBITDA in 2018 was primarily attributable to higher
revenue amounts as described above, which provided improved operating margins from leveraging our existing infrastructure
network and additional benefits from the reorganization undertaken in the Environmental Services segment which occurred in the
first quarter of 2018. Additional information regarding Adjusted EBITDA, which is a non-GAAP measure, including a
reconciliation of Adjusted EBITDA to net income (loss), appears below under "Adjusted EBITDA."
Net cash from operating activities for 2018 was $373.2 million, an increase of $87.5 million from 2017. Adjusted free cash
flow, which management uses to measure our financial strength and ability to generate cash, was $195.3 million in 2018, which
represented a $55.1 million increase over 2017 primarily due to greater levels of operating income, lower interest payments and a
reduction in environmental expenditures, offset by higher working capital levels and capital spending. Additional information
regarding adjusted free cash flow, which is a non-GAAP measure, including a reconciliation of adjusted free cash flow to net cash
from operating activities, appears below under "Adjusted Free Cash Flow."
28
Table Of Contents
Segment Performance
The primary financial measure by which we evaluate the performance of our segments is Adjusted EBITDA. The following
table sets forth certain financial information associated with our results of operations for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017
and 2016.
 Summary of Operations (in thousands)
 Year Ended December  31,  2018 over  2017 2017 over  2016
 2018 2017  2016  $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Direct Revenues(1):          
Environmental Services $2,141,194 $1,857,474  $1,758,833  $283,720 15.3 % $98,641 5.6 %
Safety-Kleen 1,161,282 1,087,886  996,083  73,396 6.7 91,803 9.2
Corporate Items (2,173 ) (382) 310  (1,791 ) N/M (692) N/M
Total 3,300,303 2,944,978  2,755,226  355,325 12.1 189,752 6.9
Cost of Revenues(2):          
Environmental Services 1,576,705 1,373,789  1,287,629  202,916 14.8 86,160 6.7
Safety-Kleen 725,734 690,344  645,275  35,390 5.1 45,069 7.0
Corporate Items 3,112 (1,460 ) (47) 4,572 N/M (1,413 ) N/M
Total 2,305,551 2,062,673  1,932,857  242,878 11.8 129,816 6.7
Selling, General and
Administrative Expenses:          
Environmental Services 183,633 162,375  152,129  21,258 13.1 10,246 6.7
Safety-Kleen 153,519 147,731  131,262  5,788 3.9 16,469 12.5
Corporate Items 166,595 146,542  138,624  20,053 13.7 7,918 5.7
Total 503,747 456,648  422,015  47,099 10.3 34,633 8.2
Adjusted EBITDA          
Environmental Services 380,856 321,310  319,075  59,546 18.5 2,235 0.7
Safety-Kleen 282,029 249,81 1 219,546  32,218 12.9 30,265 13.8
Corporate Items (171,880 ) (145,464 ) (138,267 ) (26,416 ) (18.2 ) (7,197 ) (5.2)
Total $491,005 $425,657  $400,354  $ 65,348 15.4 % $25,303 6.3 %
___________________________________
N/M = not meaningful
(1)Direct revenue is revenue allocated to the segment performing the provided service.
(2)Cost of revenue is shown exclusive of items presented separately on the statements of operations, which consist of
(i) accretion of environmental liabilities and (ii) depreciation and amortization.
Direct Revenues
There are many factors which have impacted and continue to impact our revenues. These factors include, but are not limited
to: overall industrial activity and growth in North America, existence or non-existence of large scale environmental waste and
remediation projects, competitive industry pricing, impacts of acquisitions and divestitures, the level of emergency response
projects, general conditions of the energy related industries, base and blended oil pricing, market changes relative to the collection
of used oil, the number of parts washers placed at customer sites and foreign currency translation. In addition, customer efforts to
minimalize hazardous waste and changes in regulation can also impact our revenues.
Environmental Services
 For the years ended December  31, 2018 over  2017  2017 over  2016
 2018  2017 2016$
Change%
Change  $
Change%
Change
Direct revenues $2,141,194 $1,857,474$1,758,833$283,720 15.3% $ 98,641 5.6%
Environmental Services direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $283.7 million from the comparable
period in 2017. Included in the current year revenues was $154.0 million of direct revenues from the Veolia
29
Table Of Contents
Business, which we acquired on February 23, 2018. Excluding the impacts from the Veolia Business, Environmental Services direct
revenue increased $129.5 million primarily due to greater levels of activity at our sales and service branches and increased levels of
disposal related revenues from improved pricing conditions and mix associated with waste streams at our incinerators in 2018. For
the year ended December 31, 2018, landfill volumes increased slightly as compared to 2017. The utilization rate at our incinerator
facilities was 86.7% for the year ended December 31, 2018, as compared to 87.6% for the year ended December 31, 2017. The
decrease in utilization rates in 2018 was impacted by a slightly higher number of down days at our facilities during 2018; however,
impacts on the profitability of the business from an increase in down days was more than offset by improved pricing conditions and
an increase in volumes of higher margin waste streams received in 2018. The impact of foreign currency translation on our
Canadian operations within the Environmental Services segment was minimal in the year ended December 31, 2018 as compared to
2017.
Environmental Services direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $98.6 million from the comparable
period in 2016. Excluding the impacts from divestiture and acquisition activity having occurred in 2016 and 2017, Environmental
Services revenues increased $142.1 million from the comparable period in 2016 primarily due to greater levels of activity at our
sales and service branches, increased revenues associated with waste projects and higher waste volumes disposed of in our
incinerators and landfills from improving economic conditions and business initiatives focused on waste volumes. For the year
ended December 31, 2017, landfill volumes increased 12.1% from the comparable period in 2016. The utilization rate at our
incinerators was 87.6% on a practical capacity of 561,721 tons for the year ended December 31, 2017, compared with 88.8% on a
practical capacity of 491,721 tons in 2016. The increase in practical capacity was the result of the start-up of our waste incinerator
at our El Dorado, Arkansas facility, which came online in the first quarter of 2017 and added 70,000 tons of capacity to our
network. Inclusive in the year-over-year changes within this segment was also the positive impact of foreign currency translation on
our Canadian operations of approximately $8.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2017 from the comparable period in 2016.
Safety-Kleen
 For the years ended December  31,  2018 over  2017  2017 over  2016
 2018  2017  2016  $
Change%
Change  $
Change%
Change
Direct revenues $1,161,282 $1,087,886 $996,083 $ 73,396 6.7% $ 91,803 9.2%
Safety-Kleen direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $73.4 million from the comparable period
in 2017 primarily due to more favorable pricing on oil products and growth in the business’ core service offerings. Revenues
generated through our core service offerings such as handling of containerized waste and vac services, parts washer services as well
as sales of automotive and industrial cleaning products accounted for $21.3 million of incremental revenues. Increased base and
blended volumes and oil pricing accounted for $34.7 million of incremental direct revenue from the comparable period in 2017.
Sales of contract packaging and blending services, specialty refinery products and recycled fuel oil also increased by $38.9 million
from the comparable period in 2017. These increases were partially offset by a decrease in used motor oil collection revenues of
$19.5 million as market pricing for these services was negatively impacted as crude oil prices generally rose throughout the earlier
parts of 2018. The impact of foreign currency translation on our Canadian operations within the Safety-Kleen segment was minimal
in the year ended December 31, 2018 as compared to 2017.
Safety-Kleen direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $91.8 million from the comparable period in
2016. This increase was derived from more favorable pricing on oil products, incremental revenues from acquisitions and growth in
the business. Increased base and blended oil pricing and volumes accounted for $87.2 million of incremental direct revenue from
the comparable period in 2016. This increase was partially offset by lower revenue of $15.6 million from a decrease in prices
charged for used motor oil collection in 2017. Inclusive in the year-over-year changes within the Safety-Kleen segment was also the
positive impact of foreign currency translation on our Canadian operations of approximately $2.8 million in the year ended
December 31, 2017 from the comparable period in 2016.
Cost of Revenues
We believe that our ability to manage operating costs is important to our ability to remain price competitive. We continue to
upgrade the quality and efficiency of our services through the development of new technology and continued modifications at our
facilities, invest in new business opportunities and aggressively implement strategic sourcing and logistics solutions as well as
other cost reduction initiatives while also continuing to optimize our management and operating structure in an effort to maintain
and increase operating margins.
30
Table Of Contents
Environmental Services
 For the years ended December  31, 2018 over  2017 2017 over  2016
 2018 2017  2016$
Change  %
Change$
Change  %
Change
Cost of revenues $1,576,705 $1,373,789 $1,287,629 $202,916 14.8 %$86,160 6.7%
As a % of Direct
Revenue 73.6% 74.0% 73.2%  (0.4)%  0.8%
Environmental Services cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $202.9 million from the
comparable period in 2017. The acquired Veolia Business had cost of revenues of $131.2 million in the year ended December 31,
2018. Excluding these costs, Environmental Services cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $71.7
million primarily due to increases in labor related costs of $45.4 million, transportation, disposal and fuel costs of $16.2 million and
equipment, supply and various other expenses of $10.0 million. The incremental operating costs were commensurate with greater
activity levels in 2018 and overall inflationary pressure across several cost categories including certain commodity supplies such as
fuel and other supplies. Costs as a percentage of direct revenues decreased slightly over the comparable period of 2017, which can
be attributed to a more favorable mix of waste streams in our incineration network which increased profitability.
Environmental Services cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $86.2 million from the comparable
period in 2016. Excluding the impacts from divestitures, Environmental Services cost of revenues for the year ended December 31,
2017 increased $133.0 million from the comparable period in 2016 primarily due to increases in labor and subcontractor related
costs of $59.9 million, equipment and supply costs of $46.6 million, and transportation, disposal and fuel costs of $28.4 million,
partially offset by $1.9 million of reductions across various expense categories. The incremental operating costs were primarily
driven by the El Dorado incinerator which came online in early 2017 and its relevant start-up activities, higher down days across
our network associated with the hurricanes that impacted the gulf region of the U.S. in 2017 and overall increased economic
activity. The higher concentration of lower margin waste in our incineration network decreased profitability as we focused on
driving network utilization in response to the increased capacity. Continued pricing pressures felt in 2017 in the industries in which
we operate and integration costs also contributed to the increase in cost of revenues as a percentage of direct revenue from the
comparable period in 2016.
Safety-Kleen
 For the years ended December  31, 2018 over  2017  2017 over  2016
 2018  2017  2016$
Change  %
Change  $
Change  %
Change
Cost of revenues $725,734 $690,344 $645,275 $35,390 5.1 % $45,069 7.0 %
As a % of Direct Revenue 62.5% 63.5% 64.8%  (1.0)%  (1.3)%
Safety-Kleen cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $35.4 million from the comparable period in
2017 primarily due to increased costs of raw materials associated with oil products of $15.8 million, increased transportation,
disposal and fuel costs of $12.3 million and labor related costs of $6.3 million. These increases were in line with the overall growth
of the business and increased costs of commodities. Our costs as a percentage of direct revenues decreased over the comparable
period of 2017 due to our effective management of the spread between used oil input costs and base oil pricing, as well as the
implementation of new pricing strategies, which generated greater levels of direct revenue.
Safety-Kleen cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $45.1 million from the comparable period in
2016 primarily due to increased equipment and supply costs of $19.0 million, increased labor related costs of $13.8 million and
increased transportation, disposal and fuel costs of $8.3 million. As a percentage of direct revenue, these costs decreased 1.3% in
the year ended December 31, 2017 from the comparable period in 2016 primarily as a result of greater direct revenue levels driven
by pricing partially offset by higher maintenance costs in the re-refinery network.
Selling, General and Administrative Expenses
We strive to manage our selling, general and administrative expenses commensurate with the overall performance of our
segments and corresponding revenue levels. We believe that our ability to properly align these costs with business performance is
reflective of our strong management of the businesses and further promotes our ability to remain competitive in the marketplace.
31
Table Of Contents
Environmental Services
 For the years ended December  31,  2018 over  2017  2017 over  2016
 2018 2017  2016  $
Change  %
Change  $
Change  %
Change
SG&A $183,633 $162,375 $152,129 $21,258 13.1 % $10,246 6.7%
As a % of Direct Revenue 8.6% 8.7% 8.6%  (0.1)%  0.1%
Environmental Services selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $21.3
million from the comparable period in 2017 due to increases in salary, benefits and variable compensation related costs of $14.7
million and bad debt expense of $7.0 million, partially offset by cost reductions across various expense categories. The increases in
salary, benefits and variable compensation are in line with the growth of the business in 2018 as compared to 2017. As a percentage
of direct revenue, our costs remained consistent for the year ended December 31, 2018 as compared to 2017.
Environmental Services selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $10.2
million from the comparable period in 2016. Excluding costs associated with divestitures impacting the comparability of these
fiscal years, Environmental Services selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased
$13.4 million primarily due to increased labor related costs including increased variable compensation and commissions. These
increases were consistent with the growth of the business during 2017 as compared to 2016. As a percentage of direct revenue,
these costs remained consistent for the year ended December 31, 2017 as compared to 2016.
Safety-Kleen
 For the years ended December  31, 2018 over  2017  2017 over  2016
 2018 2017  2016$
Change%
Change  $
Change  %
Change
SG&A $153,519 $147,731 $131,262 $ 5,788 3.9 % $16,469 12.5%
As a % of Direct Revenue 13.2% 13.6% 13.2% (0.4)%   0.4%
Safety-Kleen selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $5.8 million from
the comparable period in 2017 primarily due to increased salaries, benefits and variable compensation of $5.7 million as we
continue to grow the business. As a percentage of direct revenue, Safety-Kleen SG&A costs decreased for the year ended
December 31, 2018 as compared to 2017 as the additional direct revenues outpaced incremental SG&A costs.
Safety-Kleen selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $16.5 million
from the comparable period in 2016 primarily due to increased labor related costs of $11.6 million, and an additional $4.9 million
related to costs generated from strategic initiatives in the areas of the OilPlus® closed loop initiative and centralization activities
associated with this segment. As a percentage of direct revenue, our costs remained consistent for the year ended December 31,
2017 as compared to 2016.
Corporate Items
 For the years ended December  31,  2018 over  2017  2017 over  2016
 2018 2017  2016  $
Change  %
Change  $
Change%
Change
SG&A $166,595$146,542 $138,624 $20,053 13.7% $ 7,918 5.7%
Corporate Items selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $20.1 million
from the comparable period in 2017 primarily due to increased salaries and benefits resulting from continued commitments to
investing in our employees and variable compensation totaling $14.8 million as well as increased stock-based compensation of $4.3
million primarily attributable to the achievement of performance metrics associated with performance based awards in 2018.
Incremental costs associated with the acquired Veolia Business also contributed to the increased costs.
Corporate Items selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2017 increased $7.9 million
from the comparable period in 2016 primarily due to an increase in variable compensation of $7.4 million and stock-based
compensation of $3.4 million attributable to greater revenue and earnings results in 2017, partially offset by a reduction in
severance costs of $3.5 million.
32
Table Of Contents
Adjusted EBITDA
Management considers Adjusted EBITDA to be a measurement of performance which provides useful information to both
management and investors. Adjusted EBITDA should not be considered an alternative to net income (loss) or other measurements
under generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Adjusted EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies and,
therefore our measurements of Adjusted EBITDA, while defined consistently and in accordance with our existing credit agreement,
may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies.
We use Adjusted EBITDA to enhance our understanding of our operating performance, which represents our views
concerning our performance in the ordinary, ongoing and customary course of our operations. We historically have found it helpful,
and believe that investors have found it helpful, to consider an operating measure that excludes certain expenses relating to
transactions not reflective of our core operations.
The information about our operating performance provided by this financial measure is used by our management for a variety
of purposes. We regularly communicate Adjusted EBITDA results to our lenders since our loan covenants are based upon levels of
Adjusted EBITDA achieved and to our board of directors and we discuss with the board our interpretation of such results. We also
compare our Adjusted EBITDA performance against internal targets as a key factor in determining cash and equity bonus
compensation for executives and other employees, largely because we believe that this measure is indicative of how the
fundamental business is performing and is being managed.
We also provide information relating to our Adjusted EBITDA so that analysts, investors and other interested persons have the
same data that we use to assess our core operating performance. We believe that Adjusted EBITDA should be viewed only as a
supplement to the GAAP financial information. We also believe, however, that providing this information in addition to, and
together with, GAAP financial information permits the foregoing persons to obtain a better understanding of our core operating
performance and to evaluate the efficacy of the methodology and information used by management to evaluate and measure such
performance on a standalone and a comparative basis.
The following is a reconciliation of net income (loss) to Adjusted EBITDA for the following periods (in thousands):
 Year Ended December 31,
 2018  2017  2016
Net income (loss) $ 65,636 $ 100,739 $ (39,873)
Accretion of environmental liabilities 9,806 9,460 10,177
Depreciation and amortization 298,625 288,422 287,002
Goodwill impairment charge — — 34,013
Other expense (income), net 4,510 6,119 (6,195)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 2,488 7,891 —
Gain on sale of businesses — (30,732) (16,884)
Interest expense, net 81,094 85,808 83,525
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 28,846 (42,050) 48,589
Adjusted EBITDA $ 491,005 $ 425,657 $ 400,354
Depreciation and Amortization
 Year Ended December 31, 2018 over 2017  2017 over 2016
(in thousands) 2018  2017 2016 $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Depreciation of fixed assets and
landfill amortization $264,254 $251,403$246,960$12,851 5.1 % $4,443 1.8 %
Permits and other intangibles
amortization 34,371 37,019 40,042 (2,648) (7.2)% (3,023) (7.5)%
Total depreciation and
amortization $298,625 $288,422$287,002$10,203 3.5 % $1,420 0.5 %
Depreciation and amortization for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $10.2 million from the comparable period in
2017, primarily due to incremental depreciation from acquisitions and a slight increase in volumes at our landfills that drove higher
landfill amortization. Depreciation and amortization for the year ended December 31, 2017 remained consistent with the
comparable period in 2016.
33
Table Of Contents
Goodwill impairment charge
 Year Ended December 31, 2018 over 2017 2017 over 2016
(in thousands) 2018  2017 2016 $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Goodwill impairment charge $ — $ — $34,013$ — —%$(34,013) (100.0)%
During the year ended December 31, 2016, we recorded a $34.0 million goodwill impairment charge in our Lodging Services
line of business. Information regarding our 2016 goodwill impairment charge was disclosed in prior years' annual reports on Form
10-K.
Other (Expense) Income, net
 Year Ended December 31, 2018 over 2017  2017 over 2016
(in thousands) 2018  2017  2016 $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Other (expense) income, net $ (4,510) $ (6,119) $ 6,195$ 1,609 (26.3)% $(12,314) (198.8)%
For the year ended December 31, 2018, other (expense) income, net decreased $1.6 million from the comparable period in
2017 primarily due to smaller losses recognized on sales or disposals of fixed assets in 2018. Other (expense) income, net
decreased $12.3 million from 2016 to 2017 primarily due to losses recognized on sales or disposals of fixed assets in 2017
compared to gains recognized on sales or disposals of fixed assets in 2016.
Loss on early extinguishment of debt
 Year Ended December 31, 2018 over 2017 2017 over 2016
(in thousands) 2018 2017 2016 $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Loss on early extinguishment of
debt $ (2,488)$ (7,891)$ — $ 5,403 (68.5)%$ (7,891) 100.0%
During the year ended December 31, 2018, we recorded a $2.5 million loss in connection with the extinguishment of the
remaining $400.0 million previously outstanding senior unsecured notes which were refinanced in connection with the Incremental
Facility Amendment to our Term Loan Agreement completed during the third quarter of 2018. During the year ended December 31,
2017, we recorded a $7.9 million loss on early extinguishment of debt in connection with the extinguishment of the $400.0 million
previously outstanding senior unsecured notes which were refinanced in connection with the issuance of $400.0 million Term Loan
Agreement which was completed in the second quarter of 2017. The losses consisted of amounts paid in excess of par in order to
extinguish the debt prior to maturity and non-cash expenses related to the write-off of unamortized financing costs. For additional
information regarding our financing arrangements, see Note 12, "Financing Arrangements," under Item 8, "Financial Statements
and Supplementary Data," of this report.
Gain on sale of businesses
 Year Ended December 31,  2018 over 2017 2017 over 2016
 2018  2017  2016  $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Gain on sale of businesses $ — $30,732 $16,884 $(30,732) (100)%$13,848 82%
During the year ended December 31, 2017, we recorded a $30.7 million gain on the sale of our Transformer Services
business. During the year ended December 31, 2016, we recorded a $16.9 million gain on the sale of our Catalyst Services
business. For additional information regarding these gains on sale of businesses, see Note 5, "Disposition of Businesses," under
Item 8, "Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report.
Provision (benefit) for Income Taxes
 Year Ended December 31,  2018 over 2017 2017 over 2016
(in thousands) 2018  2017 2016  $ Change % Change $ Change % Change
Provision (benefit) for income
taxes $28,846 $(42,050)$48,589 $70,896 (168.6)%$(90,639) (186.5)%
Provision (benefit) for income taxes for fiscal years 2018, 2017 and 2016 was $28.8 million, $(42.1) million, and $48.6
million, respectively. The effective tax rate for 2018 was 30.5% and was impacted by the overall reduced federal tax rates
34
Table Of Contents
enacted in 2018 under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the "Tax Act") signed into law in December 2017, the recognition of valuation
allowances on certain Canadian operations and offset in the current year by tax benefits resulting from amended prior year tax
return filings. The income tax benefit in 2017 was primarily driven by impacts from the enactment of the Tax Act in 2017. Impacts
of the Tax Act resulted in a net benefit of $93.0 million being recorded in 2017. See Note 13, "Income Taxes," under Item 8,
"Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report for more information related to the Tax Act and its impacts.
Excluding the impacts of the Tax Act, a provision of $51.0 million would have been recognized, yielding an effective tax rate of
86.8% in 2017.
The mix of U.S. and Canadian taxable income and losses in recent years, combined largely with the impacts of valuation
allowances being recorded relative to taxable losses generated in certain Canadian jurisdictions has had significant impacts on the
recorded income tax expense amounts and has caused such amounts and resulting effective tax rates to represent significant
variations from more customary relationships between pre-tax income and the provision for income taxes. In 2018, the Company
recognized a $10.7 million valuation allowance from Canadian losses. Aside from the impact of the Tax Act, the variation from a
more customary effective tax rate in 2017 was primarily related to a $14.5 million valuation allowance recorded relative to net
operating loss carryforwards generated by certain Canadian subsidiaries in 2017 and the impacts of recording $3.7 million of
unrecognized tax benefits associated with current and prior years' tax positions taken. Variations from a more customary effective
tax rate in 2016 was primarily due to the recognition of a $12.9 million valuation allowance related to net operating loss
carryforwards generated by certain Canadian subsidiaries in 2016, as well as an additional $9.7 million valuation allowance
recorded as a result of a change in the likelihood of realizing a benefit from foreign tax credits and other net deferred tax assets.
Additionally, the $34.0 million goodwill impairment charge in our Lodging Services line of business recorded in 2016 was a non-
deductible tax item, and therefore no tax benefit was recorded on that loss and further caused the 2016 effective tax rate to vary
from a more typical relationship between income before taxes and the recorded provision for income taxes.
Liquidity and Capital Resources    
 For the years ended December 31,
(in thousands) 2018  2017  2016
Net cash from operating activities $ 373,210 $ 285,698 $ 259,624
Net cash used in investing activities (349,659) (203,267) (361,777)
Net cash (used in) from financing activities (110,997) (72,760) 220,235
Net cash from operating activities
Net cash from operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $373.2 million, an increase of $87.5 million
compared to net cash from operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2017. The increase in operating cash flows as
compared to the comparable period of 2017 was most directly attributable to greater levels of operating income, lower interest
payments and a reduction in environmental expenditures, which was offset by higher working capital levels due to overall growth
in our business.
Net cash from operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $285.7 million, an increase of $26.1 million
compared to net cash from operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2016. The change primarily resulted from higher
income levels generated during the year ended December 31, 2017 and the impacts of changes in net working capital related to
increases in cash flows from other current assets, partially offset by an increase in accounts receivable and unbilled accounts
receivable as a result of increased incremental revenues during the year ended December 31, 2017.
Net cash used in investing activities
Net cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $349.7 million, an increase of $146.4 million
compared to cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2017. The change was primarily driven by the 2018
use of cash to fund acquisitions, increased capital expenditure levels net of proceeds primarily related to sales of manufacturing
assets in Western Canada, a reduction in net purchases of marketable securities and the lack in 2018 of proceeds from sale of a
business, which occurred in 2017 with the Transformer Services divestiture.
Net cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $203.3 million, a decrease of $158.5 million
compared to cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2016. The change was primarily driven
by a decrease in cash paid for acquisitions in 2017, proceeds from the sale of the Transformer Services business and a decrease in
capital expenditures, which were greater during 2016 due to the construction of our hazardous waste incinerator at our El Dorado,
Arkansas facility, which came online in the first quarter of 2017. The decrease in cash used in investing activities was partially
offset by cash used to purchase highly liquid marketable securities during the year ended December 31, 2017.
35
Table Of Contents
Net cash (used in) from financing activities
Net cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $111.0 million, an increase of $38.2 million
compared to cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2017. The primary reason for the increase in
financing cash outflows in 2018 was the net pay down of debt obligations totaling $55.8 million which occurred during the year.
Offsetting this increase was decreased outflows related to stock repurchases of $3.9 million, premiums paid on the extinguishment
of debt of $4.8 million, and changes in uncashed checks of $5.8 million.
Net cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2017 was $72.8 million, a decrease of $293.0 million
compared to cash from financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2016. The change was primarily due to the
issuance in March 2016 of $250.0 million in additional aggregate principal amount of 5.125% senior unsecured notes due 2021.
During the year ended December 31, 2017, there were no net proceeds from issuance of debt as we entered into a $400.0
million senior secured term loan agreement and used the proceeds to purchase approximately $400.0 million aggregate
principal amount of our previously outstanding 5.25% senior unsecured notes due 2020. In addition, during the year ended
December 31, 2017, we increased repurchases of our common stock from $22.2 million in 2016 to $49.0 million in 2017.
Adjusted Free Cash Flow
Management considers adjusted free cash flow to be a measurement of liquidity which provides useful information to both
management, creditors and investors about our financial strength and our ability to generate cash. Additionally, adjusted free cash
flow is a metric on which a portion of management incentive compensation is based. We define adjusted free cash flow as net cash
from operating activities excluding cash impacts of items derived from non-operating activities, such as taxes paid in connection
with divestitures, less additions to property, plant and equipment plus proceeds from sales or disposals of fixed assets. Adjusted free
cash flow should not be considered an alternative to net cash from operating activities or other measurements under GAAP.
Adjusted free cash flow is not calculated identically by all companies, and therefore our measurements of adjusted free cash flow
may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies.
The following is a reconciliation from net cash from operating activities to adjusted free cash flow for the following periods
(in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2018 2017
Net cash from operating activities $ 373,210$ 285,698
Additions to property, plant and equipment (193,344) (167,007)
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets 15,445 7,124
Tax liability on sale of business — 14,423
Adjusted free cash flow $ 195,311$ 140,238
Working Capital
At December 31, 2018, cash and cash equivalents and marketable securities totaled $279.4 million, compared to $357.6
million at December 31, 2017. At December 31, 2018, cash and cash equivalents held by foreign subsidiaries totaled $84.7 million
and were readily convertible into other currencies including U.S. dollars. At December 31, 2018, the cash and cash equivalents and
marketable securities balance for our U.S. operations was $194.7 million, and our U.S. operations had net operating cash flows of
$309.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2018. Additionally, we have a $400.0 million revolving credit facility, of which
approximately $235.4 million was available to borrow at December 31, 2018. Based on the above and our current plans, we believe
that our operations have adequate financial resources to satisfy their current liquidity needs.
We assess our liquidity in terms of our ability to generate cash to fund our operating, investing, and financing activities. Our
primary ongoing cash requirements will be to fund operations, capital expenditures, interest payments and investments in line with
our business strategy. We believe our future operating cash flows will be sufficient to meet our future operating and internal
investing cash needs as well as any cash needs relating to our stock repurchase program. Furthermore, our existing cash balance
and the availability of additional borrowings under our revolving credit facility provide additional potential sources of liquidity
should they be required.
Financing Arrangements
The financing arrangements and principal terms of our $845.0 million principal amount of 5.125% senior unsecured notes
due 2021 and $742.2 million senior secured notes due 2024 which were outstanding at December 31, 2018, and our
36
Table Of Contents
$400.0 million revolving credit facility, are discussed further in Note 12, “Financing Arrangements,” to our consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8 of this report.
As of December 31, 2018, we were in compliance with the covenants of all of our debt agreements, and we believe we will
continue to meet such covenants.
As discussed in Note 12, “Financing Arrangements,” to our consolidated financial statements, we refinanced during 2018 our
debt portfolio whereby the $400.0 million of previously outstanding 5.25% senior unsecured notes due 2020 was replaced by
$350.0 million of incremental term loans under our variable rate Term Loan Agreement. In connection with the addition of this
variable rate debt, we entered into interest rate swap agreements in order to hedge the future risk of rising interest rates and
effectively fix the interest rate on $350.0 million of our variable rate debt at an annual rate of approximately 4.67%.
Environmental Liabilities
 As of December 31, 2018 over 2017
(in thousands) 2018  2017 $ Change % Change
Closure and post-closure liabilities $ 69,931 $ 61,037$ 8,894 14.6 %
Remedial liabilities 121,017 124,468 (3,451) (2.8)%
Total environmental liabilities $190,948 $185,505$ 5,443 2.9 %
Total environmental liabilities as of December 31, 2018 were $190.9 million, an increase of $5.4 million compared to the
liabilities as of December 31, 2017. This increase was primarily due to accretion of $9.8 million, new asset retirement obligations
and liabilities assumed in acquisitions of $3.2 million, and changes in estimates recorded to our statement of operations of $2.1
million, partially offset by expenditures of $10.1 million.
We anticipate our environmental liabilities, substantially all of which we assumed in connection with our acquisitions, will be
payable over many years and that cash flow from operations will generally be sufficient to fund the payment of such liabilities
when required. However, events not anticipated (such as future changes in environmental laws and regulations) could require that
such payments be made earlier or in greater amounts than currently anticipated, which could adversely affect our results of
operations, cash flow and financial condition.
During 2018, we recognized a net charge for changes in estimates of recorded environmental liabilities, whereas in each of
2017 and 2016 we benefited from reductions in our environmental liabilities due to changes in estimates recorded to our statement
of operations. The benefits over these years were primarily due to the successful introduction of new technology for remedial
activities, favorable results from environmental studies of the on-going remediation, including favorable regulatory approvals, and
lower project costs realized by utilizing internal labor and equipment. The principal changes in estimates were from the following
items:
In 2018, the net increase in our environmental liabilities from changes in estimates recorded to the statement of operations
was $2.1 million and primarily related to an increase in projected cleanup costs at third party Superfund sites where we are a
potentially responsible party.
In 2017, the net reduction in our environmental liabilities from changes in estimates recorded to the statement of operations
was $0.2 million and primarily related to reduced remedial spending at one of our locations resulting from new technologies and
cost savings realized during the completed cell closure at one of our landfills.
In 2016, the net reduction in our environmental liabilities from changes in estimates recorded to the statement of operations
was $4.3 million and primarily related to reduced remedial spending at one of our locations resulting from new technologies and
cost savings realized during the completed cell closure at one of our landfills.
37
Table Of Contents
Contractual Obligations
The following table has been included to assist understanding our debt and similar obligations as of December 31, 2018 and
our ability to meet such obligations (in thousands):
  Payments Due by Period
Contractual Obligations TotalLess than
1 year 1-3 years  4-5 years  After  5 years
Closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities $ 462,879$ 24,549$ 50,425 $ 35,138 $ 352,767
Current and long-term obligations, at par 1,587,232 7,535 860,071 15,071 704,555
Interest on current and long-term obligations (1) 273,559 76,192 126,114 63,420 7,833
Operating leases 211,051 56,480 79,031 39,762 35,778
Total contractual obligations $2,534,721$ 164,756$1,115,641 $ 153,391 $1,100,933
___________________________________________
(1) Interest on our variable-rate $742.2 million senior secured term loan agreement was calculated based on the effective interest
rate as of December 31, 2018 of 4.27%. Our interest rate swap agreements effectively fix the interest rate on $350.0 million of
our variable rate debt at an annual rate of approximately 4.67% and therefore the assumed rate on this variable debt after
considering the swap agreements is 4.45%.
The undiscounted value of closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities of $462.9 million is equivalent to the present value of
$190.9 million based on discounting of $178.7 million and the undiscounted remainder of $93.2 million to be accrued for closure
and post-closure liabilities over the remaining site lives.
The following table has been included to assist in understanding our other contractual obligations as of December 31, 2018
and our ability to meet such obligations (in thousands):
  Payments Due by Period
Other Commercial Commitments TotalLess than
1 year  1-3 years  4-5 years After 5 years
Standby letters of credit $ 130,100$ 130,100 $ — $ — $ —
We obtained the standby letters of credit described in the above table primarily as security for financial assurances we have
been required to provide to regulatory bodies for our hazardous waste facilities and which would be called only in the event that we
fail to satisfy closure, post-closure and other obligations under the permits issued by those regulatory bodies for such licensed
facilities. See Note 12, "Financing Arrangements," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for
further discussion of our standby letters of credit and other financing arrangements.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
Except for our obligations under operating leases and letters of credit described above under "Contractual Obligations" and
performance obligations incurred in the ordinary course of business, we are not party to any off-balance sheet arrangements
involving guarantee, contingency or similar obligations to entities whose financial statements are not consolidated with our results,
and that have or are reasonably likely to have a current or future effect on our financial condition, changes in financial condition,
revenues or expenses, results of operations, liquidity, capital expenditures or capital resources that would be material to investors in
our securities.
Capital Expenditures
In 2018, our capital expenditures, net of disposals, were $177.9 million. We anticipate that 2019 capital spending, net of
disposals, will be in the range of $190.0 million to $210.0 million. However, unanticipated changes in environmental regulations
could require us to make significant capital expenditures for our facilities and adversely affect our results of operations and cash
flow.
38
Table Of Contents
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
The preparation of our financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of
our assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and related disclosures of contingent liabilities. The following are the areas that we
believe require the greatest amount of judgments or estimates in the preparation of the financial statements: accounting for landfills,
non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities, remedial liabilities, goodwill, permits and other intangible assets and legal matters.
Our management reviews critical accounting estimates with the Audit Committee of our Board of Directors on an ongoing basis
and as needed prior to the release of our annual financial statements. See also Note 2, "Significant Accounting Policies," to our
consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report, which discusses the significant assumptions used in applying our
accounting policies.
Landfill Accounting.    We amortize landfill improvements and certain landfill-related permits over their estimated useful
lives. The units-of-consumption method is used to amortize land, landfill cell construction, asset retirement costs and remaining
landfill cells and sites. We also utilize the units-of-consumption method to record closure and post-closure obligations for landfill
cells and sites. Under the units-of-consumption method, we include future estimated construction and asset retirement costs, as well
as costs incurred to date, in the amortization base of the landfill assets. Additionally, where appropriate, as discussed below, we
include probable expansion airspace yet to be permitted in the calculation of the total remaining useful life of the landfill. If we
determine that expansion capacity should no longer be considered in calculating the recoverability of a landfill asset, we may be
required to recognize an asset impairment or incur significantly higher amortization expense. If at any time we decide to abandon
the expansion effort, the capitalized costs related to the expansion effort are expensed immediately.
Landfill Assets. Landfill assets include the costs of landfill site acquisition, permits and cell construction incurred to date.
These amounts are amortized under the units-of-consumption method such that the asset is completely amortized when the landfill
ceases accepting waste.
Landfill Capacity. Landfill capacity, which is the basis for the amortization of landfill assets and for the accrual of final
closure and post-closure obligations, represents total permitted airspace plus unpermitted airspace that management believes is
probable of ultimately being permitted based on established criteria. Our management applies the following criteria for evaluating
the probability of obtaining a permit for future expansion airspace at existing sites, which provides management a basis to evaluate
the likelihood of success of unpermitted expansions:
•Personnel are actively working to obtain the permit or permit modifications (land use, state and federal) necessary for
expansion of an existing landfill, and progress is being made on the project.
•Management expects to submit the application within the next year and to receive all necessary approvals to accept waste
within the next five years.
•At the time the expansion is included in management's estimate of the landfill's useful economic life, it is probable that the
required approvals will be received within the normal application and processing time periods for approvals in the
jurisdiction in which the landfill is located.
•We or the other owner of the landfill has a legal right to use or obtain the right to use the land associated with the
expansion plan.
•There are no significant known political, technical, legal or business restrictions or other issues that could impair the
success of such expansion.
•A financial feasibility analysis has been completed and the results demonstrate that the expansion will have a positive
financial and operational impact such that management is committed to pursuing the expansion.
•Additional airspace and related additional costs, including permitting, final closure and post-closure costs, have been
estimated based on the conceptual design of the proposed expansion.
As of December 31, 2018, there was one unpermitted expansion at one location included in management's landfill calculation,
which represented 16.2% of our remaining airspace at that date. If actual expansion airspace is significantly different from
management's estimate of expansion airspace, the amortization rates used for the units-of-consumption method would change,
therefore impacting our profitability. If we determine that there is less actual expansion airspace at a landfill, this would increase
amortization expense recorded and decrease profitability, while if we determine a landfill has more actual expansion airspace,
amortization expense would decrease and profitability would increase.
Landfill Final Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities. The balance of landfill final closure and post-closure liabilities at
December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $37.8 million and $32.4 million, respectively. We have material financial commitments for the
costs associated with requirements of the EPA and the comparable regulatory agency in Canada for landfill final closure and post-
closure activities. In the United States, the landfill final closure and post-closure requirements are established under the
39
Table Of Contents
standards of the EPA, and are implemented and applied on a state-by-state basis. We develop estimates for the cost of these
activities based on our evaluation of site-specific facts and circumstances, such as the existence of structures and other landfill
improvements that would need to be dismantled, the amount of groundwater monitoring and leachate management expected to be
performed, and the length of the post-closure period as determined by the applicable regulatory agency. Included in our cost
estimates are our interpretation of current regulatory requirements and proposed regulatory changes. Such estimates may change in
the future due to various circumstances including, but not limited to, permit modifications, changes in legislation or regulations,
technological changes and results of environmental studies. We perform zero-based reviews of these estimated liabilities based
upon a planned schedule, typically every five years or sooner if the occurrence of a significant event is likely to change the timing
or amount of the currently estimated expenditures. We consider a significant event to be a new regulation or an amendment to an
existing regulation, a new permit or modification to an existing permit, or a change in the market price of a significant cost item.
Our cost estimates are calculated using internal sources as well as input from third-party experts. These costs are measured at
estimated fair value using present value techniques, and therefore changes in the estimated timing of closure and post-closure
activities would affect the liability, the value of the related asset, and our results of operations.
Final closure costs are the costs incurred after the site ceases to accept waste, but before the landfill is certified as closed by
the applicable state or provincial regulatory agency. These costs generally include the costs required to cap the final cell of the
landfill (if not included in cell closure), to dismantle certain structures for landfills and other landfill improvements and regulation-
mandated groundwater monitoring, and for leachate management. Post-closure costs involve the maintenance and monitoring of a
landfill site that has been certified closed by the applicable regulatory agency. These costs generally include groundwater
monitoring and leachate management. Regulatory post-closure periods are generally 30 years after landfill closure. Final closure
and post-closure obligations are accrued on a units-of-consumption basis, such that the present value of the final closure and post-
closure obligations are fully accrued at the date the landfill discontinues accepting waste.
Non-Landfill Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities.    The balance of our non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities at
December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $32.1 million and $28.6 million, respectively. We base estimates for non-landfill closure and
post-closure liabilities on our interpretations of existing permit and regulatory requirements for closure and post-closure
maintenance and monitoring. Our cost estimates are calculated using internal sources as well as input from third-party experts. We
use probability scenarios to estimate when future operations will cease and inflate the current cost of closing the non-landfill
facility on a probability weighted basis using the appropriate inflation rate and then discounting the future value to arrive at an
estimated present value of closure and post-closure costs. The estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities are
inherently uncertain due to the possibility that permit and regulatory requirements will change in the future, impacting the
estimation of total costs and the timing of the expenditures. We review non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities for changes
to key assumptions that would impact the amount of the recorded liabilities. Changes that would prompt us to revise a liability
estimate include changes in legal requirements that impact our expected closure plan or scope of work, in the market price of a
significant cost item, in the probability scenarios as to when future operations at a location might cease, or in the expected timing of
the cost expenditures. Changes in estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure events immediately impact the required
liability and the value of the corresponding asset. If a change is made to a fully-consumed asset, the adjustment is charged
immediately to expense. When a change in estimate relates to an asset that has not been fully consumed, the adjustment to the asset
is recognized in income prospectively as a component of amortization. Historically, material changes to non-landfill closure and
post-closure estimates have been infrequent. See Note 10, "Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities," to our consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8 of this report for the changes to these Landfill and Non-Landfill Closure and Post-Closure liabilities
during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Remedial Liabilities.    The balance of our remedial liabilities at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $121.0 million and $124.5
million, respectively. See Note 11, "Remedial Liabilities," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report
for the changes to the remedial liabilities during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017. Remedial liabilities are obligations
to investigate, alleviate and/or eliminate the effects of a release (or threat of a release) of hazardous substances into the environment
and may also include corrective action under RCRA. Our remediation obligations can be further characterized as Long-term
Maintenance, One-Time Projects, Legal and Superfund. Legal liabilities are typically comprised of litigation matters that involve
potential liability for certain aspects of environmental cleanup and can include third-party claims for property damage or bodily
injury allegedly arising from or caused by exposure to hazardous substances originating from our activities or operations or, in
certain cases, from the actions or inactions of other persons or companies. Superfund liabilities are typically claims alleging that we
are a potentially responsible party ("PRP") and/or are potentially liable for environmental response, removal, remediation and
cleanup costs at/or from either a facility we own or a site owned by a third-party. As described in Note 18, "Commitments and
Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report, Superfund liabilities also include certain
liabilities payable to governmental entities for which we are potentially liable to reimburse the sellers in connection with our 2002
acquisition of substantially all of the assets of the Chemical Services Division (the "CSD assets") of Safety-Kleen Corp. Long-term
maintenance liabilities include the costs of groundwater monitoring, treatment system operations, permit fees and facility
maintenance for inactive operations. One-Time Projects
40
Table Of Contents
liabilities include the costs necessary to comply with regulatory requirements for the removal or treatment of contaminated
materials.
Amounts recorded related to the costs required to remediate a location are determined by internal engineers and operational
personnel and incorporate input from external third parties. The estimates consider such factors as the nature and extent of
environmental contamination (if any); the terms of applicable permits and agreements with regulatory authorities as to cleanup
procedures and whether modifications to such permits and agreements will likely need to be negotiated; the cost of performing
anticipated cleanup activities based upon current technology; and in the case of Superfund and other sites where other parties will
also be responsible for a portion of the cleanup costs, the likely allocation of such costs and the ability of such other parties to pay
their share. Each quarter, our management discusses if any events have occurred or milestones have been met that would warrant
the creation of a new remedial liability or the revision of an existing remedial liability. Such events or milestones include
identification and verification as a PRP, receipt of a unilateral administrative order under Superfund or requirement for RCRA
interim corrective measures, completion of the feasibility study under Superfund or the corrective measures study under RCRA,
new or modifications to existing permits, changes in property use, or a change in the market price of a significant cost item.
Remedial liabilities are inherently difficult to estimate and there is a risk that the actual quantities of contaminants could differ from
the results of the site investigation, which could materially impact the amount of our liability. It is also possible that chosen
methods of remedial solutions will not be successful and funds will be required for alternative solutions.
Remedial liabilities are discounted only when the timing of the payments is estimable and the amounts are determinable, with
the exception of remedial liabilities assumed as part of an acquisition that are measured at fair value.
We establish reserves for estimated environmental liabilities based on acceptable technologies when we determine the liability
is appropriate. Introductions of new technologies are subject to successful demonstration of the effectiveness of the alternative
technology and regulatory approval. We routinely review and evaluate the sites for which we have established estimated
environmental liabilities reserves to determine if there should be changes in the established reserves. The changes in estimates are
reflected as adjustments in the ordinary course of business in the period when we determine that an adjustment is appropriate as
new information becomes available. Upon demonstration of the effectiveness of the alternative technology and applicable
regulatory approval, we update our estimated cost of remediating the affected sites.
Goodwill and Other Long-Lived Assets.   Goodwill is not amortized but is reviewed for impairment annually as of December
31 or when events or changes in the business environment indicate the carrying value of a reporting unit may exceed its fair value.
This review is performed by comparing the fair value of each reporting unit to its carrying value, including goodwill. If the fair
value is less than the carrying amount, a loss is recorded for the excess of the carrying value over the fair value up to the carrying
amount of goodwill.
We determine our reporting units by identifying the components of each operating segment, and then in some circumstances
aggregate components having similar economic characteristics based on quantitative and/or qualitative factors. During the first
quarter of fiscal year 2018, we reassigned certain components among our operating segments to be in line with management
reporting changes and as a result concluded there was a change in our operating segments resulting in two such segments in 2018,
namely (i) the Environmental Services segment and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment. As a result of our identification of operating
segments, we also concluded that, for purposes of reviewing for potential goodwill impairment, we now have four reporting units,
consisting of Environmental Sales and Service, Environmental Facilities, Kleen Performance Products and Safety-Kleen
Environmental Services. We allocated goodwill to the newly identified reporting units using a relative fair value approach. In
addition, we completed an assessment of any potential goodwill impairment for all reporting units immediately prior and
subsequent to the reallocation and determined that no impairment existed.
We conducted our annual impairment test of goodwill for all of our reporting units to which goodwill was allocated as of
December 31, 2018 and determined that no adjustment to the carrying value of goodwill for any reporting unit was then necessary.
In all cases the estimated fair value of each reporting unit significantly exceeded its carrying value. We measure fair value for all of
our reporting units using an income approach (a discounted cash flow analysis) which incorporates several estimates and
assumptions with varying degrees of uncertainty. The discounted cash flow analyses include estimated cash flows for a discrete
period and for a terminal period thereafter. We corroborate our estimates of fair values by also considering other factors such as the
fair value of comparable companies to businesses contained in our reporting units, as well as performing a reconciliation of the
total estimated fair value of all reporting units to our market capitalization.
Indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31, or when
events or changes in the business environment indicate that the carrying value may be impaired. If the fair value of the asset is less
than the carrying amount, we perform a quantitative test to determine the fair value. The impairment loss, if any, is measured as the
excess of the carrying value of the asset over its fair value. The estimated fair values of the indefinite-lived
41
Table Of Contents
intangibles exceeded their carrying values at December 31, 2018. However, we will continue to monitor the performance of our
indefinite-lived intangible assets, and future events might result in an impairment of indefinite-lived intangible assets.
Our long-lived assets are carried on our financial statements based on their cost less accumulated depreciation or
amortization. Long-lived assets with finite lives are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate
that their carrying value may not be entirely recoverable. When such factors and circumstances exist, our management compares
the projected undiscounted future cash flows associated with the related asset or group of assets to the respective carrying amounts.
The impairment loss, if any, would be measured as the excess of the carrying amount over the fair value of the asset and is recorded
in the period in which the determination is made. Any resulting impairment losses recorded by us would have an adverse impact on
our results of operations.
In consideration of historical goodwill impairments for our Oil and Gas Field Services and Lodging Services operations and
continued lower than historical results in the oil and gas related industries, specifically in Western Canada, we continue to monitor
the carrying value of those business’ long-lived assets and assess the risk of asset impairment. As of December 31, 2018, our Oil
and Gas Field Services and Lodging Services operations had property, plant and equipment, net of $55.2 million and $65.9 million,
respectively, and intangible assets of $0.6 million and $1.4 million, respectively. We concluded that no events or circumstances
have arisen during 2018 which would indicate that the carrying values of those asset groups are not recoverable.
We will continue to evaluate all of our goodwill and other long-lived assets impacted by economic downturns most
predominantly in the oil and energy related markets in which we operate. If further economic difficulties resulting from depressed
oil and gas related pricing and lower overall activity levels, particularly in our Canadian operations, continue for a significant
foreseeable period of time and thus future operating results are significantly less than current expectations, additional impairment
charges may be recognized. The market conditions which could lead to such future impairments are currently most prevalent in our
Oil and Gas Field Services and Lodging Services operations.
Legal Matters.    As described in Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements
included in Item 8 of this report, we are subject to legal proceedings which relate to our past acquisitions or which have arisen in
the ordinary course of business. Accruals are established for legal matters when, in our opinion, it is probable that a liability exists
and the liability can be reasonably estimated. As of December 31, 2018, we had reserves of $25.4 million consisting of (i) $17.9
million related to pending legal or administrative proceedings, including Superfund liabilities, which were included in remedial
liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets and (ii) $7.5 million primarily related to legal claims as well as federal, state and
provincial enforcement actions, which were included in accrued expenses on the consolidated balance sheets. We also estimate that
it is "reasonably possible," as that term is defined ("more than remote but less than likely"), that the amount of such total liabilities
could be as much as $1.8 million more. Actual expenses incurred in future periods could differ materially from accruals established.
42
Table Of Contents
ITEM 7A.    QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
In the normal course of business, we are exposed to market risks, including changes in interest rates and certain foreign
currency rates, primarily relating to the Canadian dollar. Our philosophy in managing interest rate risk is to maintain a debt
portfolio inclusive of both variable and fixed-rate debt so as to limit our interest expense and exposure to interest rate volatility.
During the third quarter of 2018, we entered into interest rate swap agreements with the intention of hedging interest rate exposure
on a portion of our outstanding LIBOR-based variable rate senior secured term loans. Under the terms of the swaps, we receive
interest based on the 1-month LIBOR index and pay interest at a weighted average rate of approximately 2.92% on an initial
notional amount of $350.0 million. When combined with the 1.75% interest rate margin for Eurocurrency borrowings, the effective
annual interest rate on such $350.0 million aggregate principal amount of term loans is therefore approximately 4.67%.
We have designated our interest rate swap agreements as effective cash flow hedges at inception, and therefore the change in
fair value is recorded in stockholders' equity as a component of accumulated other comprehensive loss and included in interest
expense at the same time as interest expense is affected by the hedged transactions. Differences paid or received over the life of the
agreements are recorded as additions to or reductions of interest expense on the underlying debt.
The following table provides information regarding our fixed and variable rate borrowings at December 31, 2018 (in
thousands):
Scheduled Maturity Dates 2019 2020 2021  2022  2023  Ther eafter  Total
Senior secured term loans due
2024 $7,535$7,535$ 7,535 $ 7,535 $7,535 $704,557 $ 742,232
Senior unsecured notes due
2021 — — 845,000 — — — 845,000
Long term obligations, at par $7,535$7,535$852,535 $ 7,535 $7,535 $704,557 $1,587,232
The interest rate on the $845 million senior unsecured notes due June 1, 2021 is fixed at 5.125%. Interest payments are due in
the amount of $21.7 million each related to the $845.0 million senior unsecured notes payable semi-annually on June 1 and
December 1 of each year.
We continue to have interest rate risk relative to our term loan borrowing exceeding $350 million or $392.2 million as of
December 31, 2018. The effective interest rate of the term loans as of December 31, 2018 was 4.27%. Should the average interest
rate on the variable rate portion of our long-term obligations change by 100 basis points, we estimate that our annual interest
expense would change by up to approximately $4.0 million.
In addition to the fixed and variable rate borrowings described in the above table, we have a revolving credit facility with
maximum borrowings of up to $400.0 million (with a $325.0 million sub-limit for letters of credit), under which no borrowings
were outstanding at December 31, 2018.
We view our investment in our foreign subsidiaries as long-term; thus, we have not entered into any hedging transactions
between any two foreign currencies or between any of the foreign currencies and the U.S. dollar. Given this significant investment
in Canada and the fluctuations that have and can occur between the U.S. Dollar and Canadian Dollar exchange rates, significant
movements in cumulative translation adjustment amounts recorded as a component of other comprehensive income (loss) can occur
in any given period.
During 2018, our Canadian subsidiaries transacted business in U.S. dollars and at any period end had cash on deposit in U.S.
dollars and outstanding U.S. dollar accounts receivable related to those transactions. Those cash and receivable accounts are
vulnerable to foreign currency transaction gains or losses. Exchange rate movements also affect the translation of Canadian
generated profits and losses into U.S. dollars. Had the Canadian dollar been 10.0% stronger or weaker against the U.S. dollar, we
would have reported increased or decreased net income of $4.8 million and $5.6 million for the years ended December 31, 2018
and 2017, respectively.
43
Table Of Contents
ITEM 8.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Clean Harbors, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Clean Harbors, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, cash flows, and
stockholders’ equity for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes and the schedule
listed in the Index at Item 15 (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission and our report dated February 27, 2019, expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company's internal control over
financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 27, 2019
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2005.
44
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(dollars in thousands)
 As of December 31,
 2018  2017
ASSETS   
Curr ent assets:    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 226,507  $ 319,399
Short-term marketable securities 52,856  38,179
Accounts receivable, net of allowances aggregating $44,315 and $27,799, respectively 606,952  528,924
Unbilled accounts receivable 54,794  35,922
Deferred costs 18,770  20,445
Inventories and supplies 199,479  176,012
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 42,800  35,175
Total current assets 1,202,158  1,154,056
Property , plant and equipment, net 1,561,978  1,587,365
Other  assets:    
Goodwill 514,189  478,523
Permits and other intangibles, net 441,875  469,128
Other 18,121  17,498
Total other assets 974,185  965,149
Total assets $3,738,321  $3,706,570
   
LIABILITIES AND ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY   
Curr ent liabilities:    
Current portion of long-term obligations $ 7,535  $ 4,000
Accounts payable 276,461  224,231
Deferred revenue 61,843  67,822
Accrued expenses 233,405  187,982
Current portion of closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities 23,034  19,782
Total current liabilities 602,278  503,817
Other  liabilities:    
Closure and post-closure liabilities, less current portion of $9,592 and $6,444, respectively 60,339  54,593
Remedial liabilities, less current portion of $13,442 and $13,338, respectively 107,575  111,130
Long-term obligations, less current portion 1,565,021  1,625,537
Deferred taxes, unrecognized tax benefits and other long-term liabilities 233,352  223,291
Total other liabilities 1,966,287  2,014,551
Commitments and contingent liabilities (See Note 18)  
Stockholders' equity:    
Common stock, $.01 par value:    
Authorized 80,000,000 shares; issued and outstanding 55,847,261 and 56,501,190 shares, respectively 558  565
Additional paid-in capital 655,415  686,962
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (223,371 ) (172,407 )
Accumulated earnings 737,154  673,082
Total stockholders' equity 1,169,756  1,188,202
Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $3,738,321  $3,706,570
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
45
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(in thousands except per share amounts)
 For the years ended December 31,
 2018  2017  2016
Revenues:     
Service revenues $2,709,239 $2,398,650 $2,280,809
Product revenues 591,064 546,328 474,417
Total revenues 3,300,303 2,944,978 2,755,226
Cost of revenues: (exclusive of items shown separately below)     
Service revenues 1,861,975 1,641,798 1,543,210
Product revenues 443,576 420,875 389,647
Total cost of revenues 2,305,551 2,062,673 1,932,857
Selling, general and administrative expenses 503,747 456,648 422,015
Accretion of environmental liabilities 9,806 9,460 10,177
Depreciation and amortization 298,625 288,422 287,002
Goodwill impairment charge — — 34,013
Income from operations 182,574 127,775 69,162
Other (expense) income, net (4,510) (6,119) 6,195
Loss on early extinguishment of debt (2,488) (7,891) —
Gain on sale of businesses — 30,732 16,884
Interest expense, net of interest income of $2,958, $1,897, and $784, respectively (81,094) (85,808) (83,525)
Income before provision (benefit) for income taxes 94,482 58,689 8,716
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 28,846 (42,050) 48,589
Net income (loss) $ 65,636 $ 100,739 $ (39,873)
Earnings (loss) per share:      
Basic $ 1.17 $ 1.77 $ (0.69)
Diluted $ 1.16 $ 1.76 $ (0.69)
Shares used to compute earnings (loss) per share — Basic 56,148 57,072 57,532
Shares used to compute earnings (loss) per share — Diluted 56,340 57,200 57,532
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
46
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(in thousands)
 For the years ended December 31,
 2018 2017 2016
Net income (loss) $ 65,636$ 100,739$ (39,873)
Other comprehensive (loss) income:    
Unrealized gains (losses) on available-for-sale securities (net of taxes (benefits)
of $105, $152, and ($214), respectively) 77 32 (321)
Unrealized loss on interest rate hedge (9,579) — —
Reclassification adjustment for losses on available-for-sale securities and
interest rate hedge included in net income (loss) (net of taxes of $0, $79, and
$0, respectively) 806 143 —
Foreign currency translation adjustments (including tax benefits of $5.0 million
and $16.8 million in 2018 and 2016, respectively) (42,350) 41,636 40,728
Unfunded pension liability (net of taxes of $42, $38, and $57, respectively) 82 108 159
Other comprehensive (loss) income (50,964) 41,919 40,566
Comprehensive income $ 14,672$ 142,658$ 693
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
47
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(in thousands)
 For the years ended December 31,
 2018  2017  2016
Cash flows from operating activities:      
Net income (loss) $ 65,636 $ 100,739 $ (39,873)
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss) to net cash from operating activities:      
Depreciation and amortization 298,625 288,422 287,002
Goodwill impairment charge — — 34,013
Allowance for doubtful accounts 15,817 7,901 6,907
Amortization of deferred financing costs and debt discount 3,846 3,482 3,537
Accretion of environmental liabilities 9,806 9,460 10,177
Changes in environmental liability estimates 2,147 (195) (4,254)
Deferred income taxes 19,089 (83,335) 15,184
Other expense (income), net 4,510 6,119 (5,685)
Stock-based compensation 16,792 13,146 10,481
Excess tax benefit of stock-based compensation — — (1,198)
Net tax benefit on stock-based awards — — 1,165
Gain on sale of businesses — (30,732) (16,884)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 2,488 7,891 —
Environmental expenditures (10,115) (12,965) (12,170)
   Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:      
      Accounts receivable and unbilled accounts receivable (79,563) (33,764) (15,009)
      Inventories and supplies (26,958) (5,002) (16,080)
      Other current assets (7,946) 16,720 (8,036)
      Accounts payable 46,915 (10,684) (3,503)
      Other current and long-term liabilities 12,121 8,495 13,850
Net cash from operating activities 373,210 285,698 259,624
Cash flows used in investing activities:      
Additions to property, plant and equipment (193,344) (167,007) (219,384)
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets 15,445 7,124 20,817
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (151,023) (49,227) (206,915)
Additions to intangible assets including costs to obtain or renew permits (4,688) (1,617) (2,831)
Purchases of available-for-sale securities (44,772) (38,342) (598)
Proceeds from sale of available-for-sale securities 28,723 376 —
Proceeds from sale of businesses, net of transactional costs — 45,426 47,134
Net cash used in investing activities (349,659) (203,267) (361,777)
Cash flows (used in) from financing activities:      
Change in uncashed checks 132 (5,940) (3,177)
Proceeds from exercise of stock options — 46 627
Tax payments related to withholdings on vested restricted stock (3,266) (3,149) (2,819)
Repurchases of common stock (45,080) (48,971) (22,188)
Excess tax benefit of stock-based compensation — — 1,198
Deferred financing costs paid (4,027) (5,718) (4,031)
Premiums paid on early extinguishment of debt (1,238) (6,028) —
Principal payments on debt (405,768) (402,000) —
Issuance of senior secured notes, net of discount 348,250 399,000 —
Issuance of senior unsecured notes, including premium — — 250,625
Borrowing from revolving credit facility 50,000 — —
Payment on revolving credit facility (50,000) — —
Net cash (used in) from financing activities (110,997) (72,760) 220,235
Effect of exchange rate change on cash (5,446) 2,731 4,207
(Decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents (92,892) 12,402 122,289
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year 319,399 306,997 184,708
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 226,507 $ 319,399 $ 306,997
Supplemental information:      
Cash payments for interest and income taxes:      
Interest paid $ 89,171 $ 93,174 $ 88,669
Income taxes paid 20,036 18,682 29,255
Non-cash investing activities:      
Property, plant and equipment accrued 15,657 16,109 9,214
Transfer of inventory to property, plant and equipment — 12,641 —
(Payable) receivable for estimated purchase price adjustment (4,032) — 1,910
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
48
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
(in thousands)
 Common StockShares Held
Under
Employee
Participation
PlanAdditional
Paid-in
Capital Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
loss  
Total
Stockholders'
Equity  Number of
Shares$0.01 Par
Value  Accumulated
Earnings 
Balance at January 1, 2016 57,593 $ 576 $ (469)$738,401 $ (254,892)$ 612,666 $1,096,282
Net loss — — — — — (39,873) (39,873)
Other comprehensive income — — — — 40,566 — 40,566
Stock-based compensation — — — 10,481 — — 10,481
Issuance of restricted shares, net of shares remitted
and tax withholdings 136 1 — (2,820) — — (2,819)
Exercise of stock options 22 — — 627 — — 627
Repurchases of common stock (453) (4) — (22,184) — — (22,188)
Net tax benefit on stock-based awards — — — 1,165 — — 1,165
Balance at December 31, 2016 57,298 $ 573 $ (469)$725,670 $ (214,326)$ 572,793 $1,084,241
Net income — — — — — 100,739 100,739
Cumulative effect of change in accounting for
stock-based compensation — — — 681 — (450) 231
Other comprehensive income — — — — 41,919 — 41,919
Stock-based compensation — — — 13,146 — — 13,146
Issuance of restricted shares, net of shares remitted
and tax withholdings 133 1 — (3,150) — — (3,149)
Exercise of stock options 2 — — 46 — — 46
Shares held under employee participation plan (25) — 469 (469) — — —
Repurchases of common stock (907) (9) — (48,962) — — (48,971)
Balance at December 31, 2017 56,501 $ 565 $ — $686,962 $ (172,407)$ 673,082 $1,188,202
Net income — — — — — 65,636 65,636
Cumulative effect of change in accounting
principle — — — — — (1,564) (1,564)
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (50,964) — (50,964)
Stock-based compensation — — — 16,792 — — 16,792
Issuance of restricted shares, net of shares remitted
and tax withholdings 160 1 — (3,267) — — (3,266)
Repurchases of common stock (814) (8) — (45,072) — — (45,080)
Balance at December 31, 2018 55,847 $ 558 $ — $655,415 $ (223,371)$ 737,154 $1,169,756
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
49
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(1) OPERATIONS
Clean Harbors, Inc., through its subsidiaries (collectively, the "Company"), is a leading provider of environmental, energy
and industrial services throughout North America. We are also the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil in the world and the
largest provider of parts cleaning and related environmental services to commercial, industrial and automotive customers in North
America.
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
The accompanying consolidated financial statements of the Company reflect the application of certain significant accounting
policies as described below:
Principles of Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated statements include the accounts of Clean Harbors, Inc. and its majority-owned subsidiaries.
All intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions, which are evaluated on an ongoing basis, that
affect the amounts reported in the Company's consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes. Management bases its
estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions it believes to be reasonable at the time under the
circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities and
disclosure, if any, of contingent assets and liabilities and reported amounts of revenues and expenses. Actual results could differ
from those estimates and judgments.
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Uncashed Checks
Cash consists primarily of cash on deposit and money market accounts. Marketable securities with maturities of three months
or less from the date of purchase are classified as cash equivalents. The Company's cash management program with its revolving
credit lender allows for the maintenance of a zero balance in the U.S. bank disbursement accounts that are used to issue vendor and
payroll checks. The program can result in checks outstanding in excess of bank balances in the disbursement accounts. When
checks are presented to the bank for payment, cash deposits in amounts sufficient to fund the checks are made, at the Company's
discretion, either from funds provided by other accounts or under the terms of the Company's revolving credit facility. Therefore,
until checks are presented for payment, there is no right of offset by the bank and the Company continues to have control over cash
relating to both released as well as unreleased checks. Checks that have been written to vendors or employees but have not yet been
presented for payment at the Company's bank are classified as uncashed checks as part of accounts payable and changes in the
balance are reported as a financing activity in the statement of cash flows.
Marketable Securities
The Company, through its wholly-owned captive insurance subsidiary, invests in marketable securities consisting of U.S.
Treasury securities, corporate notes and bonds and commercial paper. Marketable securities with original maturities greater than
three months from the purchase date and remaining maturities less than one year are classified as short-term marketable securities.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017 the Company has recorded total marketable securities and cash equivalents of $61.0 million
and $40.2 million, respectively, as shown below (in thousands).
50
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
 
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Commercial paper $ 8,126$ 2,048
     Total cash equivalents 8,126 2,048
U.S. Treasury securities 10,133 3,855
Corporate notes and bonds 38,036 32,729
Commercial paper 4,687 1,595
     Total short-term marketable securities 52,856 38,179
Total financial assets $ 60,982$ 40,227
Realized gains and losses on sales of available-for-sale securities in the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 were
immaterial. The majority of the marketable securities have a remaining maturity of less than one year and fair value approximates
cost.
Allowances for Doubtful Accounts
On a regular basis, the Company evaluates its accounts receivable and establishes the allowance for doubtful accounts based
on an evaluation of certain criteria and evidence of collection certainty including historical collection trends, current economic
trends and changes in customer payment patterns. Past-due receivable balances are written off when the Company's internal
collection efforts have been deemed unsuccessful in collecting the outstanding balance due.
Credit Concentration
Concentration of credit risks in accounts receivable is limited due to the large number of customers comprising the
Company's customer base throughout North America. The Company maintains policies over credit extension that include credit
evaluations, credit limits and collection monitoring procedures on a customer-by-customer basis. However, the Company generally
does not require collateral before services are performed. No individual customer accounted for more than 10% of accounts
receivable or more than 10% of total revenues in the periods presented.
Inventories and Supplies
Inventories are stated at the lower of cost or market. The cost of oil and oil products is principally determined on a first-in,
first-out ("FIFO") basis. The cost of supplies and drums, solvent and solution and other inventories is determined on a FIFO or a
weighted average cost basis. The Company continually reviews its inventories for obsolete or unsalable items and adjusts its
carrying value to reflect estimated realizable values.
Property, Plant and Equipment (excluding landfill assets)
Property, plant and equipment are stated at cost. Expenditures for major renewals and improvements which extend the life or
usefulness of the asset are capitalized. Items of an ordinary repair or maintenance nature are charged directly to operating expense
as incurred. During the construction and development period of an asset, the costs incurred, including applicable interest costs, are
classified as construction-in-progress.
51
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
The Company depreciates and amortizes the cost of these assets, using the straight-line method as follows:
Asset Classification Estimated Useful Life
Buildings and building improvements  
Buildings 20–42 years
Leasehold and building improvements 2–45 years
Camp and lodging equipment 8–15 years
Vehicles 2–15 years
Equipment  
Capitalized software and computer equipment 3–5 years
Containers and railcars 8–16 years
All other equipment 4–30 years
Furniture and fixtures 5–8 years
The Company recognizes an impairment in the carrying value of long-lived assets when the expected future undiscounted
cash flows derived from the assets, or group of assets, are less than their carrying value. For the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017 and 2016, the Company did not record impairment charges related to long-lived assets.
Goodwill
Goodwill is comprised of the purchase price of business acquisitions in excess of the fair value of the net assets acquired.
Goodwill is not amortized but is reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31, or when events or circumstances indicate
that the carrying value of the reporting unit may exceed its fair value. Upon adoption of Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”)
2017-04 in the fourth quarter of 2017, if the fair value is less than the carrying amount, a loss will be recorded for the excess of the
carrying value of the goodwill over the implied value of the goodwill. Prior to adoption of ASU 2017-04, if the fair value was less
than the carrying amount, a Step II goodwill impairment test was performed to determine if goodwill was impaired. The loss, if any,
was measured as the excess of the carrying value of the goodwill over the implied value of the goodwill. See Note 8, "Goodwill and
Other Intangible Assets," for additional information related to the Company's goodwill impairment tests.
Permits and other intangibles
Costs related to acquiring licenses, permits and intangible assets, such as legal fees, site surveys, engineering costs and other
expenditures are capitalized. Other intangible assets consist primarily of customer and supplier relationships, trademarks and trade
names, and non-compete agreements. Permits relating to landfills are amortized on a units-of-consumption basis. All other permits
are amortized over periods ranging from 5 to 30 years on a straight-line basis. Other intangible assets are amortized on a straight-
line basis over their respective useful lives, which range from 5 to 20 years.
Finite-lived intangible assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying value may not be recoverable. When such factors and circumstances exist, management compares the projected
undiscounted future cash flows associated with the related asset or group of assets to the carrying amount. The impairment loss, if
any, is measured as the excess of the carrying amount over the fair value of the asset or group of assets.
Indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31, or when
events or changes in the business environment indicate that the carrying value may be impaired. If the fair value of the asset is less
than the carrying amount, the impairment loss is measured as the excess of the carrying value of the asset over its fair value.
Leases
The Company leases rolling stock, rail cars, equipment, real estate and office equipment under operating leases. Certain real
estate leases contain rent holidays and rent escalation clauses. Most of the Company's real estate lease agreements include renewal
periods at the Company's option. For its operating leases, the Company recognizes rent holiday periods and scheduled
52
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
rent increases on a straight-line basis over the lease term beginning with the date the Company takes possession of the leased assets.
Landfill Accounting
The Company amortizes landfill improvements and certain landfill-related permits over the estimated useful lives. The units-
of-consumption method is used to amortize land, landfill cell construction, asset retirement costs and remaining landfill cells and
sites. The Company also utilizes the units-of-consumption method to record closure and post-closure obligations for landfill cells
and sites. Under the units-of-consumption method, the Company includes future estimated construction and asset retirement costs,
as well as costs incurred to date, in the amortization base of the landfill assets. Additionally, where appropriate, as described below,
the Company includes probable expansion airspace that has yet to be permitted in the calculation of the total remaining useful life
of the landfill. If it is determined that expansion capacity should no longer be considered in calculating the recoverability of a
landfill asset, the Company may be required to recognize an asset impairment or incur significantly higher amortization expense. If
at any time the Company makes the decision to abandon the expansion effort, the capitalized costs related to the expansion effort
are expensed immediately.
Landfill assets—Landfill assets include the costs of landfill site acquisition, permits and cell construction incurred to date.
These amounts are recorded at cost, which includes capitalized interest as applicable. Landfill assets, net of amortization, are
combined with management's estimate of the costs required to complete construction of the landfill to determine the amount to be
amortized over the remaining estimated useful economic life of a site. Amortization of landfill assets is recorded on a units-of-
consumption basis, such that the landfill assets should be completely amortized at the date the landfill ceases accepting waste.
Amortization totaled $10.3 million, $9.5 million and $9.7 million for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016,
respectively. Changes in estimated costs to complete construction are applied prospectively to the amortization rate.
Landfill capacity—Landfill capacity, which is the basis for the amortization of landfill assets and for the accrual of final
closure and post-closure obligations, represents total permitted airspace plus unpermitted airspace that management believes is
probable of ultimately being permitted based on established criteria. The Company applies the following criteria for evaluating the
probability of obtaining a permit for future expansion airspace at existing sites, which provides management a basis to evaluate the
likelihood of success of unpermitted expansions:
•Personnel are actively working to obtain the permit or permit modifications (land use, state, provincial and federal)
necessary for expansion of an existing landfill, and progress is being made on the project.
•Management expects to submit the application within the next year and to receive all necessary approvals to accept waste
within the next 5 years.
•At the time the expansion is included in the Company's estimate of the landfill's useful economic life, it is probable that
the required approvals will be received within the normal application and processing time periods for approvals in the
jurisdiction in which the landfill is located.
•The Company or other owner of the landfill has a legal right to use or obtain the right to use the land associated with the
expansion plan.
•There are no significant known political, technical, legal or business restrictions or issues that could impair the success of
such expansion.
•A financial feasibility analysis has been completed and the results demonstrate that the expansion will have a positive
financial and operational impact such that management is committed to pursuing the expansion.
•Additional airspace and related additional costs, including permitting, final closure and post-closure costs, have been
estimated based on the conceptual design of the proposed expansion.
As of December 31, 2018, there was one unpermitted expansion at one location included in the Company's landfill
accounting model, which represented 16.2% of the Company's remaining airspace at that date. If actual expansion airspace is
significantly different from the Company's estimate of expansion airspace, the amortization rates used for the units-of-consumption
method would change, therefore impacting the Company's profitability. If the Company determines that there is less actual
expansion airspace at a landfill, this would increase amortization expense recorded and decrease profitability, while
53
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
if the Company determines a landfill has more actual expansion airspace, amortization expense would decrease and profitability
would increase.
As of December 31, 2018, the Company had 11 active landfill sites (including the Company's two non-commercial landfills),
which have estimated remaining lives (based on anticipated waste volumes and remaining highly probable airspace) as follows:
   Remaining
Lives
(Years)  Remaining Highly Probable Airspace
(cubic yards) (in thousands)
Facility Name  Location Permitted Unpermitted Total
Altair  Texas 3  311 — 311
Buttonwillow  California 21  6,234 — 6,234
Deer Park  Texas 4  141 — 141
Deer Trail  Colorado 28  1,755 — 1,755
Grassy Mountain  Utah 51  194 4,830 5,024
Kimball  Nebraska 9  190 — 190
Lambton  Ontario 64  4,821 — 4,821
Lone Mountain  Oklahoma 18  4,124 — 4,124
Ryley  Alberta 7  906 — 906
Sawyer  North Dakota 87  3,522 — 3,522
Westmorland  California 64  2,732 — 2,732
     24,930 4,830 29,760
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company had no cubic yards of permitted, but not highly probable, airspace.
The following table presents the remaining highly probable airspace from January 1, 2016 through December 31, 2018 (in
thousands of cubic yards):
 2018  2017 2016
Remaining capacity at January 1, 31,113 32,228 29,786
Changes in highly probable airspace, net (223) — 3,464
Consumed (1,130) (1,115) (1,022)
Remaining capacity at December 31, 29,760 31,113 32,228
Amortization of cell construction costs and accrual of cell closure obligations—Landfills are typically comprised of a
number of cells, which are constructed within a defined acreage (or footprint). The cells are typically discrete units, which require
both separate construction and separate capping and closure procedures. Cell construction costs are the costs required to excavate
and construct the landfill cell. These costs are typically amortized on a units-of-consumption basis, such that they are completely
amortized when the specific cell ceases accepting waste. In some instances, the Company has landfills that are engineered and
constructed as "progressive trenches." In progressive trench landfills, a number of contiguous cells form a progressive trench. In
those instances, the Company amortizes cell construction costs over the airspace within the entire trench, such that the cell
construction costs will be fully amortized at the end of the trench useful life.
The design and construction of a landfill does not create a landfill asset retirement obligation. Rather, the asset retirement
obligation for cell closure (the cost associated with capping each cell) is incurred in relatively small increments as waste is placed
in the landfill. Therefore, the cost required to construct the cell cap is capitalized as an asset retirement cost and a liability of an
equal amount is established, based on the discounted cash flow associated with each capping event, as airspace is consumed.
Spending for cell capping is reflected as environmental expenditures within operating activities in the statement of cash flows.
Landfill final closure and post-closure liabilities—The balance of landfill final closure and post-closure liabilities at
December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $37.8 million and $32.4 million, respectively. The Company has material financial commitments
for the costs associated with requirements of the Environmental Protection Agency ("EPA") and the comparable regulatory agency
in Canada for landfill final closure and post-closure activities. In the United States, the landfill final closure
54
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
and post-closure requirements are established under the standards of the EPA, and are implemented and applied on a state-by-state
basis. The Company develops estimates for the cost of these activities based on an evaluation of site-specific facts and
circumstances, including the Company's interpretation of current regulatory requirements and proposed regulatory changes. Such
estimates may change in the future due to various circumstances including, but not limited to, permit modifications, changes in
legislation or regulations, technological changes and results of environmental studies.
Final closure costs are the costs incurred after the site ceases to accept waste, but before the landfill is certified as closed by
the applicable state regulatory agency. These costs generally include the costs required to cap the final cell of the landfill (if not
included in cell closure), the costs required to dismantle certain structures for landfills and other landfill improvements, and
regulation-mandated groundwater monitoring, and leachate management. Post-closure costs involve the maintenance and
monitoring of a landfill site that has been certified closed by the applicable regulatory agency. These costs generally include
groundwater monitoring and leachate management. Regulatory post-closure periods are generally 30 years after landfill closure.
Final closure and post-closure obligations are accrued on a units-of-consumption basis, such that the present value of the final
closure and post-closure obligations are fully accrued at the date the landfill discontinues accepting waste.
Cell closure, final closure and post-closure costs (also referred to as "asset retirement obligations") are calculated by
estimating the total obligation in current dollars, adjusted for inflation (1.02% during 2018 and 2017) and discounted at the
Company's credit-adjusted risk-free interest rate (5.66% and 6.32% during 2018 and 2017, respectively.)
Non-Landfill Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities
Non-landfill closure costs include costs required to dismantle and decontaminate certain structures and other costs incurred
during the closure process. Post-closure costs, if required, include associated maintenance and monitoring costs as required by the
closure permit. Post-closure periods are performance-based and are not generally specified in terms of years in the closure permit,
but generally range from 10 to 30 years or more.
The Company records its non-landfill closure and post-closure liability by: (i) estimating the current cost of closing a non-
landfill facility and the post-closure care of that facility, if required, based upon the closure plan that the Company is required to
follow under its operating permit, or in the event the facility operates with a permit that does not contain a closure plan, based upon
legally enforceable closure commitments made by the Company to various governmental agencies; (ii) using probability scenarios
as to when in the future operations may cease; (iii) inflating the current cost of closing the non-landfill facility on a probability
weighted basis using the inflation rate to the time of closing under each probability scenario; and (iv) discounting the future value
of each closing scenario back to the present using the credit-adjusted risk-free interest rate. Non-landfill closure and post-closure
obligations arise when the Company commences non-landfill facility operations. The carrying value of non-landfill closure and
post-closure liabilities at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $32.1 million and $28.6 million, respectively.
The estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities are inherently uncertain due to the possibility that permit and
regulatory requirements will change in the future, impacting the estimation of total costs and the timing of the expenditures.
Management reviews non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities for changes to key assumptions that would impact the amount
of the recorded liabilities. Changes that would prompt management to revise a liability estimate include changes in legal
requirements that impact the Company's expected closure plan or scope of work, in the market price of a significant cost item, in
the probability scenarios as to when future operations at a location might cease, or in the expected timing of the cost. Changes in
estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure events immediately impact the required liability and the value of the
corresponding asset. If a change is made to a fully-consumed asset, the adjustment is charged immediately to expense. When a
change in estimate relates to an asset that has not been fully consumed, the adjustment to the asset recognized in income
prospectively as a component of amortization. Historically, material changes to non-landfill closure and post-closure estimates have
been infrequent.
Remedial Liabilities
The balance of remedial liabilities at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was $121.0 million and $124.5 million, respectively.
Remedial liabilities, including Superfund liabilities, include the costs of removal or containment of contaminated material,
treatment of potentially contaminated groundwater and maintenance and monitoring costs necessary to comply with regulatory
requirements. Most of the Company's remedial liabilities relate to the active and inactive hazardous waste treatment and disposal
facilities which the Company acquired in the last 16 years and Superfund sites owned by third parties for which the Company, or
the prior owners of certain of the Company's facilities for which the Company may have certain indemnification
55
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
obligations, have been identified as potentially responsible parties ("PRPs") or potential PRPs. The Company's estimate of remedial
liabilities involved an analysis of such factors as: (i) the nature and extent of environmental contamination (if any); (ii) the terms of
applicable permits and agreements with regulatory authorities as to cleanup procedures and whether modifications to such permits
and agreements will likely need to be negotiated; (iii) the cost of performing anticipated cleanup activities based upon current
technology; and (iv) in the case of Superfund and other sites where other parties will also be responsible for a portion of the
cleanup costs, the likely allocation of such costs and the ability of such other parties to pay their share. The measurement of
remedial liabilities is reviewed at least quarterly and changes in estimates are recognized when identified.
The Company periodically evaluates potential remedial liabilities at sites that it owns or operates or to which the Company or
the sellers of the CSD assets (or the respective predecessors of the Company or such sellers) transported or disposed of waste,
including 128 Superfund sites as of December 31, 2018. The Company periodically reviews and evaluates sites requiring
remediation, including Superfund sites, giving consideration to the nature (i.e., owner, operator, arranger, transporter or generator)
and the extent (i.e., amount and nature of waste hauled to the location, number of years of site operations or other relevant factors)
of the Company's (or such sellers') alleged connection with the site, the extent (if any) to which the Company believes it may have
an obligation to indemnify cleanup costs in connection with the site, the regulatory context surrounding the site, the accuracy and
strength of evidence connecting the Company (or such sellers) to the location, the number, connection and financial ability of other
named and unnamed potentially responsible parties ("PRPs") and the nature and estimated cost of the likely remedy. Where the
Company concludes that it is probable that a liability has been incurred and an amount can be estimated, a provision is made, based
upon management's judgment and prior experience, of such estimated liability.
Remedial liabilities are inherently difficult to estimate. Estimating remedial liabilities requires that the existing environmental
contamination be understood. There are risks that the actual quantities of contaminants differ from the results of the site
investigation, and that contaminants exist that have not been identified by the site investigation. In addition, the amount of remedial
liabilities recorded is dependent on the remedial method selected. There is a risk that funds will be expended on a remedial solution
that is not successful, which could result in the additional incremental costs of an alternative solution. Such estimates, which are
subject to change, are subsequently revised if and when additional or new information becomes available.
Remedial liabilities are discounted only when the timing of the payments is determinable and the amounts are estimable.
Management's experience has been that the timing of payments for remedial liabilities is not usually estimable, and therefore the
amounts of remedial liabilities are not generally discounted. In the case of remedial liabilities assumed in connection with
acquisitions, acquired liabilities are recorded at fair value as of the dates of the acquisitions calculated by inflating costs in current
dollars using an estimate of future inflation rates as of the respective acquisition dates until the expected time of payment, and then
discounting the amount of the payments to their present value using a risk-free discount rate as of the acquisition dates. Discounts
have been and will be applied to the remedial liabilities as follows:
•Remedial liabilities assumed relating to acquisitions are and will continue to be inflated using the inflation rates at the time
of each acquisition (ranging from 1.01% to 2.57%) until the expected time of payment, then discounted at the risk-free
interest rate at the time of such acquisition (ranging from 1.37% to 5.99%).
•Remedial liabilities incurred subsequent to the acquisitions and remedial liabilities of the Company that existed prior to
the acquisitions have been and will continue to be recorded at the estimated current value of the liabilities, which is
usually neither increased for inflation nor reduced for discounting.
Foreign Currency
The Company has operations in Canada. The functional currencies of those operations are their local currency and therefore
assets and liabilities of those foreign operations are translated to U.S. dollars at the exchange rate in effect at the balance sheet date
and revenue and expenses at the average exchange rate for the period. Gains and losses from the translation of the consolidated
financial statements of foreign subsidiaries into U.S. dollars are included in stockholders' equity as a component of accumulated
other comprehensive loss. Gains and losses resulting from foreign currency transactions are recognized in the consolidated
statements of operations. Recorded balances that are denominated in a currency other than the functional currency are remeasured
to the functional currency using the exchange rate at the balance sheet date and gains or losses are recorded in the statements of
operations.
56
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
Advertising Expense
Advertising costs are expensed as incurred. Advertising expense was approximately $10.5 million in 2018, $11.8 million in
2017 and $10.8 million in 2016.
Stock-Based Compensation
Stock-based compensation cost is measured at the grant date based on the fair value of the award and is recognized as expense
over the requisite service period, which generally represents the vesting period. In addition, the Company issues awards with
performance targets which are recognized as expense over the requisite service period when management believes it is probable
those targets will be achieved. The fair value of the Company's grants of restricted stock are based on the quoted market price for
the Company's common stock on the respective dates of grant. Forfeitures are recognized as they occur.
Income Taxes
Current income tax expense approximates cash to be paid or refunded for taxes for the applicable period. Deferred tax
expense or benefit is the result of changes between deferred tax assets and liabilities. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are
determined based upon the temporary differences between the financial statement basis and tax basis of assets and liabilities as well
as from net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards as measured by the enacted tax rates, which will be in effect when these
differences reverse. The effect of a change in tax rates on deferred tax assets and liabilities is generally recognized in income in the
period that includes the enactment date. The Company evaluates the recoverability of future tax deductions and credits and a
valuation allowance is established by tax jurisdiction when, based on an evaluation of both positive and negative objective
verifiable evidence, it is more likely than not that some portion or all of deferred tax assets will not be realized.
The Company recognizes and measures a tax benefit from uncertain tax positions when it is more likely than not that the tax
position will be sustained on examination by the taxing authorities, based on the technical merits of the position. The Company
recognizes a liability for unrecognized tax benefits resulting from uncertain tax positions taken or expected to be taken in a tax
return. The Company adjusts these liabilities when its judgment changes as a result of the evaluation of new information not
previously available. Due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may result in a payment that is
materially different from the current estimate or future recognition of an unrecognized benefit. These differences will be reflected
as increases or decreases to income tax expense in the period in which they are determined.
The Company recognizes interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits within the income tax expense line in the
consolidated statements of operations. Accrued interest and penalties are included within deferred taxes, unrecognized tax benefits
and other long-term liabilities line in the consolidated balance sheet.
Earnings per Share ("EPS")
Basic EPS is calculated by dividing net income by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the
period. Diluted EPS gives effect to all potentially dilutive common shares that were outstanding during the period.
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
Standards implemented
In May 2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") issued ASU 2014-09, Revenue from Contracts with
Customers (Topic 606), which replaces numerous requirements in U.S. GAAP, including industry-specific requirements, and
provides companies with a single revenue recognition model for recognizing revenue from contracts with customers.
On January 1, 2018, the Company adopted Topic 606 using the modified retrospective method for all contracts. Results for
reporting periods beginning on the date of adoption are presented under ASC 606, while prior period amounts have not been
adjusted and continue to be reported in accordance with the Company's historical accounting methodology pursuant to ASC 605,
Revenue Recognition. The only significant impact from the adoption of this standard relates to incremental disclosures now
required. Upon adoption, a cumulative effect adjustment was not recorded.
In January 2016, FASB issued ASU 2016-01, Financial Instruments - Overall (Subtopic 825-10): Recognition and
Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities. The amendment requires equity investments (except those accounted
for under the equity method of accounting, or those that result in consolidation of the investee) to be measured at fair value with
changes in fair value recognized in net income. The Company adopted the amendment in the fourth quarter of 2018,
57
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES (Continued)
which resulted in a $1.4 million charge to other (expense) income, net for the change in fair value of equity securities purchased in
2018.
In October 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-16, Income Tax - Intra-Entity Transfers of Assets Other than Inventory. The
amendment improves the accounting for the income tax consequences of intra-entity transfers of assets other than inventory. The
Company adopted this standard on a modified retrospective basis effective January 1, 2018. As a result of adoption, the Company
recorded a cumulative effect adjustment that reduced retained earnings by $1.6 million. The impact on the annual provision for
income taxes was not material.
In August 2017, the FASB issued ASU 2017-12, Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted Improvements to Accounting
for Hedging Activities. The amendment better aligns an entity’s risk management activities and financial reporting for hedging
relationships through changes to both the designation and measurement guidance for qualifying hedging relationships and the
presentation of hedge results. The Company adopted the amendment in the third quarter of 2018. Adoption did not have a material
impact on the Company's consolidated financial statements.
Standards to be implemented
The Company is evaluating the impact that the below standards to be implemented will have on the Company's consolidated
financial statements.
In February 2016, FASB issued ASU 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842). The amendment increases transparency and comparability
among organizations by recognizing lease assets and lease liabilities on the balance sheet and disclosing key information about
leasing arrangements. The Company is currently finalizing the accounting and internal controls relative to this new pronouncement
and will adopt Topic 842 and related amendments on January 1, 2019 using the modified retrospective method of adoption. The
Company expects to elect most of the available practical expedients, including the package of practical expedients, which permits
entities not to reassess under the new standard their prior conclusions about lease identification, lease classification and initial
direct costs. In preparation for adoption of the standard, the Company has implemented internal controls and key system
functionality to enable the preparation of financial information. The Company has concluded that the adoption of this standard will
have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated balance sheets related to the recognition of right-of-use assets and lease
liabilities, but is not expected to have a material impact on the consolidated statements of operations or cash flows. On adoption,
the Company currently expects to recognize additional right-of-use assets and lease obligations in the range of $180.0 million to
$220.0 million.
(3) REVENUES
Revenue Recognition
The Company generates services and product revenues through the following operating segments: Environmental Services
and Safety-Kleen. The Company recognizes revenue when control of the promised goods or services is transferred to the
Company's customers, in an amount that reflects the consideration the Company expects to be entitled to in exchange for those
goods or services. Product revenues are recognized when the products are delivered and control transfers to the customer.
Nature of Goods and Services
The majority of the Company’s contracts are for services, which are recognized based on time and materials incurred at
contractually agreed-upon rates. The Company’s payment terms vary by the type and location of its customers and the products or
services offered. The periods between invoicing and when payments are due are not significant. For all periods presented, any
amounts billed to customers related to shipping and handling are classified as revenue and the Company's shipping and handling
costs are included in costs of revenues. In the course of the Company's operations, it collects sales tax and other excise taxes from
its customers and recognizes a current liability which is then relieved when the taxes are remitted to the appropriate governmental
authorities. The Company excludes sales and other excise taxes that it collects from customers from its revenues.
58
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(3) REVENUES (Continued)
Disaggregation of Revenue
The following table presents the Company’s third party revenues disaggregated by revenue source (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
 Environmental
Services  Safety-Kleen  Corporate  Total
Primary Geographical Markets      
United States  $ 1,598,402 $ 1,196,661 $ 1,082 $ 2,796,145
Canada  405,441 98,694 23 504,158
Total third party revenues  $ 2,003,843 $ 1,295,355 $ 1,105 $ 3,300,303
     
Sources of Revenue (1)      
Technical Services  $ 1,037,388 $ — $ — $ 1,037,388
Field and Emergency Response Services  304,727 — — 304,727
Industrial Services  541,895 — — 541,895
Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other  119,833 — 1,105 120,938
Safety-Kleen Environmental Services  — 795,077 — 795,077
Kleen Performance Products  — 500,278 — 500,278
Total third party revenues  $ 2,003,843 $ 1,295,355 $ 1,105 $ 3,300,303
_____________________
1.All revenue except oil and oil product sales within Kleen Performance Products and product sales within Safety-Kleen
Environmental Services, which include various automotive related fluids, shop supplies and direct blended oil sales, are
recognized over time. Kleen Performance Products and Safety-Kleen Environmental Services product sales are recognized
at a point in time.
Technical Services. Technical Services revenues are generated from fees charged for waste material management and disposal
services including onsite environmental management services, collection and transportation, packaging, recycling, treatment and
disposal of waste. Revenue is primarily generated by short-term projects, most of which are governed by master service agreements
that are long-term in nature. These master service agreements are typically entered into with the Company's larger customers and
outline the pricing and legal frameworks for such arrangements. Services are provided based on purchase orders or agreements with
the customer and include prices based upon units of volume of waste, and transportation and other fees. Collection and
transportation revenues are recognized over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are
being performed and the Company has a right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method
to recognize revenue over time, based on time and materials incurred. Revenues for treatment and disposal of waste are recognized
upon completion of treatment, final disposition in a landfill or incineration, or when the waste is shipped to a third party for
processing and disposal. The Company periodically enters into bundled arrangements for the collection and transportation and
disposal of waste. For such arrangements, transportation and disposal are considered distinct performance obligations and the
Company allocates revenue to each based on their relative standalone selling price (i.e. the estimated price that a customer would
pay for the services on a standalone basis). Revenues from waste that is not yet completely processed and disposed and the related
costs are deferred. The revenue is recognized and the deferred costs are expensed when the related services are completed. The
period between collection and transportation and the final processing and disposal ranges depending on location of the customer,
but generally is measured in days.
Field and Emergency Response Services. Field Services revenues are generated from cleanup services at customer sites,
including municipalities and utilities, or other locations on a scheduled or emergency response basis. Services include confined
space entry for tank cleaning, site decontamination, large remediation projects, demolition, spill cleanup on land and water, railcar
cleaning, product recovery and transfer and vacuum services. Additional services include filtration and water treatment services.
Response services for environmental emergencies include any scale from man-made disasters such as oil spills, to natural disasters
such as hurricanes. These services are provided based on purchase orders or agreements with customers and include prices
generally based upon daily, hourly or job rates for equipment, materials and personnel. The Company recognizes revenue for these
services over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the service as they are being performed and the Company
has a right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to
59
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(3) REVENUES (Continued)
recognize revenue over time, based on time and materials incurred. The duration of such services can be over a number of hours,
several days or even months for larger scale projects.
Industrial Services. Industrial Services revenues are generated from industrial and specialty services provided to refineries,
mines, upgraders, chemical plants, pulp and paper mills, manufacturing facilities, power generation facilities and other industrial
customers throughout North America. Services include in-plant cleaning and maintenance services, plant outage and turnaround
services, decoking and pigging, chemical cleaning, high and ultra-high pressure water cleaning, pipeline inspection and coating
services, large tank and surface impoundment cleaning, oilfield transport, daylighting, production services and directional boring
services (previously included in Oil, Gas and Lodging service offerings) supporting drilling, completions and production programs.
These services are provided based on purchase orders or agreements with the customer and include prices based upon daily, hourly
or job rates for equipment, materials and personnel. The Company recognizes revenue for these services over time, as the customer
receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are being performed and the Company has a right to payment for
performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to recognize revenue over time, based on time and materials
incurred.
Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other. Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other is primarily comprised of revenues
generated from providing Oil and Gas Field Services that support upstream activities such as exploration and drilling for oil and gas
companies and Lodging Services to customers in Western Canada. The Company recognizes Oil and Gas Field Services revenue
over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are being performed and the Company has a
right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to recognize revenue over time, based on
time and materials incurred. Revenue for lodging accommodation services is recognized over time based on passage of time.
Safety-Kleen Environmental Services. Safety-Kleen Environmental Services revenues are generated from providing parts
washer services, containerized waste handling and disposal services, oil collection services, direct sales of blended oil products, and
other complementary services and product sales. Containerized waste services consist of profiling, collecting, transporting and
recycling or disposing of a wide variety of waste. Other products and services include vacuum services, sale of complementary
supply products including automotive fluids and shop supplies and other environmental services. Revenues from parts washer
services include fees charged to customers for their use of parts washer equipment, to clean and maintain parts washer equipment
and to remove and replace used cleaning fluids. Parts washer services are considered a single performance obligation due to the
highly integrated and interdependent nature of the arrangement. Revenue from parts washer services is recognized over the service
interval as the customer receives the benefit of the services. Collection and transportation revenues are recognized over time, as the
customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are being performed and the Company has a right to payment
for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to recognize revenue over time, based on time and
materials incurred. Product revenue is recognized upon the transfer of control whereby control transfers when the products are
delivered to the customer.
Kleen Performance Products. Kleen Performance Products revenues are generated from sales of high quality base and
blended lubricating oils to third-party distributors, government agencies, fleets, railroads and industrial customers. The business
also sells recycled fuel oil to asphalt plants, industrial plants, blenders, pulp and paper companies, vacuum gas oil producers and
marine diesel oil producers. Revenue for oil products is recognized at a point in time, upon the transfer of control. Control transfers
when the products are delivered to the customer.
Contract Balances
  December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Receivables  $ 606,952 $ 528,924
Contract Assets (Unbilled Receivables)  54,794 35,922
Contract Liabilities (Deferred Revenue)  61,843 67,822
The timing of revenue recognition, billings and cash collections results in billed accounts receivable, unbilled receivables
(contract assets), and customer advances and deposits or deferred revenue (contract liabilities) on the Consolidated Balance Sheet.
Generally, billing occurs subsequent to revenue recognition, as a right to payment is not just subject to passage of time, resulting in
contract assets. Contract assets are generally classified as current. The Company sometimes receives advances or deposits from its
customers before revenue is recognized, resulting in contract liabilities. These assets and liabilities are
60
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(3) REVENUES (Continued)
reported on the Consolidated Balance Sheet on a contract-by-contract basis at the end of each reporting period. As part of the
acquisition of the Veolia Business (as defined in Note 4, "Business Combinations") on February 23, 2018, the Company acquired
receivables and contract assets of $20.8 million and $17.4 million, respectively. Changes in the contract asset and liability balances
during the years ended December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017 were not materially impacted by any other
factors. The contract liability balances at the beginning of each period presented were generally fully recognized in the subsequent
three-month period.
Variable Consideration
The nature of the Company's contracts give rise to certain types of variable consideration, including in limited cases volume
discounts. Accordingly, management establishes a revenue allowance to cover the estimated amounts of revenue that may need to
be credited to customers' accounts in future periods. The Company estimates the amount of variable consideration to include in the
estimated transaction price based on historical experience, anticipated performance and its best judgment at the time and to the
extent it is probable that a significant reversal of cumulative revenue recognized will not occur when the uncertainty associated
with the variable consideration is resolved.
Contract Costs
Contract costs include direct and incremental costs to obtain or fulfill a contract. The Company’s contract costs that are
subject to capitalization are comprised of costs associated with parts washer services and costs associated with the treatment and
disposal of waste. Parts washer costs include costs of solvent, commissions paid relating to revenue generated from parts washer
services, and transportation costs associated with transferring the product picked up from the services as it is returned to the
Company’s facilities or a third party site. Costs related to the treatment of waste include costs for waste receiving, drum movement
and storage, waste consolidation and transportation between facilities. Deferred costs associated with parts washer services are
amortized ratably over the average service interval, which ranges between seven and 14 weeks. Deferred costs related to treatment
and disposal of waste are recognized when the corresponding waste is disposed of and are included in deferred costs within total
current assets in the Company’s consolidated balance sheets. The deferred contract cost balances at the beginning of each period
presented were fully recognized in cost of revenue in the subsequent three-month period.
Prior Accounting
Prior to January 1, 2018 and the adoption of ASC 606, the Company recognized revenue when persuasive evidence of an
arrangement existed, delivery had occurred or services had been rendered, the price was fixed or determinable, and collection was
reasonably assured. Management established a revenue allowance to cover the estimated amounts of revenue that may need to be
credited to customers' accounts in future periods due to discounts, billing disputes and other adjustments. The Company recorded a
provision for revenue allowances based on specific review of particular customers, historical trends and other relevant information.
(4) BUSINESS COMBINATIONS
2018 Acquisitions
On August 31, 2018, the Company acquired a privately-owned company which expands the environmental services and waste
oil capabilities of the Company for a $27.3 million purchase price, net of cash. The acquired company is included in the Safety-
Kleen and Environmental Services segments. In connection with this acquisition, a preliminary goodwill amount of $15.8 million
was recognized. The results of operations of this acquired business were not material in 2018.
On February 23, 2018, the Company completed the acquisition of the U.S. Industrial Cleaning Business of Veolia
Environmental Services North America LLC (the "Veolia Business"). The acquisition provides significant scale and industrial
services capabilities while increasing the size of the Company's existing U.S. Industrial Services business. The Company acquired
the Veolia Business for a preliminary purchase price of $124.0 million, which remains subject to certain post-closing adjustments.
The amount of revenue from the Veolia Business included in the Company's results of operations for the year ended December 31,
2018 was $154.0 million. The amount of pre-tax loss from the Veolia Business included in the Company's results of operations for
the year ended December 31, 2018 was $0.9 million, which included $14.6 million in depreciation expense as well as $0.6 million
of amortization expense related to intangible assets. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company incurred acquisition-
related costs of approximately $1.4 million in connection with the transaction which
61
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(4) BUSINESS COMBINATIONS (Continued)
are included in selling, general and administrative expenses in the consolidated statements of operations. The Veolia Business is
included in the Environmental Services segment.
The components and preliminary allocation of the purchase price for the Veolia Business consist of the following amounts (in
thousands):
 At Acquisition Date
As Reported
December 31, 2018
Accounts receivable, including unbilled receivable $ 38,201
Inventories and supplies 1,126
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 828
Property, plant and equipment 72,243
Permits and other intangibles 5,140
Current liabilities (18,025)
Closure and post-closure liabilities (354)
Total identifiable net assets 99,159
Goodwill 24,873
Total purchase price $ 124,032
The weighted average amortization period for the intangibles acquired is 8.2 years. The excess of the total purchase price,
which includes the aggregate cash consideration paid in excess of the fair value of the tangible net assets and intangible assets
acquired, was recorded as goodwill. The goodwill recognized is attributable to the expected operating synergies and growth
potential that the Company expects to realize from this acquisition. Goodwill generated from the acquisition is deductible for tax
purposes.
Pro forma revenue and earnings amounts on a combined basis as if these acquisitions had been completed on January 1, 2017
are immaterial to the consolidated financial statements of the Company since that date.
2017 Acquisitions
On July 14, 2017, the Company acquired Lonestar West Inc. ("Lonestar"), a public company headquartered in Alberta,
Canada, for approximately CAD $41.8 million, ($33.1 million USD), net of cash acquired, which included an equity payout of
CAD $0.72 per share to Lonestar shareholders and the assumption of approximately CAD $21.3 million ($16.8 million USD) in
outstanding debt, which Clean Harbors subsequently repaid. The acquisition supports the Company's growth in the daylighting and
hydro excavation services markets. In addition to increasing the size of the Company's hydro vac fleet, Lonestar's network of
locations provides the Company with direct access to key geographic markets in both the United States and Canada. The acquired
company is included in the Environmental Services segment. In connection with this acquisition a goodwill amount of $2.8 million
was recognized.
On January 31, 2017, the Company acquired a privately held company for a purchase price of approximately $11.9 million in
cash, net of cash acquired. The acquired business produces and distributes oil products and therefore complements the Company's
closed loop model as it relates to the sale of its oil products. The acquired company is included in the Safety-Kleen segment. In
connection with this acquisition a goodwill amount of $5.0 million was recognized.
The combined amount of direct revenue from the acquisitions included in the Company's results of operations for the year
ended December 31, 2017 was approximately $14.5 million. Pro forma revenue and earnings amounts on a combined basis as if
these acquisitions had been completed on January 1, 2016 are immaterial to the consolidated financial statements of the Company
since that date.
62
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(4) BUSINESS COMBINATIONS (Continued)
2016 Acquisitions
During 2016, the Company acquired seven businesses that complement the strategy to create a closed loop model as it relates
to the sale of the Company's oil products. These acquisitions provided the Company with three additional oil re-refineries while
also expanding its used motor oil collection network and providing greater blending and packaging capabilities. These acquisitions
also provide the Company with greater access to customers in the West Coast region of the United States and additional locations
with Part B permits. Operations of these acquisitions were primarily integrated into the Safety-Kleen operating segment with
certain operations also integrated into the Environmental Services segment.
The combined purchase price for the seven acquisitions was $204.8 million paid in cash and subject to customary post-
closing adjustments. The combined amount of direct revenue from the acquisitions included in the Company's results of operations
for the year ended December 31, 2016 was approximately $69.8 million. Upon acquisition, the acquired entities were immediately
integrated into the Company's operating segments. Therefore it is impracticable to measure earnings attributable to the acquired
businesses. During the year ended December 31, 2016, the Company incurred acquisition-related costs of approximately $1.7
million in connection with the transactions which are included in selling, general and administrative expenses in the consolidated
statements of operations.
The allocation of the purchase price was based on estimates of the fair value of assets acquired and liabilities assumed as of
the acquisition dates. The Company believes that such information provides a reasonable basis for estimating the fair values of
assets acquired and liabilities assumed. The Company finalized the purchase accounting for the seven acquisitions in the second
quarter of 2017.
The allocation of the purchase price consists of the following amounts (in thousands):
 Final Allocation
Accounts receivable $ 16,242
Inventories and supplies 12,688
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 752
Property, plant and equipment 143,916
Permits and other intangibles 28,856
Current liabilities (19,905)
Closure and post-closure liabilities, less current portion (3,004)
Remedial liabilities, less current portion (2,545)
Deferred taxes, unrecognized tax benefits and other long-term liabilities (20,219)
Total identifiable net assets 156,781
Goodwill 47,977
Total purchase price, net of cash acquired $ 204,758
The excess of the total purchase price, which includes the aggregate cash consideration paid in excess of the fair value of the
tangible net assets and intangible assets acquired, was recorded as goodwill. The goodwill recognized is attributable to the expected
operating synergies and growth potential that the Company expects to realize from these acquisitions. Goodwill generated from the
acquisitions was not deductible for tax purposes.
(5) DISPOSITION OF BUSINESSES
2017 Disposition
On June 30, 2017, the Company completed the sale of its Transformer Services business, as part of its continuous focus on
improving or divesting certain non-core operations. The Transformer Services business was a non-core business previously
included within the former Technical Services operating segment and was sold for $45.5 million ($43.4 million net of $2.1 million
in transactional related costs). As a result of the sale, the Company recognized during the year ended December 31,
63
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(5) DISPOSITION OF BUSINESSES (Continued)
2017, a pre-tax gain of $30.7 million which was included in gain on sale of business in the Company’s consolidated statement of
operations.
The following table presents the carrying amounts of the Company's Transformer Services business that was disposed of on
June 30, 2017 (in thousands):
 June 30, 2017
Total current assets $ 7,241
Property, plant and equipment, net 8,773
Total other assets 1,681
Total assets divested 17,695
Total current liabilities 3,849
Total other liabilities 1,170
Total liabilities divested 5,019
Net carrying value divested $ 12,676
The Company evaluated the disposition and determined it did not meet the “major effect” criteria for classification as a
discontinued operation largely due to the nature and size of the operations of the disposed entity. However, the Company
determined that the disposition represented an individually significant component of the Company’s business. The following table
presents income attributable to the Transformer Services business included in the Company's consolidated results of operations for
each of the periods shown and through its disposition on June 30, 2017 (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2017 2016
Income before provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 2,771$ 4,187
2016 Disposition
On September 1, 2016, the Company completed the sale of its Catalyst Services business, which was a non-core business
previously included within the former Industrial Services operating segment, for approximately $50.6 million ($49.2 million net of
cash retained by the Catalyst Services business). As a result of the sale, the Company recognized during the year ended December
31, 2016, a pre-tax gain of $16.9 million which was included in gain on sale of business in the Company’s consolidated statement
of operations. Inclusive within this gain was $1.6 million of transactional related costs. During the first quarter of 2017, the
Company and the buyer of the Catalyst Services business agreed to final working capital amounts and as a result the Company
received $2.0 million of final sale proceeds.
64
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(5) DISPOSITION OF BUSINESSES (Continued)
The following table presents the carrying amounts of the Company's Catalyst Services business immediately preceding the
disposition on September 1, 2016 (in thousands):
 September 1, 2016
Total current assets $ 19,019
Property, plant and equipment, net 11,154
Total other assets 6,500
Total assets divested 36,673
Total current liabilities 4,040
Total other liabilities 566
Total liabilities divested 4,606
Net carrying value divested $ 32,067
The Company evaluated the disposition and determined it did not meet the “major effect” criteria for classification as a
discontinued operation largely due to the nature and size of the operations of the disposed of entity. However, the Company
determined that the disposition did represent an individually significant component of its business. The following table presents
income attributable to the Catalyst Services business included in the Company's consolidated results of operations for the period
shown and through its disposition on September 1, 2016 (in thousands):
 For the year ended
December 31,
 2016
Income before provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 290
(6) INVENTORIES AND SUPPLIES
Inventories and supplies consisted of the following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Oil and oil related products $ 70,823 $ 58,142
Supplies and drums 104,609 94,242
Solvent and solutions 10,657 9,167
Modular camp accommodations — 1,826
Other 13,390 12,635
Total inventories and supplies $ 199,479 $ 176,012
Supplies and drums consist primarily of drums and containers used in providing the Company's products and services as well
as critical spare parts to support the Company's incinerator and re-refinery operations. Other inventories consisted primarily of parts
washer components, cleaning fluids, absorbents and automotive fluids, such as windshield washer fluid and antifreeze.
65
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(7) PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment consisted of the following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Land $ 123,734$ 121,658
Asset retirement costs (non-landfill) 15,148 14,593
Landfill assets 154,918 144,539
Buildings and improvements 440,188 414,384
Camp and lodging equipment 152,998 170,012
Vehicles 721,735 617,959
Equipment 1,697,490 1,644,102
Furniture and fixtures 5,453 5,708
Construction in progress 20,931 57,618
 3,332,595 3,190,573
Less - accumulated depreciation and amortization 1,770,617 1,603,208
Total property, plant and equipment, net $ 1,561,978$ 1,587,365
Interest in the amount of $0.6 million, $0.6 million and $5.5 million was capitalized to property, plant and equipment during
the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively. Depreciation expense, inclusive of landfill amortization was
$264.3 million, $251.4 million and $247.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
(8) GOODWILL AND OTHER INTANGIBLE ASSETS
The changes in goodwill for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows (in thousands):
 Environmental
Services Safety-Kleen Totals
Balance at January 1, 2017 $ 169,084$ 296,070$ 465,154
Increase from current period acquisitions 3,000 5,687 8,687
Measurement period adjustments from prior period acquisitions — 2,186 2,186
Decrease from disposition of business (1,300) — (1,300)
Foreign currency translation 1,602 2,194 3,796
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 172,386$ 306,137$ 478,523
Increase from current period acquisitions 37,007 3,697 40,704
Measurement period adjustments from prior period acquisitions (78) — (78)
Foreign currency translation (2,296) (2,664) (4,960)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 207,019$ 307,170$ 514,189
The Company assesses goodwill for impairment on an annual basis as of December 31, or at an interim date when events or
changes in the business environment would more likely than not reduce the fair value of a reporting unit below its carrying value.
The Company conducted its annual impairment test of goodwill as of December 31, 2018 and determined that no adjustment
to the carrying value of goodwill for any reporting unit was then necessary because the fair values of the reporting units exceeded
their respective carrying values. The fair value of all reporting units was determined using an income approach based upon
estimates of future discounted cash flows. The resulting estimates of fair value were validated through the consideration of other
factors such as the fair value of comparable companies to the reporting units and a reconciliation of the sum of all estimated fair
values of the reporting units to the Company’s overall market capitalization. In all cases, the estimated fair values of the reporting
units significantly exceeded their carrying values.
66
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(8) GOODWILL AND OTHER INTANGIBLE ASSETS (Continued)
Significant judgments and unobservable inputs categorized as Level 3 in the fair value hierarchy are inherent in the
impairment tests performed and include assumptions about the amount and timing of expected future cash flows, growth rates, and
the determination of appropriate discount rates. Level 3 inputs are unobservable inputs for the asset or liability in which there is
little, if any, market activity for the asset or liability at the measurement date. The Company believes that the assumptions used in
its annual and any interim date impairment tests are reasonable, but variations in any of the assumptions may result in different
calculations of fair values.
The impacts of any adverse business and market conditions which impact the overall performance of the Company's reporting
units will continue to be monitored. If the Company's reporting units do not achieve the financial performance that the Company
expects, it is possible that goodwill impairment charges may result. There can therefore be no assurance that future events will not
result in an impairment of goodwill.
At December 31, 2018, the total of accumulated goodwill impairment charges was $189.4 million, of which $34.0 million
was recorded during the year ended December 31, 2016 within the Environmental Services reporting unit, due to economic
conditions in Western Canada's Oil Sands region and the impacts on the Company's lodging operations.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company's finite-lived and indefinite-lived intangible assets consisted of the
following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
 CostAccumulated
Amortization Net  Cost  Accumulated
Amortization Net
Permits $177,583$ 79,358$ 98,225 $174,721 $ 74,347$100,374
Customer and supplier relationships 393,487 179,824 213,663 399,224 158,972 240,252
Other intangible assets 37,262 29,743 7,519 36,766 31,592 5,174
Total amortizable permits and other
intangible assets 608,332 288,925 319,407 610,711 264,911 345,800
Trademarks and trade names 122,468 — 122,468 123,328 — 123,328
Total permits and other intangible assets $730,800$288,925$441,875 $734,039 $264,911$469,128
The Company regularly monitors and assesses whether events or changes in circumstances relative to the Company's business
might indicate that future cash flows attributable to the Company's asset groups may not be sufficient to recover the current value
of those assets. During the year ended and as of December 31, 2018, there were no events or changes in circumstances which
would indicate that the carrying values of the Company's asset groups would not be recoverable and thus no impairment charge was
recorded related to the Company's long-lived assets. If expectations of future cash flows were to decrease in the future as a result of
worse than expected or prolonged periods of depressed activity, future impairments may become evident.
Amortization expense of permits and other intangible assets for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 were
$34.4 million, $37.0 million and $40.0 million, respectively.
The expected amortization of the net carrying amount of finite-lived intangible assets at December 31, 2018 is as follows (in
thousands):
Years Ending December 31,Expected
Amortization
2019 $ 33,091
2020 30,195
2021 27,553
2022 27,386
2023 23,468
Thereafter 177,714
 $ 319,407
67
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(9) ACCRUED EXPENSES
Accrued expenses consisted of the following at December 31 (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018  December 31, 2017
Insurance $ 70,217 $ 57,889
Interest 3,930 12,660
Accrued compensation and benefits 77,881 55,861
Income, real estate, sales and other taxes 25,670 27,330
Other 55,707 34,242
 $ 233,405 $ 187,982
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, accrued insurance included health insurance costs of $14.7 million and $9.0 million,
respectively, and accruals for losses under our workers' compensation, comprehensive general liability and vehicle liability self-
insurance programs of $53.9 million and $47.9 million, respectively. The increase in our self-insurance liabilities from the
comparable period in 2017 was primarily due to the acquisition of the Veolia Business, for which the Company assumed workers'
compensation, general liability and vehicle liability claims reserves.
Accrued compensation and benefits increased by $22.0 million from the comparable period in 2017 due to an increase in
variable compensation, which was attributable to greater revenue and earnings achieved in 2018.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, other accrued expenses included accrued legal matters of $7.5 million and $1.4 million,
respectively, and accrued severance charges of $2.7 million and $3.5 million, respectively. The increase in accrued legal matters
was primarily due to the acquisition of the Veolia Business and certain liabilities assumed by the Company. Also included in the
December 31, 2018 other accrued expenses balance was an $8.8 million derivative liability, recorded at fair value, related to the
Company's cash flow hedges.
(10) CLOSURE AND POST-CLOSURE LIABILITIES
The changes to closure and post-closure liabilities (also referred to as "asset retirement obligations") from January 1, 2017
through December 31, 2018 were as follows (in thousands):
 Landfill
Retirement
Liability  Non-Landfill
Retirement
Liability  Total
Balance at January 1, 2017 $ 30,630 $ 27,701 $ 58,331
Liabilities assumed in acquisitions — 59 59
Measurement period adjustments from prior period acquisitions — 596 596
New asset retirement obligations 1,881 — 1,881
Adjustment related to disposition of business — (1,170) (1,170)
Accretion 2,243 2,505 4,748
Changes in estimates recorded to statement of operations (131) (109) (240)
Changes in estimates recorded to balance sheet 364 (591) (227)
Expenditures (2,777) (448) (3,225)
Currency translation and other 172 112 284
Balance at December 31, 2017 32,382 28,655 61,037
Liabilities assumed in acquisitions — 685 685
New asset retirement obligations 2,518 — 2,518
Accretion 2,537 2,567 5,104
Changes in estimates recorded to statement of operations (37) 1,497 1,460
Changes in estimates recorded to balance sheet 1,867 64 1,931
Expenditures (1,224) (1,057) (2,281)
Currency translation and other (234) (289) (523)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 37,809 $ 32,122 $ 69,931
68
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(10) CLOSURE AND POST-CLOSURE LIABILITIES (Continued)
All of the landfill facilities included in the above table were active as of December 31, 2018 and 2017. The 2018
environmental change in estimate recorded to the statement of operations includes $1.2 million related to increased facility closure
costs at one of our locations. There were no significant (benefits) charges in 2017 resulting from changes in estimates for closure
and post-closure liabilities.
New asset retirement obligations incurred during 2018 and 2017 were discounted at the credit-adjusted risk-free rate of
5.66% and 6.32%, respectively.
Anticipated payments (based on current estimated costs and anticipated timing of necessary regulatory approvals to
commence work on closure and post-closure activities) for each of the next five years and thereafter are as follows (in thousands):
Year ending December 31,  
2019 $ 10,574
2020 9,424
2021 10,941
2022 7,626
2023 9,264
Thereafter 271,314
Undiscounted closure and post-closure liabilities 319,143
Less: Discount at credit-adjusted risk-free rate (155,999)
Less: Undiscounted estimated closure and post-closure liabilities relating to airspace not yet consumed (93,213)
Present value of closure and post-closure liabilities $ 69,931
(11) REMEDIAL LIABILITIES
The changes to remedial liabilities from January 1, 2017 through December 31, 2018 were as follows (in thousands):
 Remedial
Liabilities for
Landfill Sites Remedial
Liabilities for
Inactive SitesRemedial
Liabilities
(Including
Superfund) for
Non-Landfill
Operations Total
Balance at January 1, 2017 $ 1,777 $ 64,151$ 62,079 $ 128,007
Measurement period adjustments from prior period
acquisitions — — 504 504
Accretion 86 2,648 1,978 4,712
Changes in estimates recorded to statement of operations (21) (289) 355 45
Expenditures (42) (3,906) (5,792) (9,740)
Currency translation and other — 2,738 (1,798) 940
Balance at December 31, 2017 1,800 65,342 57,326 124,468
Accretion 86 2,745 1,871 4,702
Changes in estimates recorded to statement of operations (1) 130 558 687
Expenditures (47) (3,759) (4,028) (7,834)
Currency translation and other — 857 (1,863) (1,006)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 1,838 $ 65,315$ 53,864 $ 121,017
69
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(11) REMEDIAL LIABILITIES (Continued)
There were no significant (benefits) charges in 2018 and 2017 resulting from changes in estimates for remedial liabilities.
Anticipated payments at December 31, 2018 (based on current estimated costs and anticipated timing of necessary regulatory
approvals to commence work on remedial activities) for each of the next five years and thereafter were as follows (in thousands):
Year ending December 31,  
2019 $ 13,975
2020 15,467
2021 14,593
2022 9,560
2023 8,688
Thereafter 81,453
Undiscounted remedial liabilities 143,736
Less: Discount (22,719)
Total remedial liabilities $ 121,017
Based on currently available facts and legal interpretations, existing technology, and presently enacted laws and regulations,
the Company estimates that its aggregate liabilities as of December 31, 2018 for future remediation relating to all of its owned or
leased facilities and the Superfund sites for which the Company has current or potential future liability is approximately $121.0
million. The Company also estimates that it is reasonably possible that the amount of such total liabilities could be as much as
$22.8 million more. Future changes in either available technology or applicable laws or regulations could affect such estimates of
remedial liabilities. Since the Company's satisfaction of the liabilities will occur over many years, the Company cannot now
reasonably predict the nature or extent of future changes in either available technology or applicable laws or regulations and the
impact that those changes, if any, might have on the current estimates of remedial liabilities.
The following tables show, respectively, (i) the amounts of such estimated liabilities associated with the types of facilities and
sites involved and (ii) the amounts of such estimated liabilities associated with each facility or site which represents at least 5% of
the total and with all other facilities and sites as a group and as of December 31, 2018.
Estimates Based on Type of Facility or Site (in thousands):
Type of Facility or SiteRemedial
Liability  % of Total Reasonably
Possible
Additional
Liabilities(1)
Facilities now used in active conduct of the Company's business (41 facilities) $ 48,506 40.1% $ 11,171
Inactive facilities not now used in active conduct of the Company's business but
most of which were acquired because the assumption of remedial liabilities for
such facilities was part of the purchase price for the CSD assets (35 facilities) 64,344 53.2 10,782
Superfund sites owned by third parties (17 sites) 8,167 6.7 817
Total $ 121,017 100.0% $ 22,770
___________________________________
(1)Amounts represent the high end of the range of management's best estimate of the reasonably possible additional
liabilities.
70
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(11) REMEDIAL LIABILITIES (Continued)
Estimates Based on Amount of Potential Liability (in thousands):
Location Type of Facility or SiteRemedial
Liability  % of TotalReasonably
Possible
Additional
Liabilities(1)
Baton Rouge, LA(2)Closed incinerator and landfill $ 23,314 19.3%$ 3,963
Bridgeport, NJ Closed incinerator 18,616 15.4 2,577
Mercier, Quebec(2)Idled incinerator and legal proceedings 9,809 8.1 1,037
Linden, NJ Operating solvent recycling center 7,487 6.2 790
Various(2) All other incinerators, landfills, wastewater treatment
facilities and service centers (72 facilities) 53,624 44.3 13,586
Various(2) Superfund sites (each representing less than 5% of total
liabilities) owned by third parties (17 sites) 8,167 6.7 817
Total  $ 121,017 100.0%$ 22,770
_________________________________
(1)Amounts represent the high end of the range of management's best estimate of the reasonably possible additional
liabilities.
(2)$17.9 million of the $121.0 million remedial liabilities and $1.8 million of the $22.8 million reasonably possible additional
liabilities include estimates of remediation liabilities related to the legal and administrative proceedings discussed in
Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," as well as other such estimated remedial liabilities.
Revisions to remediation reserve requirements may result in upward or downward adjustments to income from operations in
any given period. The Company believes that its extensive experience in the environmental services business, as well as its
involvement with a large number of sites, provides a reasonable basis for estimating its aggregate liability. It is possible, however,
that technological, regulatory or enforcement developments, the results of environmental studies, or other factors could necessitate
the recording of additional liabilities or the revision of currently recorded liabilities that could be material. The impact of such
future events cannot be estimated at the current time.
(12) FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS
The following table is a summary of the Company's financing arrangements (in thousands):
Current Obligations: December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Senior secured Term Loan Agreement ("Term Loan Agreement") $ 7,535$ 4,000
  
Long-Term Obligations:  
Senior secured Term Loan Agreement due June 30, 2024 $ 734,697$ 394,000
Senior unsecured notes, at 5.25%, due August 1, 2020 ("2020 Notes") — 400,000
Senior unsecured notes, at 5.125%, due June 1, 2021 ("2021 Notes") 845,000 845,000
Long-term obligations, at par $ 1,579,697$ 1,639,000
Unamortized debt issuance costs and premium, net $ (14,676)$ (13,463)
Long-term obligations, at carrying value $ 1,565,021$ 1,625,537
Financing Activities
Senior Secured Term Loans. On April 17, 2018, the Company, and substantially all of the Company's domestic subsidiaries as
guarantors, entered into the first amendment (the “First Amendment”) of the Term Loan Agreement. The First Amendment reduced
the applicable interest rate margin for the Company’s initial term loans (the "Term Loans") outstanding under the Term Loan
Agreement by 25 basis points for both Eurocurrency borrowings and base rate borrowings. After giving effect to the repricing, the
applicable interest rate margins for the Term Loans are 1.75% for Eurocurrency borrowings and 0.75% for base rate borrowings.
71
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(12) FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS (Continued)
On July 19, 2018, the Company, and substantially all of the Company’s domestic subsidiaries as guarantors, entered into an
Incremental Facility Amendment (the “Incremental Facility Amendment”) to the Company’s Term Loan Agreement. The
Incremental Facility Amendment increased the principal amount of the Term Loans outstanding under the Term Loan Agreement by
$350.0 million. Term Loans under the Term Loan Agreement will mature on June 30, 2024 and may be prepaid at any time without
premium or penalty other than customary breakage costs with respect to Eurodollar based loans. The Company’s obligations under
the Term Loan Agreement are guaranteed by all of the Company’s domestic restricted subsidiaries and secured by liens on
substantially all of the assets of the Company and the guarantors. The effective interest rate of the Term Loans on December 31,
2018 was 4.27%.
Concurrently with the closing on July 19, 2018 of the Incremental Facility Amendment, the Company purchased $322.0
million aggregate principal of the 2020 Notes. The total amount paid in purchasing the 2020 Notes was $330.9 million inclusive of
$7.9 million of accrued interest and $1.0 million of debt redemption fees. On August 1, 2018, the Company redeemed the
remaining $78.0 million of outstanding 2020 Notes.
At December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, the fair value of the Term Loan Agreement debt was $707.0 million and
$400.5 million, respectively, based on quoted market prices or other available market data. The fair value of the Term Loan
Agreement debt is considered a Level 2 measure according to the fair value hierarchy.
Senior Unsecured Notes. In 2012, the Company issued $800.0 million aggregate principal amount of 5.25% senior unsecured
notes due August 1, 2020 (the "2020 Notes") with semi-annual fixed interest payments on February 1 and August 1 of each year.
The Company repurchased or redeemed $400.0 million principal amount of the 2020 Notes during 2017 and, as described above,
the Company repurchased or redeemed the remaining $400.0 million principal amount of the 2020 Notes during 2018. At
December 31, 2017, the fair value of the 2020 Notes was $404.6 million based on quoted market prices for the instrument. The fair
value of the 2020 Notes was considered a Level 2 measure according to the fair value hierarchy.
In 2012, the Company issued $600.0 million aggregate principal amount of 5.125% senior unsecured notes due June 1, 2021
(the "2021 Notes") with semi-annual fixed interest payments on June 1 and December 1 of each year. The Company repurchased
$5.0 million principal amount of 2021 Notes during 2014. On March 14, 2016, the Company issued an additional $250.0 million
aggregate principal amount of 2021 Notes as additional notes under the related indenture. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the fair
value of the Company's 2021 Notes was $845.0 million and $855.7 million, respectively, based on quoted market prices or other
available market data. The fair value of the 2021 Notes is considered a Level 2 measure according to the fair value hierarchy. Upon
proper notice to the holders of the 2021 Notes, the Company may presently redeem some or all of the 2021 Notes at par value plus
unpaid interest.
The 2021 Notes and the related indentures contain various customary non-financial covenants and are guaranteed by
substantially all of the Company's current and future domestic restricted subsidiaries. The 2021 Notes are the Company's and the
guarantors' senior unsecured obligations ranking equally with the Company's and the guarantors' existing and future senior
unsecured obligations and senior to any future indebtedness that is expressly subordinated to the 2021 Notes and the guarantees.
The 2021 Notes are effectively subordinated to all of the Company's and the Company subsidiaries' secured indebtedness under the
Company's Term Loan Agreement, revolving credit facility and capital lease obligations to the extent of the value of the assets
securing such secured indebtedness. The 2021 Notes are not guaranteed by the Company's existing and future Canadian or other
foreign subsidiaries, and are structurally subordinated to all indebtedness and other liabilities, including trade payables, of the
Company's subsidiaries that are not guarantors of the 2021 Notes.
Revolving Credit Facility. On November 1, 2016, the Company and one of the Company's subsidiaries (the "Canadian
Borrower") entered into an amended and restated credit agreement for the Company's revolving credit facility with Bank of
America, N.A. (“BofA”), as agent for the lenders under the facility (the "Agent"). Under the amended and restated facility, the
Company has the right to obtain revolving loans and letters of credit for a combined maximum of up to $300.0 million (with a sub-
limit of $250.0 million for letters of credit) and the Canadian Borrower has the right to obtain revolving loans and letters of credit
for a combined maximum of up to $100.0 million (with a $75.0 million sub-limit for letters of credit).  Availability under the U.S.
line is subject to a borrowing base basically comprised of 85% of the eligible accounts receivable of the Company and its U.S.
subsidiaries plus 100% of cash deposited in a controlled account with the Agent, and availability under the Canadian line is subject
to a borrowing base basically comprised of 85% of the eligible accounts receivable of the Company’s Canadian subsidiaries plus
100% of cash deposited in a controlled account with the Agent’s Canadian affiliate. Subject to certain conditions, the facility will
expire on November 1, 2021. 
72
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(12) FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS (Continued)
Borrowings under the revolving credit facility bear interest at a rate of, at the Company’s option, either (i) LIBOR plus an
applicable margin ranging from 1.25% to 1.50% per annum based primarily on the level of the Company’s average liquidity for the
most recent 30 day period or (ii) BofA’s base rate plus an applicable margin ranging from 0.25% to 0.50% per annum based
primarily on such average liquidity. There is also an unused line fee, calculated on the then unused portion of the lenders’ $400.0
million maximum commitments, ranging from 0.25% to 0.30% per annum of the unused commitment. For outstanding letters of
credit, the Company will pay to the lenders a fee equal to the then applicable LIBOR margin described above, and to the issuing
banks a standard fronting fee and customary fees and charges in connection with all amendments, extensions, draws and other
actions with respect to letters of credit.
 The Company’s obligations under the revolving credit facility (including revolving loans and reimbursement obligations for
outstanding letters of credit) are guaranteed by substantially all of the Company’s U.S. subsidiaries and secured by a first lien on
the Company’s and its U.S. subsidiaries’ accounts receivable. The Canadian Borrower’s obligations under the facility are
guaranteed by substantially all of the Company’s Canadian subsidiaries and secured by a first lien on the accounts receivable of the
Canadian subsidiaries. 
The Company utilizes letters of credit primarily as security for financial assurance which it has been required to provide to
regulatory bodies for its hazardous waste facilities and which would be called only in the event that the Company fails to satisfy
closure, post-closure and other obligations under the permits issued by those regulatory bodies for such licensed facilities. On
August 1, 2018, the Company borrowed $50.0 million under the revolving credit facility in connection with the redemption of
$78.0 million of 2020 Notes. The Company repaid the $50.0 million borrowing during the fourth quarter of 2018. At December 31,
2018 and 2017, the revolving credit facility had no outstanding loan balances, availability of $235.4 million and $217.8 million,
respectively, and outstanding letters of credit of $130.1 million and $134.1 million, respectively.
Cash Flow Hedges
The Company’s strategy to hedge against fluctuations in variable interest rates involves entering into interest rate derivative
agreements to hedge against adverse movements in interest rates. For interest rate derivatives deemed to be effective cash flow
hedges, the change in fair value is recorded in stockholders’ equity as a component of accumulated other comprehensive loss and
included in interest expense at the same time as interest expense is affected by the hedged transaction. Differences paid or received
over the life of the agreements are recorded as additions to or reductions of interest expense on the underlying debt.
Although the interest rate on all $742.2 million aggregate principal amount of Term Loans which were outstanding on
December 31, 2018 is variable under the Term Loan Agreement, the Company has effectively fixed the interest rate on $350.0
million aggregate principal amount of the Term Loans outstanding by entering into interest rate swap agreements in 2018 with a
notional amount of $350.0 million. Under the terms of the interest rate swap agreements, the Company receives interest based on
the 1-month LIBOR index and pays interest at a weighted average rate of approximately 2.92%. When combined with the 1.75%
interest rate margin for Eurocurrency borrowings, the effective annual interest rate on such $350.0 million aggregate principal
amount of Term Loans is therefore approximately 4.67%. 
The Company recognizes derivative instruments as either assets or liabilities on the balance sheet at fair value. No
ineffectiveness has been identified on these swaps and, therefore, all unrealized changes in fair value are recorded in accumulated
other comprehensive loss. Amounts are reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into interest expense on the
Statement of Operations in the same period or periods during which the hedged transaction affects earnings.
As of December 31, 2018, the Company recorded a derivative liability with a fair value of $8.8 million within accrued
expenses in connection with these cash flow hedges.
The fair value of the interest rate swaps included in the Level 2 tier of the fair value hierarchy is calculated using discounted
cash flow valuation methodologies based upon the one month LIBOR yield curves that are observable at commonly quoted
intervals for the full term of the swaps. Level 2 utilizes quoted market prices in markets that are not active, broker or dealer
quotations, or alternative pricing sources with reasonable levels of price transparency for similar assets and liabilities.
73
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(13) INCOME TAXES
The domestic and foreign components of income before provision (benefit) for income taxes were as follows (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018  2017 2016
Domestic $ 115,070 $ 101,714$ 87,328
Foreign (20,588) (43,025) (78,612)
Total $ 94,482 $ 58,689$ 8,716
The provision (benefit) for income taxes consisted of the following (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018  2017  2016
Current:      
Federal $ (7,677) $ 25,613 $ 14,798
State 12,653 11,083 8,763
Foreign 4,781 4,589 9,844
 9,757 41,285 33,405
Deferred      
Federal 19,899 (85,488) 21,814
State (1,205) 1,085 1,644
Foreign 395 1,068 (8,274)
 19,089 (83,335) 15,184
Provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 28,846 $ (42,050) $ 48,589
The Company's effective tax rate for fiscal years 2018, 2017 and 2016 was 30.5%, (71.6)% and 557.5%, respectively. The
effective income tax rate varied from the amount computed using the statutory federal income tax rate as follows (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018  2017 2016
Tax expense at US statutory rate $ 19,841 $ 20,541$ 3,051
State income taxes, net of federal benefit 8,711 4,547 6,010
Foreign rate differential (1,124) 3,733 3,646
Valuation allowance 10,466 16,552 22,564
Uncertain tax position interest and penalties (1,806) 3,730 107
Goodwill impairment — — 11,905
Tax credits (9,799) — —
Other 2,845 1,856 1,306
Adjustment for Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (288) (93,009) —
Provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 28,846 $ (42,050)$ 48,589
Effects of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. On December 22, 2017, the “Tax Cuts and Jobs Act” (the “Tax Act”) was signed into
law, making significant changes to the federal tax law. Changes include, but are not limited to, a corporate tax rate decrease
from 35% to 21% effective for tax years beginning after December 31, 2017, the transition of U.S. international taxation from a
worldwide tax system to a territorial tax system, and a one-time transition tax on the mandatory deemed repatriation of cumulative
foreign earnings as of December 31, 2017. For the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company calculated its best estimate of the
impact of the Tax Act in its year end income tax provision in accordance with its understanding of the Tax Act and guidance
available as of the date of the 2017 Form 10-K filing and as a result recorded a net benefit of $93.0 million as a component of the
2017 income tax expense. This provisional net income tax benefit was comprised of a $100.5 million tax benefit for the
remeasurement of deferred tax assets and liabilities to the 21% rate at which they are expected to reverse, offset
74
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(13) INCOME TAXES (Continued)
by a one-time tax expense on deemed repatriation of $7.5 million. This one-time charge was after the utilization of $7.5 million of
foreign tax credits which had full valuation allowances applied to them previously.
During 2018, the Company completed its analysis of impacts of the Tax Act and specific to the one-time deemed repatriation,
adjusted the previous amount recorded of $7.5 million to $6.6 million resulting in a $0.9 million benefit to tax expense recorded in
2018. The Company also recorded the final remeasurement of its deferred tax assets and liabilities and adjusted the deferred tax
benefit from $100.5 million to $99.9 million or approximately $0.6 million of deferred expense recorded in 2018. The total net
impact of changes in tax law resulted in a net benefit of approximately $0.3 million in 2018.
During 2018, the Company also completed an analysis of certain federal manufacturing and research and development credit
benefits for tax years 2014 through 2017. Upon the filing of its 2017 tax return in October 2018, the Company recognized $3.3
million of tax benefits and recognized an additional $7.1 million upon the amendments of its 2014 through 2016 tax returns for a
net benefit recorded as a component of the 2018 tax provision of $9.8 million.
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company recorded $5.0 million of tax benefits related to tax deductible
foreign currency losses to accumulated other comprehensive loss and as such these benefits are not included within the provision
(benefit) for income taxes.
The components of the total net deferred tax assets and liabilities at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows (in
thousands):
 2018 2017
Deferred tax assets:   
Provision for doubtful accounts $ 10,715$ 7,417
Closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities 28,380 28,189
Accrued expenses 15,686 15,382
Accrued compensation 7,774 1,903
Net operating loss carryforwards(1) 43,284 46,650
Tax credit carryforwards(2) 16,909 17,504
Uncertain tax positions accrued interest and federal benefit 519 921
Stock-based compensation 3,440 2,268
Other 7,067 3,258
Total deferred tax assets 133,774 123,492
Deferred tax liabilities:   
Property, plant and equipment (164,246) (144,325)
Permits and other intangible assets (103,539) (107,407)
Prepaids (9,187) (8,080)
Total deferred tax liabilities (276,972) (259,812)
Total net deferred tax liability before valuation allowance (143,198) (136,320)
Less valuation allowance (79,295) (68,355)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ (222,493)$ (204,675)
___________________________________
(1)As of December 31, 2018, the net operating loss carryforwards included (i) state net operating loss carryovers of $185.1
million which will begin to expire in 2019, (ii) federal net operating loss carryforwards of $49.8 million which will begin
to expire in 2025, and (iii) foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $103.3 million which will begin to expire in 2019.
(2)As of December 31, 2018, the foreign tax credit carryforwards of $16.5 million will expire between 2020 and 2024.
75
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(13) INCOME TAXES (Continued)
The Company has not accrued for any remaining undistributed foreign earnings not subject to the one-time transition tax on
mandatory deemed repatriation of cumulative foreign earnings. These amounts continue to be indefinitely reinvested in foreign
operations.
A valuation allowance is required to be established when, based on an evaluation of available evidence, it is more likely than
not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. Accordingly, as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the
Company had a valuation allowance of $79.3 million and $68.4 million, respectively. The total allowance as of December 31, 2018
consisted of $16.5 million of foreign tax credits, $0.8 million of acquired federal net operating losses, $9.6 million of state net
operating loss carryforwards, $22.7 million of foreign net operating loss carryforwards, $26.6 million of deferred tax assets of a
Canadian subsidiary and $3.1 million for tax attributes that if realized would generate capital losses. The allowance as of
December 31, 2017 consisted of $17.5 million of foreign tax credits, $3.9 million of acquired federal net operating losses, $11.9
million of state net operating loss carryforwards and $22.6 million of foreign net operating loss carryforwards and $12.5 million of
deferred tax assets of a Canadian subsidiary.
The changes to unrecognized tax benefits (excluding related penalties and interest) from January 1, 2016 through
December 31, 2018, were as follows (in thousands):
 2018  2017  2016
Unrecognized tax benefits as of January 1 $ 5,121 $ 1,738 $ 2,064
Additions to current year tax positions — 1,457 —
(Reductions) additions to prior year tax positions (625) 2,031 —
Expirations (1,115) (231) (533)
Foreign currency translation (222) 126 207
Unrecognized tax benefits as of December 31 $ 3,159 $ 5,121 $ 1,738
At December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, the Company had recorded $3.2 million, $5.1 million and $1.7 million, respectively,
of unrecognized tax benefits that if recognized would affect the annual effective tax rate.
The Company's policy is to recognize interest and penalties related to income tax matters as a component of income tax
expense. At December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 the Company has accrued interest of $0.8 million, $0.9 million and $0.3 million,
respectively, relative to unrecognized tax benefits. Interest expense that is recorded as a tax expense against the liability for
unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 included interest and penalties of $(0.1) million,
$0.5 million and $0.1 million, respectively.
The Company files U.S. federal income tax returns as well as income tax returns in various states and foreign jurisdictions.
The Company may be subject to examination by the Internal Revenue Service (the "IRS") for calendar years 2014 through 2017.
Additionally, any net operating losses that were generated in prior years and utilized in these years may also be subject to
examination by the IRS. The Company may also be subject to examinations by state and local revenue authorities for calendar
years 2013 through 2017. The Company is currently not under examination by the IRS. The Company has ongoing U.S. state and
local jurisdictional audits, as well as Canadian federal and provincial audits, all of which the Company believes will not result in
material liabilities.
Due to expiring statute of limitation periods and the resolution of tax audits, the Company believes that total unrecognized tax
benefits will decrease by approximately $0.6 million within the next 12 months.
76
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(14) EARNINGS (LOSS) PER SHARE
The following are computations of basic and diluted earnings (loss) per share (in thousands except for per share amounts):
 Years Ended December 31,
 2018  2017 2016
Numerator for basic and diluted earnings (loss) per share:     
Net income (loss) $ 65,636 $ 100,739$ (39,873)
Denominator:     
  Weighted basic shares outstanding 56,148 57,072 57,532
  Dilutive effect of equity-based compensation awards 192 128 —
  Weighted dilutive shares outstanding 56,340 57,200 57,532
   
Basic earnings (loss) per share $ 1.17 $ 1.77$ (0.69)
Diluted earnings (loss) per share $ 1.16 $ 1.76$ (0.69)
For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, all then outstanding performance awards and restricted stock awards were
included in the calculation of diluted earnings per share except for 79,390 and 152,831, respectively, of performance stock awards
for which the performance criteria were not attained at the time and 121,803 and 49,373, respectively, of restricted stock awards
which were excluded as their inclusion would have an antidilutive effect. As a result of the net loss reported for the year ended
December 31, 2016, all outstanding stock options, restricted stock awards and performance awards, totaling 730,929 potentially
dilutive shares, were excluded from the calculation of diluted loss per share as their inclusion would have an antidilutive effect.
(15) STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
The Company's board of directors has authorized the repurchase of up to $600 million of the Company's common stock. The
Company has funded and intends to continue to fund the repurchases through available cash resources. The repurchase program
authorizes the Company to purchase the Company's common stock on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions
periodically in a manner that complies with applicable U.S. securities laws. The number of shares purchased and the timing of the
purchases have depended and will depend on a number of factors including share price, cash required for future business plans,
trading volume and other conditions.  The Company has no obligation to repurchase stock under this program and may suspend or
terminate the repurchase program at any time. During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, the Company
repurchased and retired a total of approximately 0.8 million, 0.9 million and 0.5 million shares, respectively, of the Company's
common stock for total costs of approximately $45.1 million, $49.0 million and $22.2 million, respectively. Through December 31,
2018, the Company has repurchased and retired a total of approximately 5.6 million shares of its common stock for
approximately $293.9 million under this program. As of December 31, 2018, an additional $306.1 million remained available for
repurchase of shares under this program.
77
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(16) ACCUMULATED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE LOSS
The changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss by component and related tax effects for the years ended December 31,
2018, 2017 and 2016 were as follows (in thousands):    
 Foreign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments Unrealized
(Losses) Gains
on Available-
for-Sale
Securities Unrealized Loss
on Interest Rate
HedgeUnfunded
Pension
Liability Total
Balance at January 1, 2016 $(252,939) $ — $ — $ (1,953)$(254,892)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications 23,967 (535) — 216 23,648
Amounts reclassified out of accumulated other
comprehensive loss — — — — —
Tax benefit (loss) 16,761 214 — (57) 16,918
Other comprehensive income (loss) 40,728 (321) — 159 40,566
Balance at December 31, 2016 (212,211) (321) — (1,794) (214,326)
Other comprehensive income before reclassifications 41,636 184 — 146 41,966
Amounts reclassified out of accumulated other
comprehensive loss — 222 — — 222
Tax loss — (231) — (38) (269)
Other comprehensive income 41,636 175 — 108 41,919
Balance at December 31, 2017 (170,575) (146) — (1,686) (172,407)
Other comprehensive (loss) income before tax effects (47,374) 182 (9,579) 124 (56,647)
Amounts reclassified out of accumulated other
comprehensive loss — — 806 — 806
Tax benefit (loss) 5,024 (105) — (42) 4,877
Other comprehensive (loss) income (42,350) 77 (8,773) 82 (50,964)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $(212,925) $ (69) $ (8,773)$ (1,604)$(223,371)
During the years ended December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2016, the Company converted intercompany loans with a
foreign subsidiary to equity, which resulted in losses for tax purposes. The loans had been historically treated as components of the
Company’s investments in that subsidiary, and as a result, foreign currency gains and losses on the loans had been accumulated as a
component of other comprehensive (loss) income. The subsidiary continues to operate as part of the
Company. The tax benefits of $5.0 million and $16.8 million, respectively, which were triggered by the conversion, were therefore
allocated to other comprehensive (loss) income rather than net income (loss).
The amounts reclassified out of accumulated other comprehensive loss into the consolidated statement of operations, with
presentation location, during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 were as follows (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,  
Other Comprehensive Income Components 2018 2017 Location
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities $ —$ (222)Other (expense) income, net
Unrealized loss on interest rate hedge (806) —Interest expense, net of interest
income
There were no reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive loss during the year ended December 31, 2016.
(17) STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
Stock-Based Compensation
In 2010, the Company adopted an equity incentive plan (the "2010 Plan"), which provides for awards of up to 6,000,000
shares of common stock (subject to certain anti-dilution adjustments) in the form of (i) stock options, (ii) stock appreciation rights,
(iii) restricted stock, (iv) restricted stock units, and (v) certain other stock-based awards. The Company ceased issuing
78
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(17) STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION (Continued)
stock options in 2008, and all awards issued to date under the 2010 Plan have been in the form of restricted stock awards and
performance stock awards as described below.
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company had the following types of stock-based compensation awards outstanding
under the 2010 Plan: restricted stock awards and performance stock awards. The restricted stock awards generally vest over three to
five years subject to continued employment. The performance stock awards vest depending on the satisfaction of certain
performance criteria and continued service conditions as described below.
Total stock-based compensation cost charged to selling, general and administrative expenses for the years ended
December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 was $16.8 million, $13.1 million and $10.5 million, respectively. The total income tax benefit
recognized in the consolidated statements of operations from stock-based compensation was $3.2 million, $3.7 million and $2.8
million for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively.
Restricted Stock Awards
The following information relates to restricted stock awards that have been granted to employees and directors under the
Company's 2010 Plan. The restricted stock awards are not transferable until vested and the restrictions generally lapse upon the
achievement of continued employment over a three-to-five-year period or service as a director until the following annual meeting
of shareholders. The fair value of each restricted stock grant is based on the closing price of the Company's common stock on the
date of grant and is amortized to expense over its vesting period.
The following table summarizes information about restricted stock awards for the year ended December 31, 2018:
Restricted StockNumber of
Shares  Weighted Average
Grant-Date
Fair Value
Unvested at January 1, 2018 604,933 $ 54.23
Granted 327,466 55.02
Vested (198,673) 54.22
Forfeited (76,486) 54.00
Unvested at December 31, 2018 657,240 $ 54.65
As of December 31, 2018, there was $24.9 million of total unrecognized compensation cost arising from restricted stock
awards. This cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of 2.6 years. The total fair value of restricted stock
vested during 2018, 2017 and 2016 was $10.8 million, $7.3 million and $8.3 million, respectively.
Performance Stock Awards
The following information relates to performance stock awards that have been granted to employees. The compensation
committee of the Company's board of directors established two-year performance targets which could potentially be achieved in the
year granted or one year thereafter. Performance stock awards are subject to performance criteria established by the compensation
committee of the Company's board of directors. The vesting of the performance stock awards is based on achieving such targets
typically based on revenue, Adjusted EBITDA margin, free cash flow and a measure of workplace safety. In addition, performance
stock awards include continued service conditions.
The fair value of each performance stock award is based on the closing price of the Company's common stock on the date of
grant and is amortized to expense over the service period if achievement of performance measures is then considered probable.
79
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(17) STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION (Continued)
The following table summarizes information about performance stock awards for the year ended December 31, 2018:
Performance StockNumber of
Shares  Weighted Average
Grant-Date
Fair Value
Unvested at January 1, 2018 190,129 $ 55.63
Granted 171,584 55.71
Vested (21,416) 54.82
Forfeited (126,807) 53.59
Unvested at December 31, 2018 213,490 $ 55.71
As of December 31, 2018, there was $3.2 million of total unrecognized compensation cost arising from non-vested
compensation related to performance stock awards then deemed probable of vesting under the Company's 2010 Plan. The total fair
value of performance awards vested during 2018, 2017 and 2016 was $1.2 million, $3.0 million and $1.0 million, respectively.
(18) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Legal and Administrative Proceedings
The Company and its subsidiaries are subject to legal proceedings and claims arising in the ordinary course of business.
Actions filed against the Company arise from commercial and employment-related claims including alleged class actions related to
sales practices and wage and hour claims. The plaintiffs in these actions may be seeking damages or injunctive relief
or both. These actions are in various jurisdictions and stages of proceedings, and some are covered in part by insurance. In addition,
the Company’s waste management services operations are regulated by federal, state, provincial and local laws enacted to regulate
discharge of materials into the environment, remediation of contaminated soil and groundwater or otherwise protect the
environment. This ongoing regulation results in the Company frequently becoming a party to legal or administrative proceedings
involving all levels of governmental authorities and other interested parties. The issues involved in such proceedings generally
relate to alleged violations of existing permits and licenses or alleged responsibility under federal or state Superfund laws to
remediate contamination at properties owned either by the Company or by other parties (“third-party sites”) to which either the
Company or the prior owners of certain of the Company’s facilities shipped wastes.
At December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, the Company had recorded reserves of $25.4 million and $19.3 million,
respectively, in the Company's financial statements for actual or probable liabilities related to the legal and administrative
proceedings in which the Company was then involved, the principal of which are described below. At December 31, 2018 and
December 31, 2017, the Company also believed that it was reasonably possible that the amount of these potential liabilities could
be as much as $1.8 million more. The Company periodically adjusts the aggregate amount of these reserves when actual or
probable liabilities are paid or otherwise discharged, new claims arise, or additional relevant information about existing or probable
claims becomes available. As of December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017, the $25.4 million and $19.3 million, respectively, of
reserves consisted of (i) $17.9 million for each of the periods presented related to pending legal or administrative proceedings,
including Superfund liabilities, which were included in remedial liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets, and (ii) $7.5 million
and $1.4 million, respectively, primarily related to federal, state and provincial enforcement actions, which were included in
accrued expenses on the consolidated balance sheets.
As of December 31, 2018, the principal legal and administrative proceedings in which the Company was involved, or which
had been terminated during 2018, were as follows:
Ville Mercier. In September 2002, the Company acquired the stock of a subsidiary (the "Mercier Subsidiary") which owns a
hazardous waste incinerator in Ville Mercier, Quebec (the "Mercier Facility"). The property adjacent to the Mercier Facility, which
is also owned by the Mercier Subsidiary, is now contaminated as a result of actions dating back to 1968, when the Government of
Quebec issued to a company unrelated to the Mercier Subsidiary two permits to dump organic liquids into lagoons on the property.
In 1999, Ville Mercier and three neighboring municipalities filed separate legal proceedings against the Mercier Subsidiary and the
Government of Quebec. In 2012, the municipalities amended their existing statement of claim to seek $2.9 million (CAD $) in
general damages and $10.0 million (CAD $) in punitive damages, plus interest and costs, as well as injunctive relief. Both the
Government of Quebec and the Company have filed summary judgment motions against the municipalities. The parties are
attempting to negotiate a resolution and hearings on the motions have been delayed. In
80
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(18) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES (Continued)
September 2007, the Quebec Minister of Sustainable Development, Environment and Parks issued a notice pursuant to
Section 115.1 of the Environment Quality Act, superseding notices issued in 1992, which are the subject of the pending litigation.
The more recent notice notifies the Mercier Subsidiary that, if the Mercier Subsidiary does not take certain remedial measures at
the site, the Minister intends to undertake those measures at the site and claim direct and indirect costs related to such measures.
The Company has accrued for costs expected to be incurred relative to the resolution of this matter and believes this matter will not
have future material effect on its financial position or results of operations.
Safety-Kleen Legal Proceedings. On December 28, 2012, the Company acquired Safety-Kleen, Inc. ("Safety-Kleen") and
thereby became subject to the legal proceedings in which Safety-Kleen was a party on that date. In addition to certain Superfund
proceedings in which Safety-Kleen has been named as a potentially responsible party as described below under “Superfund
Proceedings,” the principal such legal proceedings involving Safety-Kleen which were outstanding as of December 31, 2018 were
as follows:
Product Liability Cases. Safety-Kleen has been named as a defendant in various lawsuits that are currently pending in various
courts and jurisdictions throughout the United States, including approximately 67 proceedings (excluding cases which have been
settled but not formally dismissed) as of December 31, 2018, wherein persons claim personal injury resulting from the use of
Safety-Kleen's parts cleaning equipment or cleaning products. These proceedings typically involve allegations that the solvent used
in Safety-Kleen's parts cleaning equipment contains contaminants and/or that Safety-Kleen's recycling process does not effectively
remove the contaminants that become entrained in the solvent during their use. In addition, certain claimants assert that Safety-
Kleen failed to warn adequately the product user of potential risks, including a historic failure to warn that solvent contains trace
amounts of toxic or hazardous substances such as benzene.
Safety-Kleen maintains insurance that it believes will provide coverage for these product liability claims (over amounts
accrued for self-insured retentions and deductibles in certain limited cases), except for punitive damages to the extent not insurable
under state law or excluded from insurance coverage. Safety-Kleen also believes that these claims lack merit and has historically
vigorously defended, and intends to continue to vigorously defend, itself and the safety of its products against all of these claims.
Such matters are subject to many uncertainties and outcomes are not predictable with assurance. Consequently, Safety-Kleen is
unable to ascertain the ultimate aggregate amount of monetary liability or financial impact with respect to these matters as of
December 31, 2018. From January 1, 2018 to December 31, 2018, 10 product liability claims were settled or dismissed. Due to the
nature of these claims and the related insurance, the Company did not incur any expense as Safety-Kleen's insurance provided
coverage in full for all such claims. Safety-Kleen may be named in similar, additional lawsuits in the future, including claims for
which insurance coverage may not be available.      
Superfund Proceedings
The Company has been notified that either the Company (which, since December 28, 2012, includes Safety-Kleen) or the
prior owners of certain of the Company's facilities for which the Company may have certain indemnification obligations have been
identified as potentially responsible parties ("PRPs") or potential PRPs in connection with 128 sites which are subject to or
are proposed to become subject to proceedings under federal or state Superfund laws. Of the 128 sites, five (including the BR
Facility described below) involve facilities that are now owned or leased by the Company and 123 involve third-party sites to
which either the Company or the prior owners of certain of the Company’s facilities shipped wastes. Of the 123 third-party sites, 30
are now settled, 16 are currently requiring expenditures on remediation and 77 are not currently requiring expenditures on
remediation.
In connection with each site, the Company has estimated the extent, if any, to which it may be subject, either directly or as a
result of any indemnification obligations, for cleanup and remediation costs, related legal and consulting costs associated with PRP
investigations, settlements, and related legal and administrative proceedings. The amount of such actual and potential liability is
inherently difficult to estimate because of, among other relevant factors, uncertainties as to the legal liability (if any) of the
Company or the prior owners of certain of the Company's facilities to contribute a portion of the cleanup costs, the assumptions that
must be made in calculating the estimated cost and timing of remediation, the identification of other PRPs and their respective
capability and obligation to contribute to remediation efforts, and the existence and legal standing of indemnification agreements (if
any) with prior owners, which may either benefit the Company or subject the Company to potential indemnification obligations.
The Company believes its potential liability could exceed $100,000 at 12 of the 123 third-party sites.
81
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(18) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES (Continued)
BR Facility.    The Company acquired in 2002 a former hazardous waste incinerator and landfill in Baton Rouge (the "BR
Facility"), for which operations had been previously discontinued by the prior owner. In September 2007, the EPA issued a special
notice letter to the Company related to the Devil's Swamp Lake Site ("Devil's Swamp") in East Baton Rouge Parish, Louisiana.
Devil's Swamp includes a lake located downstream of an outfall ditch where wastewater and storm water have been discharged, and
Devil's Swamp is proposed to be included on the National Priorities List due to the presence of Contaminants of Concern ("COC")
cited by the EPA. These COCs include substances of the kind found in wastewater and storm water discharged from the BR Facility
in past operations. The EPA originally requested COC generators to submit a good faith offer to conduct a remedial investigation
feasibility study directed towards the eventual remediation of the site. In 2018 the Company completed performing corrective
actions at the BR Facility under an order issued by the Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality, and has also completed
conducting the remedial investigation and feasibility study for Devil's Swamp under an order issued by the EPA. The Company
cannot presently estimate the potential additional liability for the Devil's Swamp cleanup until a final remedy is selected by the EPA
with issuance of a Record of Decision.
Third-Party Sites.    Of the 123 third-party sites at which the Company has been notified it is a PRP or potential PRP or may
have indemnification obligations, Clean Harbors has an indemnification agreement at 11 of these sites with ChemWaste, a former
subsidiary of Waste Management, Inc., and at six additional of these third-party sites, Safety-Kleen has a similar indemnification
agreement with McKesson Corporation. These agreements indemnify the Company (which now includes Safety-Kleen) with
respect to any liability at the 17 sites for waste disposed prior to the Company's (or Safety-Kleen's) acquisition of the former
subsidiaries of Waste Management and McKesson which had shipped wastes to those sites. Accordingly, Waste Management or
McKesson are paying all costs of defending those subsidiaries in those 17 cases, including legal fees and settlement costs.
However, there can be no guarantee that the Company's ultimate liabilities for those sites will not exceed the amount recorded or
that indemnities applicable to any of these sites will be available to pay all or a portion of related costs. Except for the
indemnification agreements which the Company holds from ChemWaste, McKesson and two other entities, the Company does not
have an indemnity agreement with respect to any of the 123 third-party sites discussed above.
Federal, State and Provincial Enforcement Actions
From time to time, the Company pays fines or penalties in regulatory proceedings relating primarily to waste treatment,
storage or disposal facilities. As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, there were ten and five proceedings, respectively, for which the
Company reasonably believes that the sanctions could equal or exceed $100,000. The Company believes that the fines or other
penalties in these or any of the other regulatory proceedings will, individually or in the aggregate, not have a material effect on its
financial condition, results of operations or cash flows.
Leases
The Company leases facilities, service centers and personal property under certain operating leases. Some of these lease
agreements contain an escalation clause for increased taxes and operating expenses and are renewable at the option of the
Company. Lease terms range from 1 to 25 years. The following is a summary of future minimum payments under operating leases
that have initial or remaining non-cancelable lease terms in excess of one year at December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
YearTotal
Operating
Leases
2019 $ 56,480
2020 45,467
2021 33,564
2022 24,509
2023 15,253
Thereafter 35,778
Total minimum lease payments $ 211,051
During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, rent expense including short-term rentals was approximately
$141.1 million, $125.4 million, and $121.9 million, respectively.
82
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(18) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES (Continued)
Other Contingencies
Under the Company's insurance programs, coverage is obtained for catastrophic exposures, as well as those risks required to
be insured by law or contract. The Company's policy is to retain a significant portion of certain expected losses related to workers'
compensation, health insurance, comprehensive general liability and vehicle liability. A portion of these self-insured liabilities are
managed through its wholly-owned captive insurance subsidiary.
Provisions for losses expected under these programs are recorded based upon the Company's estimates of the aggregate
liability for claims. The current deductible per participant per year for the health insurance policy is $0.7 million. The current
deductible per occurrence for workers' compensation is $1.0 million, general liability is $2.0 million and vehicle liability is $2.0
million. The retention per claim for the environmental impairment policy is $1.0 million. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the
Company had accrued $53.9 million and $47.9 million, respectively, for its self-insurance liabilities (exclusive of health insurance)
using a risk-free discount rate of 2.96% and 1.87%, respectively. A significant portion of the increase in the liabilities as of
December 31, 2018 is attributable to amounts assumed in connection with the acquisition of the Veolia Business which occurred in
2018. Actual expenditures in future periods can differ materially from accruals based on estimates.
Anticipated payments for contingencies related to workers' compensation, comprehensive general liability and vehicle
liability related claims at December 31, 2018 for each of the next five years and thereafter were as follows (in thousands):
Years ending December 31,  
2019 $ 20,171
2020 12,799
2021 7,964
2022 4,992
2023 4,082
Thereafter 6,385
Undiscounted self-insurance liabilities 56,393
Less: Discount 2,492
Total self-insurance liabilities (included in accrued expenses) $ 53,901
(19) SEGMENT REPORTING
Segment reporting is prepared on the same basis that the Company's chief executive officer, who is the Company's chief
operating decision maker, manages the business, makes operating decisions and assesses performance. During the first quarter of
fiscal year 2018, certain of the Company's businesses undertook a reorganization which included changes to the underlying
business and management structures. The reorganization resulted in combining the Environmental Services businesses from an
operational and management perspective, deepening customer relationships and allowing for efficiencies across the Company's
operations through the sharing of resources, namely labor and equipment, which will reduce third party spending and promote cross
selling of such business offerings. In connection with this reorganization, the Company’s chief operating decision maker requested
changes in the information that he regularly reviews for purposes of allocating resources and assessing performance. These changes
required a reconsideration of the Company’s operating segments in the first quarter of 2018 and resulted in a change in the
Company’s assessment of its operating segments. Upon reconsideration of the identification of the Company’s operating segments,
the Company concluded that there are now two operating segments for disclosure purposes; (i) the Environmental Services
segment which consists of the Company’s historical Technical Services, Industrial Services, Field Services and Oil, Gas and
Lodging businesses, and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment. The amounts presented for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016
have been reclassified to conform to the new segment presentation. These reclassifications and adjustments had no effect on the
consolidated statements of operations, consolidated statements of comprehensive income, consolidated statements of cash flows or
consolidated statements of stockholders' equity for any of the periods presented.
Third-party revenue is revenue billed to outside customers by a particular segment. Direct revenue is revenue allocated to the
segment providing the product or service. Intersegment revenues represent the sharing of third-party revenues among the segments
based on products and services provided by each segment as if the products and services were sold directly to the third-party. The
intersegment revenues are shown net. The operations not managed through the Company’s operating segments described above are
recorded as “Corporate Items.” 
83
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(19) SEGMENT REPORTING (Continued)
The following table reconciles third-party revenues to direct revenues for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016
(in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2018
 Environmental
Services  Safety-Kleen Corporate
Items  Totals
Third-party revenues $2,003,843 $1,295,355 $ 1,105 $3,300,303
Intersegment revenues, net 134,104 (134,104) — —
Corporate Items, net 3,247 31 (3,278) —
Direct revenues $2,141,194 $1,161,282 $ (2,173) $3,300,303
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2017
 Environmental
Services  Safety-KleenCorporate
Items  Totals
Third-party revenues $1,728,700 $1,213,703 $ 2,575 $2,944,978
Intersegment revenues, net 125,822 (125,822) — —
Corporate Items, net 2,952 5 (2,957) —
Direct revenues $1,857,474 $1,087,886 $ (382) $2,944,978
 For the Year Ended December 31, 2016
 Environmental
Services  Safety-KleenCorporate
Items  Totals
Third-party revenues $1,641,432 $1,110,727 $ 3,067 $2,755,226
Intersegment revenues, net 115,013 (115,013) — —
Corporate Items, net 2,388 369 (2,757) —
Direct revenues $1,758,833 $ 996,083 $ 310 $2,755,226
The primary financial measure by which the Company evaluates the performance of its segments is Adjusted EBITDA, which
consists of net income (loss) plus accretion of environmental liabilities, depreciation and amortization, net interest expense, loss on
early extinguishment of debt, provision (benefit) for income taxes, other gains or non-cash charges (including gain on sale of
businesses and goodwill impairment charge) not deemed representative of fundamental segment results and excludes other expense
(income), net. Transactions between the segments are accounted for at the Company’s best estimate based on similar transactions
with outside customers.
84
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(19) SEGMENT REPORTING (Continued)
The following table presents Adjusted EBITDA information used by management by reported segment (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018 2017 2016
Adjusted EBITDA:    
Environmental Services $ 380,856$ 321,310$ 319,075
Safety-Kleen 282,029 249,811 219,546
Corporate Items (171,880) (145,464) (138,267)
Total 491,005 425,657 400,354
Reconciliation to Consolidated Statements of Operations:    
Accretion of environmental liabilities 9,806 9,460 10,177
Depreciation and amortization 298,625 288,422 287,002
Goodwill impairment charge — — 34,013
Income from operations 182,574 127,775 69,162
Other expense (income), net 4,510 6,119 (6,195)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 2,488 7,891 —
Gain on sale of businesses — (30,732) (16,884)
Interest expense, net of interest income 81,094 85,808 83,525
Income from operations before provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 94,482$ 58,689$ 8,716
Geographical Information
For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016, the Company generated direct revenues in the following geographic
locations (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018  2017 2016
 Revenue  % of Total Revenue  % of Total Revenue % of Total
United States $2,721,814 82.5% $2,392,000 81.2%$2,213,355 80.3%
Canada 578,489 17.5% 552,978 18.8% 541,871 19.7%
  Total Revenues $3,300,303 100.0%$2,944,978 100.0%$2,755,226 100.0%
As of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Company had property, plant and equipment, net of depreciation and amortization
and permits and other intangible assets in the following geographic locations (in thousands):
 For the Year Ended December 31,
 2018 2017
 Total % of Total Total  % of Total
Property, plant and equipment, net      
United States $1,233,949 79.0%$1,175,437 74.0%
Canada 328,029 21.0% 411,928 26.0%
Total property, plant and equipment, net $1,561,978 100.0%$1,587,365 100.0%
     
Permits and other intangibles, net      
United States $ 393,045 88.9%$ 408,654 87.1%
Canada 48,830 11.1% 60,474 12.9%
Total permits and other intangibles, net $ 441,875 100.0%$ 469,128 100.0%
85
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(19) SEGMENT REPORTING (Continued)
The following table presents assets by reported segment and in the aggregate (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Property, plant and equipment, net   
Environmental Services $ 951,867$ 927,139
Safety-Kleen 553,220 582,162
Corporate Items 56,891 78,064
Total property, plant and equipment, net $ 1,561,978$ 1,587,365
 
Goodwill and Permits and other intangibles, net   
Environmental Services   
Goodwill $ 207,019$ 172,386
Permits and other intangibles, net 93,313 97,519
Total Environmental Services 300,332 269,905
 
Safety-Kleen
Goodwill $ 307,170$ 306,137
Permits and other intangibles, net 348,562 371,609
Total Safety-Kleen 655,732 677,746
 
Total $ 956,064$ 947,651
The following table presents the total assets by reported segment (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
Environmental Services $ 1,640,706$ 1,541,241
Safety-Kleen 1,431,381 1,471,291
Corporate Items 666,234 694,038
Total $ 3,738,321$ 3,706,570
The following table presents the total assets by geographical area (in thousands):
 December 31, 2018 December 31, 2017
United States $ 3,090,311$ 2,985,394
Canada 648,010 721,176
Total $ 3,738,321$ 3,706,570
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES
The previously outstanding 2020 Notes and the currently outstanding 2021 Notes (collectively, the "Senior Unsecured
Notes") and the Company's obligations under its Term Loan Agreement were or are guaranteed by substantially all of the
Company’s subsidiaries organized in the United States. Each guarantor was or is a 100% owned subsidiary of Clean Harbors, Inc.
and its guarantee was or is both full and unconditional and joint and several. The guarantees were or are, however, subject to
customary release provisions under which, in particular, the guarantee of any domestic restricted subsidiary will be released if the
Company sells such subsidiary to an unrelated third party in accordance with the terms of the indentures which govern the Senior
Unsecured Notes and of the Term Loan Agreement. The Senior Unsecured Notes and the Company's obligations under its Term
Loan Agreement are not guaranteed by the Company’s subsidiaries organized outside the United States. The following
supplemental condensed consolidating financial information for the parent company, the guarantor subsidiaries and the non-
guarantor subsidiaries, respectively, is presented in conformity with the requirements of Rule 3-10 of SEC Regulation S-X (“Rule
3-10”).
86
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the condensed consolidating balance sheet at December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc. Guarantor
SubsidiariesNon-Guarantor
Subsidiaries Consolidating
Adjustments Total
Assets:         
Cash and cash equivalents $ 27,308 $101,302$ 97,897 $ — $ 226,507
Short-term marketable securities 67 — 52,789 — 52,856
Intercompany receivables 262,475 721,521 60,693 (1,044,689) —
Accounts receivable, net — 520,785 86,167 — 606,952
Other current assets — 289,869 49,631 (23,657) 315,843
Property, plant and equipment, net — 1,233,578 328,400 — 1,561,978
Investments in subsidiaries 3,162,704 571,304 — (3,734,008) —
Intercompany debt receivable — 14,669 21,000 (35,669) —
Goodwill — 456,307 57,882 — 514,189
Permits and other intangibles, net — 393,045 48,830 — 441,875
Other long-term assets 1,551 13,545 3,025 — 18,121
Total assets $3,454,105 $4,315,925$ 806,314 $(4,838,023) $3,738,321
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity:         
Current liabilities $ 20,170 $457,164$ 148,601 $ (23,657) $ 602,278
Intercompany payables 699,158 321,846 23,685 (1,044,689) —
Closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities,
net — 151,480 16,434 — 167,914
Long-term obligations 1,565,021 — — — 1,565,021
Intercompany debt payable — 21,000 14,669 (35,669) —
Other long-term liabilities — 212,924 20,428 — 233,352
Total liabilities 2,284,349 1,164,414 223,817 (1,104,015) 2,568,565
Stockholders' equity 1,169,756 3,151,511 582,497 (3,734,008) 1,169,756
Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $3,454,105 $4,315,925$ 806,314 $(4,838,023) $3,738,321
87
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the condensed consolidating balance sheet at December 31, 2017 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc. Guarantor
SubsidiariesNon-Guarantor
SubsidiariesConsolidating
Adjustments Total
Assets:       
Cash and cash equivalents $ 51,638 $ 207,777$ 59,984$ — $319,399
Short-term marketable securities — — 38,179 — 38,179
Intercompany receivables 238,339 590,100 52,909 (881,348) —
Accounts receivable, net — 433,042 95,882 — 528,924
Other current assets 897 233,602 52,947 (19,892) 267,554
Property, plant and equipment, net — 1,174,975 412,390 — 1,587,365
Investments in subsidiaries 3,112,547 569,568 — (3,682,115) —
Intercompany debt receivable — 92,530 21,000 (113,530) —
Goodwill — 415,641 62,882 — 478,523
Permits and other intangibles, net — 408,655 60,473 — 469,128
Other long-term assets 2,084 12,064 3,350 — 17,498
Total assets $3,405,505 $4,137,954$ 859,996$(4,696,885)$3,706,570
Liabilities and Stockholders' Equity:       
Current liabilities $ 16,954 $ 371,135$ 135,620$ (19,892)$503,817
Intercompany payables 574,812 289,531 17,005 (881,348) —
Closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities,
net — 148,872 16,851 — 165,723
Long-term obligations 1,625,537 — — — 1,625,537
Intercompany debt payable — 21,000 92,530 (113,530) —
Other long-term liabilities — 201,086 22,205 — 223,291
Total liabilities 2,217,303 1,031,624 284,211 (1,014,770) 2,518,368
Stockholders' equity 1,188,202 3,106,330 575,785 (3,682,115) 1,188,202
Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $3,405,505 $4,137,954$ 859,996$(4,696,885)$3,706,570
88
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the consolidating statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc.Guarantor
Subsidiaries Non-Guarantor
SubsidiariesConsolidating
Adjustments Total
Revenues     
  Service revenues $ — $2,145,310 $ 621,435$ (57,506)$2,709,239
  Product revenues — 537,400 66,210 (12,546) 591,064
   Total revenues — 2,682,710 687,645 (70,052) 3,300,303
Cost of revenues (exclusive of items shown
separately below)     
  Service cost of revenues — 1,421,693 497,788 (57,506) 1,861,975
  Product cost of revenues — 419,377 36,745 (12,546) 443,576
   Total cost of revenues — 1,841,070 534,533 (70,052) 2,305,551
Selling, general and administrative expenses 347 419,984 83,416 — 503,747
Accretion of environmental liabilities — 8,797 1,009 — 9,806
Depreciation and amortization — 219,530 79,095 — 298,625
(Loss) income from operations (347) 193,329 (10,408) — 182,574
Other expense, net (1,384) (1,284) (1,842) — (4,510)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt (2,488) — — — (2,488)
Interest (expense) income, net (83,362) 1,252 1,016 — (81,094)
Equity in earnings of subsidiaries, net of tax 129,082 (25,765) — (103,317) —
Intercompany interest income (expense) — 2,841 (2,841) — —
Income (loss) before (benefit) provision for
income taxes 41,501 170,373 (14,075) (103,317) 94,482
(Benefit) provision for income taxes (24,135) 46,267 6,714 — 28,846
Net income (loss) 65,636 124,106 (20,789) (103,317) 65,636
Other comprehensive loss (50,964) (50,964) (44,292) 95,256 (50,964)
Comprehensive income (loss) $ 14,672$ 73,142 $ (65,081)$ (8,061)$ 14,672
89
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the consolidating statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2017 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc. Guarantor
SubsidiariesNon-Guarantor
SubsidiariesConsolidating
Adjustments Total
Revenues      
  Service revenues $ — $1,870,256$ 582,042$ (53,648)$2,398,650
  Product revenues — 492,036 66,511 (12,219) 546,328
   Total revenues — 2,362,292 648,553 (65,867) 2,944,978
Cost of revenues (exclusive of items shown
separately below)      
  Service cost of revenues — 1,224,326 471,120 (53,648) 1,641,798
  Product cost of revenues — 386,455 46,639 (12,219) 420,875
   Total cost of revenues — 1,610,781 517,759 (65,867) 2,062,673
Selling, general and administrative expenses — 373,050 83,598 — 456,648
Accretion of environmental liabilities — 8,479 981 — 9,460
Depreciation and amortization — 205,034 83,388 — 288,422
Income (loss) from operations — 164,948 (37,173) — 127,775
Other expense, net (222) (5,156) (741) — (6,119)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt (7,891) — — — (7,891)
Gain on sale of business — 30,732 — — 30,732
Interest (expense) income, net (87,113) 1,523 (218) — (85,808)
Equity in earnings of subsidiaries, net of tax 157,963 (48,683) — (109,280) —
Intercompany interest income (expense) — 5,288 (5,288) — —
Income (loss) before (benefit) provision for income
taxes 62,737 148,652 (43,420) (109,280) 58,689
(Benefit) provision for income taxes (38,002) (10,117) 6,069 — (42,050)
Net income (loss) 100,739 158,769 (49,489) (109,280) 100,739
Other comprehensive income 41,919 41,919 38,131 (80,050) 41,919
Comprehensive income (loss) $ 142,658 $ 200,688$ (11,358)$(189,330)$ 142,658
90
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the consolidating statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2016 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc. Guarantor
Subsidiaries Non-Guarantor
SubsidiariesConsolidating
Adjustments Total
Revenues    
  Service revenues $ — $1,747,985 $ 582,075$ (49,251)$2,280,809
  Product revenues — 410,868 73,793 (10,244) 474,417
   Total revenues — 2,158,853 655,868 (59,495) 2,755,226
Cost of revenues (exclusive of items shown
separately below)    
  Service cost of revenues — 1,116,132 476,329 (49,251) 1,543,210
  Product cost of revenues — 349,069 50,822 (10,244) 389,647
   Total cost of revenues — 1,465,201 527,151 (59,495) 1,932,857
Selling, general and administrative expenses 85 341,963 79,967 — 422,015
Accretion of environmental liabilities — 9,261 916 — 10,177
Depreciation and amortization — 201,153 85,849 — 287,002
Goodwill impairment charge — — 34,013 — 34,013
(Loss) income from operations (85) 141,275 (72,028) — 69,162
Other income (expense), net — 7,713 (1,518) — 6,195
Gain on sale of business — 1,704 15,180 — 16,884
Interest (expense) income, net (88,984) 5,391 68 — (83,525)
Equity in earnings of subsidiaries, net of tax 13,568 (80,244) — 66,676 —
Intercompany interest income (expense) — 19,855 (19,855) — —
(Loss) income before (benefit) provision for
income taxes (75,501) 95,694 (78,153) 66,676 8,716
(Benefit) provision for income taxes (35,628) 82,643 1,574 — 48,589
Net (loss) income (39,873) 13,051 (79,727) 66,676 (39,873)
Other comprehensive income 40,566 40,566 15,291 (55,857) 40,566
Comprehensive income (loss) $ 693 $ 53,617 $ (64,436)$ 10,819$ 693
91
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the condensed consolidating statement of cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc.Guarantor
SubsidiariesNon-
Guarantor
Subsidiaries Consolidating
Adjustments Total
Net cash from operating activities $ 34,135$260,101$ 78,974 $ — $373,210
Cash flows used in investing activities:       
Additions to property, plant and equipment — (161,342) (32,002) — (193,344)
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets — 4,174 11,271 — 15,445
Proceeds from sale of available-for-sale securities — — 28,723 — 28,723
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired — (151,023) — — (151,023)
Additions to intangible assets, including costs to
obtain or renew permits — (4,326) (362) — (4,688)
Purchases of available-for-sale securities (1,450) — (43,322) — (44,772)
Intercompany — (54,114) — 54,114 —
Net cash used in investing activities (1,450) (366,631) (35,692) 54,114 (349,659)
Cash flows (used in) from financing activities:       
Change in uncashed checks — 55 77 — 132
Tax payments related to withholdings on vested
restricted stock (3,266) — — — (3,266)
Deferred financing costs paid (4,027) — — — (4,027)
Repurchases of common stock (45,080) — — — (45,080)
Principal payments on debt (405,768) — — — (405,768)
Premium paid on early extinguishment of debt (1,238) — — — (1,238)
Issuance of senior secured notes, net of discount 348,250 — — — 348,250
Borrowing from revolving credit facility 50,000 — — — 50,000
Payment on revolving credit facility (50,000) — — — (50,000)
Intercompany 54,114 — — (54,114) —
Net cash (used in) from financing activities (57,015) 55 77 (54,114) (110,997)
Effect of exchange rate change on cash — — (5,446) — (5,446)
(Decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents (24,330) (106,475) 37,913 — (92,892)
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year 51,638 207,777 59,984 — 319,399
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 27,308$101,302$ 97,897 $ — $226,507
92
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the condensed consolidating statement of cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2017 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc. Guarantor
Subsidiaries Non-Guarantor
SubsidiariesConsolidating
Adjustments Total
Net cash from operating activities $ 16,292 $ 217,001 $ 52,405$ — $ 285,698
Cash flows from (used in) investing activities:       
Additions to property, plant and equipment — (142,211) (24,796) — (167,007)
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets — 1,979 5,145 — 7,124
Proceeds from sale of available-for-sale
securities 376 — — — 376
Proceeds from sale of business, net of
transactional costs — 45,245 181 — 45,426
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired — (11,427) (37,800) — (49,227)
Additions to intangible assets, including costs to
obtain or renew permits — (1,153) (464) — (1,617)
Purchases of available-for-sale securities — — (38,342) — (38,342)
Intercompany — (54,074) — 54,074 —
Intercompany debt — — 3,701 (3,701) —
Net cash from (used in) investing activities 376 (161,641) (92,375) 50,373 (203,267)
Cash flows used in financing activities:       
Change in uncashed checks — (3,526) (2,414) — (5,940)
Proceeds from exercise of stock options 46 — — — 46
Tax payments related to withholdings on vested
restricted stock (3,149) — — — (3,149)
Deferred financing costs paid (5,718) — — — (5,718)
Repurchases of common stock (48,971) — — — (48,971)
Principal payments on debt (402,000) — — — (402,000)
Premium paid on early extinguishment of debt (6,028) — — — (6,028)
Issuance of senior secured notes, net of discount 399,000 — — — 399,000
Intercompany 54,074 — — (54,074) —
Intercompany debt (3,701) — — 3,701 —
Net cash used in financing activities (16,447) (3,526) (2,414) (50,373) (72,760)
Effect of exchange rate change on cash — — 2,731 — 2,731
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents 221 51,834 (39,653) — 12,402
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year 51,417 155,943 99,637 — 306,997
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 51,638 $ 207,777 $ 59,984$ — $ 319,399
93
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(20) GUARANTOR AND NON-GUARANTOR SUBSIDIARIES (Continued)
Following is the condensed consolidating statement of cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2016 (in thousands):
 Clean
Harbors, Inc. Guarantor
SubsidiariesNon-Guarantor
SubsidiariesConsolidating
Adjustments Total
Net cash from operating activities $ 51,033 $ 125,591$ 83,000$ — $ 259,624
Cash flows used in investing activities:       
Additions to property, plant and equipment — (194,184) (25,200) — (219,384)
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets — 12,926 7,891 — 20,817
Proceeds on sale of business, net of transactional
costs — 18,885 28,249 — 47,134
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired — (196,915) (10,000) — (206,915)
Additions to intangible assets including costs to
obtain or renew permits — (1,749) (1,082) — (2,831)
Purchases of available-for-sale securities (102) — (496) — (598)
Intercompany — (23,182) — 23,182 —
Intercompany debt — 63,118 (21,000) (42,118) —
Investment in subsidiaries (257,125) — — 257,125 —
Net cash used in investing activities (257,227) (321,101) (21,638) 238,189 (361,777)
Cash flows from (used in) financing activities:       
Change in uncashed checks — (3,651) 474 — (3,177)
Proceeds from exercise of stock options 627 — — — 627
Tax payments related to withholdings on vested
restricted stock (2,819) — — — (2,819)
Deferred financing costs paid (4,031) — — — (4,031)
Repurchases of common stock (22,188) — — — (22,188)
Excess tax benefit of stock-based compensation 1,198 — — — 1,198
Issuance of senior unsecured notes, including
premium 250,625 250,625 — (250,625) 250,625
Intercompany 23,182 — 6,500 (29,682) —
Intercompany debt — 21,000 (63,118) 42,118 —
Net cash from (used in) financing activities 246,594 267,974 (56,144) (238,189) 220,235
Effect of exchange rate change on cash — — 4,207 — 4,207
Increase in cash and cash equivalents 40,400 72,464 9,425 — 122,289
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year 11,017 83,479 90,212 — 184,708
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 51,417 $ 155,943$ 99,637$ — $ 306,997
94
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(21) QUARTERLY DATA (UNAUDITED)
First
Quarter  Second
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
Quarter
 (in thousands except per share amounts)
2018      
Revenues $ 749,778 $ 849,140$ 843,181$ 858,204
Cost of revenues (1) 546,425 583,584 580,685 594,857
Income from operations 10,991 64,353 65,745 41,485
Other (expense) income, net (299) 846 (996) (4,061)
Net (loss) income (2) (12,631) 30,747 31,089 16,431
Basic (loss) earnings per share (3) (0.22) 0.55 0.55 0.29
Diluted (loss) earnings per share (3) (0.22) 0.54 0.55 0.29
First
Quarter  Second
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
Quarter
 (in thousands except per share amounts)
2017      
Revenues $ 688,941 $ 752,788$ 755,846$ 747,403
Cost of revenues (1) 496,585 519,803 519,595 526,690
Income from operations 5,433 46,744 47,663 27,935
Other expense, net (1,549) (833) (432) (3,305)
Net (loss) income (2) (21,393) 25,880 12,058 84,194
Basic (loss) earnings per share (3) (0.37) 0.45 0.21 1.48
Diluted (loss) earnings per share (3) (0.37) 0.45 0.21 1.48
______________________________________
(1)Items shown separately on the statements of operations consist of (i) accretion of environmental liabilities and
(ii) depreciation and amortization.
(2)The second quarter of 2017 net income includes a $31.7 million pre-tax gain on the sale of a non-core line of business
within the Company's Environmental Services segment and a $6.0 million loss on early extinguishment of debt. The third
quarter of 2018 and 2017 net income had a $2.5 million and $1.9 million loss on early extinguishment of debt,
respectively. As a result of the Tax Act, the fourth quarter of 2017 net income includes a $93.0 million tax benefit related
to a reduction of the Company's net deferred tax liability.
(3)(Loss) earnings per share are computed independently for each of the quarters presented. Accordingly, the quarterly basic
and diluted (loss) earnings per share may not equal the total computed for the year.
95
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE II
VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
For the Three Years Ended December 31, 2018
(in thousands)
Allowance for Doubtful AccountsBalance
Beginning of
PeriodAdditions Charged to
Operating Expense Deductions from
Reserves(a)Balance
End of Period
2016 $ 15,194$ 6,907 $ 7,055$ 15,046
2017 $ 15,046$ 7,901 $ 6,774$ 16,173
2018 $ 16,173$ 15,817 $ 5,622$ 26,368
________________________________________
(a)Amounts deemed uncollectible, net of recoveries.
Revenue Allowance(b)Balance
Beginning of
Period  Additions Charged to
RevenueDeductions from
ReservesBalance
End of Period
2016 $ 16,232 $ 24,252$ 26,281$ 14,203
2017 $ 14,203 $ 24,862$ 27,439$ 11,626
2018 $ 11,626 $ 41,338$ 35,017$ 17,947
________________________________________
(b)Due to the nature of the Company's businesses and the invoices that result from the services provided, customers may
withhold payments and attempt to renegotiate amounts invoiced. In addition, for some of the services provided, the
Company's invoices are based on quotes that can either generate credits or debits when the actual revenue amount is
known. Based on industry knowledge and historical trends, the Company records a revenue allowance accordingly. This
practice causes the volume of activity flowing through the revenue allowance during the year to be higher than the balance
at the end of the year. Increases in overall sales volumes and the expansion of the customer base in recent years have also
increased the volume of additions and deductions to the allowance during the year. The revenue allowance is intended to
cover the net amount of revenue adjustments that may need to be credited to customers' accounts in future periods.
Management determines the appropriate total revenue allowance by evaluating the following factors on a customer-by-
customer basis as well as on a consolidated level: trends in adjustments to previously billed amounts, existing economic
conditions and other information as deemed applicable. Revenue allowance estimates can differ materially from the actual
adjustments, but historically the revenue allowance has been sufficient to cover the net amount of the reserve adjustments
issued in subsequent reporting periods.
Valuation Allowance on Deferred Tax AssetsBalance
Beginning of
Period  Additions
Charged to Income
Tax ExpenseOther Changes
to Reserves  Balance
End of Period
2016 $ 30,916 $ 22,564$ 1,709 $ 55,189
2017 $ 55,189 $ 9,052$ 4,114 $ 68,355
2018 $ 68,355 $ 10,466$ 474 $ 79,295
96
Table Of Contents
ITEM 9.    CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A.    CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Based on an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer, as of the end of the period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer have concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures (as defined under Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”)) were effective as of December 31, 2018 to ensure that
information required to be disclosed by us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed,
summarized and reported within the time periods specified in Securities and Exchange Commission rules and forms and is
accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as
appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Company's management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting, as that term is defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). Under the supervision and with the participation of the
Company's management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, the Company conducted an evaluation
of its internal control over financial reporting based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
The Company's management evaluated the effectiveness of Clean Harbors internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018. Based on their evaluation under the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013), the
Company's management concluded that the Company maintained effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018 based on the criteria in the Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013).
Deloitte & Touche LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the Company's consolidated financial
statements, has issued an attestation report on the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2018, which is included below in this Item 9A of this annual report on Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There were no changes in the Company's internal control over financial reporting identified in connection with the evaluation
required by paragraph (d) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15 that was conducted during the quarter ended December 31,
2018 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting.
Limitations on the Effectiveness of Controls
The Company's management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, does not expect that the
Company's disclosure controls and procedures or the Company's internal control over financial reporting will prevent all errors and
all fraud.
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that
(i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of
the assets of the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the
company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Further, the design of disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting must reflect the fact that
there are resource constraints, and the benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent
limitations of controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute
assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any, within the Company have been detected.
97
Table Of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Clean Harbors, Inc.
                                                                                                                                          
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Clean Harbors, Inc. and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects,
effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control -
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2018, of the Company and our report
dated February 27, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management's Annual Report on
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed
risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 27, 2019
98
Table Of Contents
ITEM 9B.    OTHER INFORMATION
Not applicable.
PART III
        Except for the information set forth below under Item 12 with respect to securities authorized for issuance under the
registrant's equity compensation plans, the information called for by Item 10 (Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate
Governance), Item 11 (Executive Compensation), Item 12 (Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and
Related Stockholder Matters), Item 13 (Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence), and Item 14
(Principal Accountant Fees and Services) is incorporated herein by reference to the registrant's definitive proxy statement for its
2019 annual meeting of shareholders, which definitive proxy statement will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
by April 30, 2019.
For the purpose of calculating the aggregate market value of the voting stock of the registrant held by non-affiliates as shown
on the cover page of this report, it has been assumed that the directors and executive officers of the registrant, as will be set forth in
the Company's definitive proxy statement for its 2019 annual meeting of shareholders, are the only affiliates of the registrant.
However, this should not be deemed to constitute an admission that all of such persons are, in fact, affiliates or that there are not
other persons who may be deemed affiliates of the registrant.
ITEM 12.    SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
In addition to the information about the security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and related
stockholder matters which is incorporated herein by reference to the Company's definitive proxy statement for the Company's 2019
annual meeting of shareholders, the following table includes information as of December 31, 2018 regarding shares of common
stock authorized for issuance under the Company's equity compensation plan. The Company's shareholders previously approved
the plan.
Plan CategoryNumber of securities to
be issued upon exercise
of outstanding options
and rights(a)  Weighted average
exercise
price of outstanding
options and rights(b) Number of securities
remaining available
for future issuance
under equity
compensation plan
(excluding securities
reflected in column
(a))(c)
Equity compensation plan approved by security holders(1) — $ — 4,059,988
___________________________________________
(1)Includes the Company's 2010 Stock Incentive Plan (the "2010 Plan") under which there were on December 31, 2018 no
outstanding options but 4,059,988 shares were available for grant of future options, stock appreciation rights, restricted
stock awards, restricted stock units and certain other forms of equity incentives. See Note 17, "Stock-Based
Compensation," to the Company's consolidated financial statements included in Item 8, "Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data," in this report.
99
Table Of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15.    EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)   Documents Filed as a Part of this Report
  Page
1. Financial Statements:  
 Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 44
 Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 45
 Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2018 46
 Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2018 47
 Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2018 48
 Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2018 49
 Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 50
2.Financial Statement Schedule:  
 Schedule II Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2018 96
All other schedules are omitted because they are not applicable, not required, or because the required information is included
in the financial statements or notes thereto.
3.Exhibits:   
The list of exhibits filed as part of this annual report on Form 10-K is set forth on the Exhibit Index immediately following
the signature page to this report, and such Exhibit Index is incorporated herein by reference.
Exhibits to this annual report on Form 10-K have been included only with the copies of the Form 10-K filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission. Upon request to the Company and payment of a reasonable fee, copies of the individual
exhibits will be furnished. The Company undertakes to furnish to the Commission upon request copies of instruments (in addition
to the exhibits listed below) relating to the Company's acquisitions and long-term debt.
ITEM 16.    FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None
100
Table Of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused
this annual report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized on February 27, 2019.
 CLEAN HARBORS, INC.
 By: /s/ ALAN S. MCKIM
   Alan S. McKim
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this annual report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature  Title  Date
/s/ ALAN S. MCKIM  Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer  February 27, 2019
Alan S. McKim   
/s/ MICHAEL  L. BA TTLES  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Of ficer  February 27, 2019
Michael L. Battles   
/s/ ERIC J. DUGAS  Senior Vice President, Finance and Chief Accounting Of ficer  February 27, 2019
Eric J. Dugas   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
Gene Banucci   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
Edward G. Galante   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
Rod Marlin   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
John T. Preston   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
Andrea Robertson   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
Thomas J. Shields   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
Lauren C. States   
*  Director  February 27, 2019
John R. Welch   
*By: /s/ ALAN S. MCKIM  
  Alan S. McKim
Attorney-in-Fact
101
Table Of Contents
EXHIBIT INDEX
Item No. Description Location
2.1Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as Seller, and Clean
Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of February 22, 2002 (1)
2.2First Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as
Seller, and Clean Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of March 8, 2002 (2)
2.3Second Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc. as
Seller, and Clean Harbors, Inc. as Purchaser, dated as of April 30, 2002 (3)
2.4Third Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as
Seller, and Clean Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of September 6, 2002 (4)
2.5Fourth Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as
Seller and Clean Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of July 14, 2003 (5)
2.6Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of October 26, 2012 among Safety-Kleen, Inc., Clean
Harbors, Inc., and CH Merger Sub, Inc. (6)
3.1ARestated Articles of Organization of Clean Harbors, Inc. (7)
3.1BArticles of Amendment [as filed on May 9, 2011] to Restated Articles of Organization of Clean
Harbors (8)
3.4DAmended and Restated By-Laws of Clean Harbors, Inc. (9)
4.34Fifth Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 1, 2016 among Clean
Harbors, Inc., as the U.S. Borrower, Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., as the
Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and the Lenders party
thereto (10)
4.34BAmended and Restated Security Agreement (Canadian Domiciled Loan Parties) dated as of
November 1, 2016 among Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., as the Canadian
Borrower and a Grantor, the subsidiaries of Clean Harbors, Inc. listed on Annex A thereto or that
thereafter become a party thereto as Grantors, and Bank of America, N.A., as Agent (10)
4.34CAmended and Restated Guarantee (U.S. Domiciled Loan Parties-U.S. Facility Obligations)
dated as of November 1, 2016 executed by the U.S. Domiciled Subsidiaries of Clean Harbors,
Inc. named therein in favor of Bank of America, N.A., as Agent for itself and the other U.S.
Facility Secured Parties (10)
4.34DAmended and Restated Guarantee (Canadian Domiciled Loan Parties-Canadian Facility
Obligations) dated as of November 1, 2016 executed by the Canadian Domiciled Subsidiaries of
Clean Harbors, Inc. named therein in favor of Bank of America, N.A., as Agent for itself and the
other Canadian Facility Secured Parties (10)
4.34EAmended and Restated Guarantee (U.S. Domiciled Loan Parties-Canadian Facility Obligations)
dated as of November 1, 2016 executed by Clean Harbors, Inc. and the U.S. Domiciled
Subsidiaries of Clean Harbors, Inc. named therein in favor of Bank of America, N.A., as Agent
for itself and the other Canadian Facility Secured Parties (10)
4.34FFirst Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of June 30, 2017, by and among Clean Harbors,
Inc., Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., the other Loan Parties party thereto, certain
of the Lenders party thereto, which constitute the “Required Lenders”, and Bank of America,
N.A., as Administrative Agent (11)
4.34GSecond Amended and Restated Security Agreement (U.S. Domiciled Loan Parties) dated as of
June 30, 2017, among Clean Harbors, Inc., as the U.S. Borrower and a Grantor, the subsidiaries
of Clean Harbors, Inc. listed on Annex A thereto or that thereafter become a party thereto as
Grantors, and Bank of America, N.A., as Agent (11)
4.34HSecond Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of July 19, 2018, by and among Clean
Harbors, Inc., Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, the Other Loan Parties party thereto,
certain of the Lenders party thereto which constitute the “Required Lenders,” and Bank of
America, N.A., as Agent. (12)
4.42Indenture dated as of December 7, 2012, among Clean Harbors, Inc., as Issuer, the subsidiaries
of Clean Harbors, Inc. named therein as Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as
Trustee (13)
4.43Credit Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among the Financial Institutions party thereto, as
Lenders, Goldman Sachs Lending Partners LLC, as Administrative Agent and Collateral Agent,
Clean Harbors, Inc., as Borrower, and the Loan Guarantors from time to time party thereto (11)
102
Table Of Contents
Item No. Description Location
4.43ASecurity Agreement dated as of June 20, 2017, among Clean Harbors, Inc. and its subsidiaries
listed on Annex A thereto or that become a party thereto as the Grantors, and Goldman Sachs
Lending Partners LLC, as the Agent (11)
4.43BFirst Amendment to Credit Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among the Financial
Institutions party thereto, as Lenders, Goldman Sachs Lending Partners LLC, as Administrative
Agent and Collateral Agent, Clean Harbors, Inc., as Borrower, and the Loan Guarantors from
time to time party thereto. (14)
4.43CIncremental Facility Amendment dated July 19, 2018, to Credit Agreement dated as of June 30,
2017, among the Financial Institutions party thereto, as Lenders, Goldman Sachs Lending
Partners LLC, as Administrative Agent and Collateral Agent, Clean Harbors, Inc., as Borrower,
and the Loan Guarantors from time to time party thereto (12)
4.44Intercreditor Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among Clean Harbors, Inc., and the
subsidiaries of Clean Harbors, Inc. listed on the signature pages thereto (together with any
subsidiary that becomes a party thereto after the date thereof), Bank of America, N.A., as the
Initial ABL Agent, and Goldman Sachs Lending Partners LLC, as agent under the Term Loan
Agreement (11)
10.43*Key Employee Retention Plan (15)
10.43A*Form of Severance Agreement under Key Employee Retention Plan with Confidentiality and
Non-Competition Agreement (16)
10.52C*Clean Harbors, Inc. Management Incentive Plan [as amended and restated effective January 1,
2017] (17)
10.54*Clean Harbors, Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan [as amended on May 10, 2010] (18)
10.54A*Revised form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement [Non-Employee Director] [for use under
2010 Stock Incentive Plan] (16)
10.54B*Revised form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement [Employee] [for use under Clean
Harbors, Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan] (16)
10.54C*Revised form of Performance-Based Restricted Stock Award Agreement [for use under Clean
Harbors, Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan] (16)
10.54D*Amendment to Section 8 and 10(i) of the Company’s 2010 Stock Incentive Plan (19)
10.55*Clean Harbors, Inc. 2014 CEO Annual Incentive Plan (20)
10.55A*Amendment to Section 6(m) of Clean Harbors, Inc. 2014 Annual CEO Incentive Plan (21)
10.55B*Clean Harbors, Inc. Amendment to Section 6(m) of 2014 Annual CEO Incentive Plan (22)
10.56*Mike Battles accepted offer letter effective as of January 6, 2016 (23)
21Subsidiaries Filed herewith
23Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm Filed herewith
24Power of Attorney Filed herewith
31.1Rule 13a-14a/15d-14(a) Certification of the CEO Alan S. McKim Filed herewith
31.2Rule 13a-14a/15d-14(a) Certification of the CFO Michael L. Battles Filed herewith
32Section 1350 Certifications Filed herewith
101The following materials from the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year
ended December 31, 2018, formatted in XBRL (Extensible Business Reporting Language):
(i) Consolidated Balance Sheets, (ii) Consolidated Statements of Operations, (iii) Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Income (Loss), (iv) Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, (v)
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity, and (vi) Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements, tagged as blocks of text (24)
_______________________________________________
* A “management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement” filed as an exhibit to this report pursuant to Item 15(a)(3)
of Form 10-K.
(1) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on February 28,
2002.
(2) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-K Annual Report for the Year
ended December 31, 2001.
103
Table Of Contents
(3) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-Q Quarterly Report for the
Quarterly Period ended March 31, 2002.
(4) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on September 25,
2002.
(5) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-Q Quarterly Report for the
Quarterly Period ended June 30, 2003.
(6) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on October 31, 2012.
(7) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on May 19, 2005.
(8) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on May 12, 2011.
(9) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on December 22,
2014.
(10) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on November 2,
2016.
(11) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s 8-K Report filed on June 30, 2017.
(12) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Report on Form 8-K filed on July 20, 2018.
(13) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on December 10,
2012.
(14) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s Form 8-K Report filed on April 17, 2018.
(15) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s Form 10-Q Quarterly Report for the
quarterly period ended March 31, 1999.
(16) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-K Annual Report for the Year
ended December 31, 2010.
(17) Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its 2017 annual meeting of
shareholders filed on April 26, 2017.
(18) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s Form 8-K Report filed on May 14, 2010.
(19) Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its annual meeting of
shareholders filed on March 22, 2013.
(20) Incorporated by reference to Appendix A to the Company's definitive proxy statement for its 2013 annual meeting of
shareholders filed on March 22, 2013.
(21) Incorporated by reference to Appendix A to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its 2017 annual meeting of
shareholders filed on April 26, 2017.
(22) Incorporated by reference to Appendix A to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its 2017 annual meeting of
shareholders filed on April 26, 2017.
(23) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on January 11, 2016.
(24) These interactive data files are furnished herewith and deemed not filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus
for purposes of Sections 11 or 12 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, are deemed not filed for purposes of Section
18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and otherwise are not subject to liability under those sections.
104
